https://etd.ohiolink.edu/!etd.send_file?accession=ohiou1398772391
	Since the collapse of the socialist state and the opening of the Soviet archives, the historical community has only begun to understand the full extent of crimes committed at the hands of the Cheka, and its successors, the OGPU, NKVD, and KGB. Yet, after tracing this repression to its origins, historical evidence indicates that Imperial Russia first cultivated this culture of secret policing and introduced many of the policing techniques the Bolsheviks later implement and further perfected. By the turn of the 20th century, the Okhrana – the Tsarist secret police – developed into a highly effective political police force which was, by and large, quite successful in penetrating underground revolutionary organizations, including Lenin’s Bolshevik party. The imperial political police cultivated a new tradecraft that influenced the later Soviet apparatuses in cryptanalysis, signals intelligence, external surveillance, and agent provocateurs.

	...First and foremost, the strong elements of continuity between the two policing apparatuses should force historians to reevaluate the culture of intelligence-gathering and espionage attributed, up to this point, only to the Soviet era in Russia’s overall history. This culture of secret policing, this narrative of the government in constant battle against its citizens, was rooted first in Imperial Russia, not the Soviet period. Yet, this culture was embraced, rather enthusiastically, by a regime that claimed to despise and hate the autocracy. This early exposure to a proto-police state very much influenced the mentality, and to some extent the radicalization, of the revolutionaries. Russian historian Orlando Figes concludes that “one can draw a straight line from the penal rigors of the Tsarist regime to the terrorism of the revolutionaries and indeed to the police state of the Bolsheviks.”

	Identifying the continuities between the Tsarist and Soviet secret police is also significant because it highlights that the achievements made by the Okhrana to the intelligence community are generally overlooked. Again, the secret policing organizations under the Soviet regime are generally characterized as innovators in intelligence-gathering and experts at the tradecraft. These characteristics, however, also accurately describe the Tsarist Okhrana, but hardly attributed to it in intelligence history. 
In the 1950s, the CIA correctly identified the importance of the Okhrana; the Agency’s deep interest in the Okhrana files opened at the Hoover Institution demonstrated that the Tsarist secret police held vital information on the tradecraft of the later Soviet apparatuses. Indeed, the Okhrana files did reveal important information on the Soviet methodology for gathering intelligence through external surveillance. According to Aleksei Myagkov, a KGB agent who defected in the 1970s, “it was not only the Cheka that made use of their [the Okhrana’s] methods; they also persist to this day, and are being extensively used by the KGB,” and that KGB recruits “were all astonished at the similarities between the Tsarist system and the KGB’s in the way of working with agents. 

	Studying the changes between the Tsarist Okhrana and the Soviet Cheka is significant as well, as it accurately highlights the major difference between Imperial Russia and the Soviet Union. Under the latter regime, the secret police force, and the state’s use of it for political subjugation, changed drastically in both scale and intent. The brutal police repression seen during the Bolshevik’s first few years surpassed the most violent days of Russian autocracy. The state justified every action the Cheka took as necessity to protect the revolution. For the Bolsheviks, the end justified the means – but the means used were barbaric. Lenin did not see the implementation of terror in terms of morality; in a speech given in February 1920, he stated bluntly, “for us this question is one of expediency.


http://www.ecfr.eu/publications/summary/crimintern_how_the_kremlin_uses_russias_criminal_networks_in_europe
	It was perhaps inevitable that an especially strong connection between the security agencies and organised crime would arise in Russia. This is nothing new. For a start, from the tsarist Okhrana to the various Soviet agencies, the political police looked to the underworld for sources and recruits. The prevailing culture of Russian officialdom – in which political authority is there to be monetised – combined with the powers and impunity of the security apparatus, led to endemic corruption. On the whole, officers from the security and intelligence services did not join gangs or even necessarily form them, even though there were a few so-called ‘werewolves in epaulettes’. Rather, they usually conspired with organised crime networks or provided services for money − primarily protection or information.


http://theses.gla.ac.uk/4077/1/2001MarshallPhD.pdf
	Aside from the security difficulty attendant upon appointing apparently over-qualified men to fairly low consular posts, the 'secret' military agents often had an acrimonious relationship with their official 'public' counterparts.

	...One contemporary recalled that until then at the Academy secret intelligence had been regarded as a rather 'dirty' occupation, the province of undercover policemen and other 'shady characters.' 


https://books.google.com/books?id=X2eTBtFWQdUC&pg=PA30
	One wonders just how extensive the Okhrana operation was abroad. A police report from 1901 refers to a "great number of agents," and at the time of the Harting disclosures an ex-agent provided the press with a list of fifteen Paris operatives. These included former French, German, and Scotland Yard policemen. After the revolution, former Okhrana officials reduced to writing their memoirs argued that only a handful of agents had been stationed abroad, occasionally supplemented by flying squads out of Moscow and St. Petersburg. And yet the files of the Paris Okhrana office, which was the hub of Russian police operations in Europe, fill 216 boxes. These currently reside at the Hoover Institution and await their historian.


https://www.britannica.com/topic/Black-Hand-secret-Serbian-society
	Black Hand, byname of Ujedinjenje Ili Smrt (Serbo-Croation: Union or Death), secret Serbian society of the early 20th century that used terrorist methods to promote the liberation of Serbs outside Serbia from Habsburg or Ottoman rule and was instrumental in planning the assassination of the Austrian archduke Franz Ferdinand (1914), precipitating the outbreak of World War I. The society was formed (1911) and led by Col. Dragutin Dimitrijević; its members were primarily army officers with some government officials. Operating from Belgrade, it conducted propaganda campaigns, organized armed bands in Macedonia (before the Balkan Wars, 1912–13), and established a network of revolutionary cells throughout Bosnia. Within Serbia it dominated the army and wielded tremendous influence over the government by terrorizing officials; it became so powerful that its authority challenged that of the government.


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Dragutin_Dimitrijevi%C4%87
	Dragutin Dimitrijevićw, known as Apis (Апис), was a Serbian colonel. He was a leading member of a military group that organized the overthrow of the Serbian government in 1903. He personally organized and participated in the coup against King Alexander and his wife Queen Draga that resulted in their murders, though he was not present when they were killed. He was also the leader of the Black Hand group responsible for the assassination of Franz Ferdinand, Archduke of Austria in June 1914. The latter triggered the July Crisis which led to the outbreak of World War I.


http://www.larouchepub.com/eiw/public/1991/eirv18n29-19910802/eirv18n29-19910802_036-background_to_the_crisis_the_ser.pdf
	Apis claimed that the removal of the Austrian Archduke Ferdinand, the heir-apparent to the throne, would reduce the danger of Austria declaring war on Serbia. He therefore engaged two men to kill Ferdinand at Sarajevo in August 1914. The confession reads: "I decided this definitely only after Artamonov gave me assurance that Russia would not leave us without protection if Austria attacked us. To Mr. Artamonov on this occasion I did not impart any information on my plans regarding the assassination. To make my demand for his opinion as to the attitude of Russia well founded, I pretended that our intelligence activities might be detected, so that this also might be made to serve as an excuse for Austria to attack us. Malobabic completed the mission I assigned to him. He organized and carried out the assassination. His principal aides were in my service. They had a small honorarium which I was sending them through Malobabic. Some of their signed receipts are in Russian hands, since I was receiving the money I needed for this work from Artamonov."

	In other words, the financial and political backing of the Russian General Staff was essential to the planned assassination that kicked off World War I, Whatever other agencies were involved, the Serbian nationalist Apis would not have taken on the job without knowledge of full Russian backup. 


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Danilo_Ili%C4%87
	He recruited Gavrilo Princip, Nedeljko Čabrinović, Vaso Čubrilović, Trifko Grabež, Muhamed Mehmedbašić, and Cvjetko Popović to assassinate Archduke Franz Ferdinand of Austria.

	They held out, but Ilić, who was picked up on a routine check, eventually broke down under pressure and named his fellow conspirators.


https://books.google.com/books?id=EmJODQAAQBAJ&pg=PT263&lpg=PT263&dq=Apis+Artamonov
	The Russian Embassy was an important element in the context. Before and during the first Balkan war--in which the Black Hand played a conspicuous role, organizing guerilla bands behind the enemy lines--the Russians gave financial and political support to the organization, as did Crown Prince Alexander. For a long time, not only the Russian military attache but the Ambassador, Hartwig, were in intimate contact with Apis. There is no suggestion that he personally pocketed any Russian funds, but the Russians looked upon him as their particular friend, if not quite their agent, and quite naturally tried to build him up in influence. Their success-with the help of the Black Hand's guerilla achievements in Macedonia--was altogether too brilliant. The Balkan wars dangerously inflated the prestige, the egos, and the recklessness of the Serbian officer caste. This was particularly the case with those who belonged to the Black Hand--starting with Apis.

	...Artamonov, the military attache, continued, however, to see his Serbian colleague and friend nearly every day. It was natural enough: they were conducting a joint secret-service operation across the nearby Austrian border, with the help of a chain of Serbian customs inspectors and frontier guards who had been recruited as secret operatives of Apis. Artamonov's contribution to the operation had been to furnish some $1600--an impressive sum by contemporary Balkan standards--toward financing the clandestine network that Apis was setting up on Austro-Hungarian soil, particularly in Bosnia.
	
	...According to former collaborators of Apis, Aramonov was fully informed about the subversive as well as the intelligence aspects of the project; whether he reported both of them to St. Petersburg and to Hartwig is not definitely established.


https://books.google.com/books?id=vQF099JYW_EC&pg=PA47&lpg=PA47&dq=Apis+Artamonov
	A good place to begin is with reactions to the events in Sarjevo. There has always been something suspicious about Russian denials of foreknowledge of the assassination plot. Russia's military attache in Belgrade, General Viktor Artamonov, was out of town on 28 June 1914, giving him a convenient alibi but a strange one, considering that the whole point of Archduke Ferdinand's ill-fated visit to Bosnia was to kick off Austrian military maneuvers in Herzegovina, which would have been of great interest to Russia's official military observer in Serbia. A Serbian army colonel close to Apis later claimed that Artamonov had given Apis a green light for the Sarajevo operation, telling him "Just go ahead! If you are attacked, you will not stand alone."


https://www.quora.com/To-what-extent-was-Russia-more-responsible-for-the-outbreak-of-WW1
	Of course the real test of Russian approval for the assassination was to follow. Austria, first politely, then insistently, requested a Serbian investigation of the crime, which clearly originated within Serbia. When that failed, Austria, along with Germany, turned to Russia, with the just request that Russia use its influence to prevail upon Serbia to investigate the crime. Russia’s foreign minister, Sazanov, flatly, and with provocative rudeness, refused to do so.

	Serbia had an absolute duty under international law to investigate any crime which originated in its territory. By refusing to do so, Serbia was intentionally instigating a war with Austria Hungary, and Sazanov knew this. Why would the Tsar’s government tolerate this action from its vassal state, if it did not want the war, that the Serbian refusal would certainly provoke? Is it unreasonable to suspect that if Russia was thus provoking a war in July of 1914, that it gave approval to the assassination attempt that led to the situation, the month before?


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Alexis_Nour
	Alexis Nour was a Bessarabian-born Romanian journalist, activist and essayist, known for his advocacy of Romanian-Bessarabian union and his critique of the Russian Empire, but also for controversial political dealings. Oscillating between socialism and Russian nationalism, he was noted as founder of Viața Basarabiei gazette.

	...During World War I, Nour agitated against any military alliance between Romania and Russia. He stood out among Germanophiles and local supporters of the Central Powers, agitating in favor of a military offensive into Bessarabia, and demanding the annexation of Transnistria. This combative stance was later overshadowed by revelations that Nour was spying for Russia's intelligence service, the Okhrana.


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Ilie_C%C4%83t%C4%83r%C4%83u
	Ilie V. Cătărău was a Bessarabian-born political adventurer, soldier and spy, who spent parts of his life in Romania. Leading a secretive life, he is widely held to have been the main perpetrator of two bomb attacks, which sought to exacerbate tensions between Romania and Austria-Hungary in preparation for World War I. Beyond his cover as a refugee from the Russian Empire, Ilie Cătărău was a double agent, working for both Russian and Romanian interests.

	By 1917, Cătărău was formally committed to anarchism and communism, allying himself with Bessarabia's Bolshevik insurgents.


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Roman_Malinovsky
	Roman Vatslavovich Malinovsky was a prominent Russian Bolshevik politician before the revolution, while at the same time working as the best paid agent for the Okhrana.


http://spartacus-educational.com/RUSmalinovsky.htm
	Bukharin wrote to Lenin claiming that when he was hiding in Moscow he was arrested by the police just after a meeting with Malinovsky. He was convinced that Malinovsky was a spy. Lenin wrote back that if Bukharin joined in the campaign of slander against Malinovsky he would brand him publicly as a traitor. Understandably, Bukharin dropped the matter. Nadezhda Krupskaya later explained: "Vladimir Ilyich thought it utterly impossible for Malinovsky to have been an agent provocateur. These rumors came from Menshevik circles... The commission investigated all the rumors but could not obtain any definite proof of the charge." Instead of carrying out an investigation into Malinovsky, Lenin made him his deputy inside Russia.


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Jacob_Zhitomirsky
	Jacob (Yakov) Zhitomirsky was a prominent Bolshevik best known for being a secret agent of the Okhrana.


https://books.google.com/books?id=6ZNuZ6fq1WoC&pg=PA536
	In 1911, Zhitomirsky finally fell under suspicion, but it was not his chief who suspected him. Lenin received a warning from Vladimir Burtsev. Now warnings from Burtsev were no small matter, for he was a self-constituted, one-man, counter-espionage agency. As some collect coins or stamps or feminine conquests, he collected spies. He it was who had shortly before exposed the incomparable Azev, director of the Fighting Section of the Social Revolutionary Party. Yet so sure was Lenin of his most trusted agent that he ignored the warning.

	A revolutionary bloodhound by vocation, Burtsev, once he had scented a spy, was not to be put off the trail. By 1913 he had gathered so much evidence that he sent Lenin an ultimatum. He would create a public scandal if trust were not withdrawn from this man. "If my charges are false, let him haul me before a revolutionary tribunal. There he will prove his innocence or I my charges."

	Alarmed at last, Lenin sent another "man of confidence" to take up the Zhitomirsky matter with Burtsev, and, at the same time, to discuss the whole problem of combatting the spies with which the Bolshevik movement was now obviously infested. The man whom Lenin sent was Roman Malinovsky!

	Malinovsky questioned Burtsev with strained interest. Who in the police or government was giving him his secret tips? what reasons had he for suspecting Dr. Zhitomisky? how could the Bolsheviks judge the reliability of such grave charges unless they were given the sources? what other Bolsheviks did he suspect?


https://books.google.com/books?id=N9mbl_xbWpkC&pg=PT259
	The Okhrana saw Lenin as a brilliant potential executor of the task demanded by the Emperor: the disintegration of the Russian Social-Democratic Labour Party. The enhancement of Lenin's career was the Okhrana's confidential priority.


http://www.oac.cdlib.org/findaid/ark:/13030/kt538nf189/entire_text/


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Okhrana
	Formed to combat political terrorism and left-wing revolutionary activity, the Okhrana operated offices throughout the Russian Empire and satellite agencies in a number of foreign nations. It was concerned primarily with monitoring the activities of Russian revolutionaries abroad, including Paris, where Pyotr Rachkovsky was based (1884–1902).

	The task was performed by multiple methods, including covert operations, undercover agents, and "perlustration"—reading of private correspondence. Even the Foreign Agency served this purpose. The Okhrana was notorious for its agents provocateurs, including Dr. Jacob Zhitomirsky (a leading Bolshevik and close associate of Vladimir Lenin), Yevno Azef, Roman Malinovsky and Dmitry Bogrov.

	...The Okhrana used many seemingly unorthodox methods in the pursuit of its mission to defend the monarchy; indeed, some of the Okhrana’s activities even contributed to the wave of domestic unrest and revolutionary terror that they were intended to quell. Perhaps most paradoxical of all was the Okhrana’s collaboration with revolutionary organizations.


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Black_Hand_%28Serbia%29#Ideology
	The group encompassed a range of ideological outlooks, from conspiratorially-minded army officers to idealistic youths, sometimes tending towards republicanism, despite the acquisition of nationalistic royal circles in its activities (the movement's leader, Colonel Dragutin Dimitrijević or "Apis," had been instrumental in the June 1903 coup which had brought King Petar Karađorđević to the Serbian throne following 45 years of rule by the rival Obrenović dynasty). The group was denounced as nihilist by the Austro-Hungarian press and compared to the Russian People's Will and the Chinese Assassination Corps.


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Okhrana
	...For over twenty years, the Okhrana had focused on interfering with the activities of relatively small, and distinct, revolutionary groups. The Revolution of 1905, characterized by seemingly spontaneous marches and strikes, exposed the Okhrana's inefficacy at controlling mass popular movements. Not only did the Okhrana lack the capacity to prevent the mass movements of 1905, or even to contain them once they began, the Okhrana’s misguided attempts may even have worsened the unrest. D. F. Trepov, the Assistant Minister of the Interior in charge of police affairs, and P. I. Rachkovsky, now in charge of all domestic political police operations, attempted to mount an aggressive offensive against those they believed to be responsible for the unrest, namely zemstvo employees, in May 1905, but backed down three months later. In October of that year, Trepov again attempted a violent repression of the revolution only to call off the effort for lack of manpower. Since these attempts at repression never reached fruition, they only served to aggravate the already enraged Russian populace and to deepen their distrust of the Imperial government. Trepov’s replacement by P.N. Durnovo in late-October ushered in a period of even more vicious repression of the Revolution.

	...Just as the Okhrana had once sponsored trade unions to divert activist energy from political causes, so too did the secret police attempt to promote the Bolshevik party, as the Bolsheviks seemed a relatively harmless alternative to more violent revolutionary groups. Indeed, to the Okhrana, Lenin seemed to actively hinder the revolutionary movement by denouncing other revolutionary groups and refusing to cooperate with them. To aid the Bolsheviks at the expense of other revolutionaries, the Okhrana helped Roman Malinovsky, a police spy who had managed to rise within the group and gain Lenin’s trust, in his bid to become a Bolshevik delegate to the Duma. To this end, the Okhrana sequestered Malinovsky’s criminal record and arrested others candidates for the seat. Malinovsky won the seat and led the Bolshevik delegation in the Fourth Duma until 1914, but even with the information Malinovsky and other informants provided to the Okhrana, the police were unprepared for the rise of Bolshevism in 1917. Although the secret police had agents within the Bolshevik organization, other factors contributed to the Okhrana’s inefficacy at averting the events of 1917. Among these factors was the Deputy Minister of the Interior, General V. F. Dzhunkovsky’s ban on police spies within the military, a practice he found dishonorable and damaging to morale. While, initially, the beginning of World War I moved the Okhrana’s attentions from countering revolutionaries to countering German espionage, the focus quickly shifted back as it was revealed that the Germans were heavily funding Russian revolutionary groups in order to destabilize the nation. Despite the renewed attention, the February Revolution took the secret police, and the nation, by surprise. Indeed, the Okhrana’s persistent focus on revolutionary groups may have resulted in the secret police not fully appreciating the deep-seated popular unrest brewing in Russia.

	The Okhrana was identified by the revolutionaries as one of the main symbols of Tsarist repression, and its headquarters were sacked and burned on 27 February 1917. The newly formed Provisional Government then disbanded the whole organization and released most of the political prisoners who had been held by the Tsarist regime. Revelations of the Okhrana’s earlier abuses heightened public hostility towards the secret police after the February Revolution and made it very dangerous to be a political policeman. That fact, along with the St. Petersburg (now Petrograd) Soviet’s insistence on the dissolution of the regular Tsarist police force, as well as the political police, meant that the Okhrana quickly and quietly disappeared.


https://books.google.com/books?id=PY2RAgAAQBAJ&pg=PA81
	He reported only to Beletsky or Vissaironov, communicating with them either by a special telephone installed in his apartment, in private rooms of fashionable restaurants, or in their homes. Beletsky, Vissarionov and Martynov considered Malinovsky the 'pride of the Okhrana.'

	Lenin moved from Paris to the city of Cracow, in the Austrian part of Poland near the Russian border, to make it easier for him to maintain contact with Malinovsky and other Bolshevik Duma deputies. ...Lenin insisted on the Menshevik-Bolshevik split, and Beletsky was just as strongly in favor of it. Lenin sent drafts of his speeches to Malinovsky, who took them to Beletsky or Vissarionov for review and minor corrections and delivered them in the Duma.

	But dark clouds began to appear over this Okhrana-Bolshevik symbiosis. Lieutenant-Colonel I.P. Vasiliev started a secret campaign, attempting to expose Malinovsky's ties to the Okhrana. He sent a number of anonymous letters to the Menshevik newspaper Luch, stating that Malinovsky was an Okhrana agent. The paper's editors ignored what they considered to be slanders, but rumors began to spread. Vasiliev then wrote an anonymous letter to Lidia Dan, the wife of the Menshevik leader F.I. Dan, offering to meet her secretly and prove that he was a high Okhrana official and that he had evidence of Malinovsky's duplicity. He suggested that Dan signify her agreement to this meeting by a certain newspaper advertisement; she ignored the offer.

	Koba, meanwhile, was hoping to expose Malinovsky for his own reasons. Early in November 1912 he want to Cracow to see Lenin, intending to inform him of Malinovsky's Okhrana ties. Upon his arrival Koba quickly recognized the futility of any attempt to convince Lenin of Malinovsky's treachery, as Lenin was far too fond of having Malinovsky as his mouthpiece in the Duma.

	...While waiting for an opportunity to destroy his rival, Koba, on Lenin's advice, worked on an essay entitled 'Marxism and the Nationalities Problem,' an enlargement of his earlier article. Lenin asked Bukharin and Troyanovsky to help Koba locate and translate related works by Austrian authors, since Koba knew no German, and he edited Koba's essay. The most striking feature of this essay was the attention it devoted to the Jews and the Jewish Bund: in all, there were 174 comments concerning Jews, all hostile. Again, Koba signed the essay K. Stalin.


http://www.goodreads.com/author/show/290287.Roman_Brackman


http://www.nytimes.com/2007/10/19/books/19book.html
	Mr. Montefiore dismisses, perhaps for good, the theory that Stalin was an agent for the Okhrana, the czarist secret police. He spent far too much time in prison or exile, for one thing. On the occasions when he met with agents, Mr. Montefiore points out, Stalin was receiving rather than giving intelligence.


http://www.standard.co.uk/comment/comment/simon-sebag-montefiore-today-s-new-world-order-has-its-roots-in-the-events-of-1917-a3439971.html
	Simon Sebag Montefiore: Today’s new world order has its roots in the events of 1917

	Lenin founded the first secret police of modern times, the Cheka (later OGPU, NKVD, KGB and FSB)

	...The real lesson of 1917, expressed by Lenin, is the alchemy of power practiced by Putin and Trump: “Kto kovo?” — who controls whom?” 


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Allied_intervention_in_the_Russian_Civil_War
	The Allied intervention was a multi-national military expedition launched during the Russian Civil War in 1918. The initial goals were to help the Czechoslovak Legion, secure supplies of munitions and armaments in Russian ports, and re-establish the Eastern Front. After winning World War I, the Allies militarily backed the anti-Bolshevik White forces in Russia. Allied efforts were hampered by divided objectives, war-weariness after they just finished greater conflict, and a lack of domestic support.


http://www.newworldencyclopedia.org/entry/Assassination_of_Archduke_Franz_Ferdinand#Russian_military_attach.C3.A9.27s_office
	Serbian reservists being transported on tramp steamers on the Danube, apparently accidentally, crossed onto the Austro-Hungarian side of the river at Temes-Kubin and Austro-Hungarian soldiers fired into the air to warn them off. This incident was blown out of proportion and Austria-Hungary then declared war and mobilized its army on July 28, 1914. Under the Secret Treaty of 1892 Russia and France were obliged to mobilize their armies if any of the Triple Alliance mobilized. Soon all the Great Powers (except Italy) had chosen sides and gone to war.

	It could be argued that this assassination set in motion most of the major events of the twentieth century, with its reverberations lingering into the twenty-first. The Treaty of Versailles at the end of the First World War is generally linked to the rise of Adolf Hitler and World War II. It also led to the Russian Revolution, which helped lead to the Cold War. This, in turn, led to many of the major political developments of the twentieth century, such as the fall of the colonial empires and the rise of the United States and the Soviet Union to super-power status.


...


http://spartacus-educational.com/RUSokhrana.htm
	The Okhrana also recruited members of illegal organizations as paid informers. In 1912 over 26,000 people in Russia were receiving money from the Okhrana. The average informer received 100 rubles a month, a sum that was well above the average industrial wage at the time. Evno Azef, Okhrana's leading undercover agent, was paid over 2000 rubles a month.

	Some of the organizations that Okhrana were interested in were illegal and were based outside Russia. To deal with revolutionaries living in exile, Okhrana sections were also established in major European cities such as Paris and London.


https://www.cia.gov/library/center-for-the-study-of-intelligence/csi-publications/books-and-monographs/okhrana-the-paris-operations-of-the-russian-imperial-police/5474-1.html
	The 1883 opening of a Paris office known as the Zagranichnaia okhranka or agentura was a sign of both success and failure on the part of the tsarist authorities. It reflected their success in having driven many revolutionaries, terrorists, and nationalists out of Russia; it also underscored their failure to stem an upsurge in Russian subversive activity based abroad. By the 1880s, the Russian emigre community in France had grown to some 5,000 people, most of them in the Paris area. The City of Light had become the hub for Russian revolutionary groups operating in much of Europe.

	...The Okhrana saw Paris as the most advantageous place to base its foreign operations. Russian police officials admired the French internal security service, the Sûreté Generale--generally regarded as among the best in the world--and sought access to its files through both official liaison and unofficial channels. The Okhrana even hired French, British, and other detectives to help run its operations. From Paris, moreover, the Okhrana could monitor its agenturas in Berlin and other European cities. Most of the key Russian revolutionaries in the French capital had contacts in other countries and cities. Consequently, penetrations of revolutionary groups in Paris often yielded leads to Russian dissident organizations and individuals outside France.

	The Okhrana's relations with the Sûreté were symbiotic. The Okhrana reduced the Sûreté 's workload and provided employment for retired French detectives. The French police did not see the Paris bureau as a threat to French national interests or to the Sûreté's organizational equities. On the eve of World War I the French security service declared: "It is impossible, on any objective assessment, to deny the usefulness of having a Russian police [force] operating in Paris, whether officially or not, whose presence is to keep under surveillance the activities of Russian revolutionaries." At the same time, socialist and radical deputies in the French Assembly, who were more sympathetic to the Russian revolutionaries than to the police, pressed the French and Russian Governments to shut down the Okhrana office. In 1913 the Russian regime formally complied by announcing the office's closure. But this was a subterfuge; the Russian police continued operating under the cover of the Agence Bint et Sambain, a private detective agency. One of the two proprietors, Henri Bint, was a former employee of both the Sûreté and the Okhrana.
	
	...Agent provocateur is a French term, but the Russians perfected the art. In fact, the primary purpose of the Foreign Bureau's provocations was to scare the French into taking action against Russian radicals and cooperating with the Okhrana. The most notorious provocation occurred in Paris in 1890, when Arkadiy Harting (a.k.a. Abraham Gekel'man or Landezen) organized a well-armed team of bombthrowers and then betrayed them to the Paris police. These heavily publicized arrests helped persuade the French public of the dangers posed by Russian revolutionaries in France. The episode also convinced officials in St. Petersburg that republican France could get tough on Russian radicals and make a good ally. To some extent, at least, this helped diminish mutual suspicions and created an atmosphere on both sides conducive to negotiation of the Franco-Russian alliance of 1891.

	...Harting may be the most interesting character in the essays (see the second reprinted article below, entitled "The Illustrious Career of Arkadiy Harting"). He rose from informer to master spy to spymaster, eventually becoming chief of the Paris office. As noted above, his top agent, Zhitomirsky, penetrated Lenin's inner circle during the Bolshevik party's underground days. Before he quit the espionage business in 1909 following his exposure by the French press as a Russian spy, Harting had served tsarist Russia, imperial Germany, and republican France, receiving decorations from all three.

	Harting's case officer was Pyotr Rachkovsky, probably the ablest head of the Okhrana's Foreign Bureau. Rachkovsky was a pioneer. He refined the art of what we today call active measures or perceptions management techniques. He paid subsidies to journalists willing to write articles favorable to Russian interests, and he purchased or subsidized such periodicals as Revue Russe and Le Courier Franco-Russe. During his tenure (1884-1902), journalists on the Okhrana payroll began planting articles in the French press that were favorable to Russian interests. Rachkovsky also created the Ligue pour le Salut de la Patrie Russe, which promoted positive views toward Russia among French citizens; this group was a forerunner of Soviet front organizations and "friendship societies."


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Pyotr_Rachkovsky
	Rachkovsky may have also played a role in amplifying the carnage of World War I: "Rachkovsky’s bosses in Russia and his hosts in Paris both feared the radicals, allowing the Russian agent to tighten the ties between the two nations. He succeeded so well that [historian Alex] Butterworth argues he was partly to blame for the Russo-French alliance that helped make World War I such a bloody mess."


https://books.google.com/books?id=8fxvCwAAQBAJ&pg=PT116
	For nearly three weeks there was no really serious alarm as to the general maintenance of peace. We have clear proof of the fact that in military circles in France the outlook was regarded as favourable for op. July 18th, we find Foch leaving Nancy for a fortnight's leave and a holiday at this home, the old manor-house of Trefeunteuniou in Brittany. His son remained with this regiment, but his two daughters and their children came to Brittany at the same time, with this sons-in-law, their husbands... Leave would certainly not have been asked for by the three officers, and above all by Foch, if there was any idea that war on the eastern frontier was close at hand.


https://books.google.com/books?id=lS_Gmi7DFFwC&q=Russia
	Foch soon grew impatient with the delay. He wanted to attack quickly both to assume the cherished offensive and because he believed that by attacking he could disrupt the timing of German operations. ...By mid-August, however, Foch, like most other French commanders, was still trying to discern German intentions. ...For its part, Russia mobilized faster than almost anyone, including Foch, believed possible.


https://www.quora.com/To-what-extent-was-Russia-more-responsible-for-the-outbreak-of-WW1
	However, whether you believe this July crisis was pre-planned, or it was a happy Fabrege Easter Egg that dropped into Sazanov’s lap, Russia acted quickly to start the war. Russia coordinated with its French allies in mid July, in a state visit by the perpetually belligerent President Poincarre, and significantly, without any official records being kept. Russia had already started mobilizing before Serbia had even been presented the July 23rd demarche, by Austria. It clearly wanted the war, that it instigated, at the very least by encouraging Serbian intransigence to Austria’s demands, or, at the worst and most likely, by encouraging the Serbs to undertake Dimitrijevic’s assassination plan in the first place.


http://www.history.com/topics/world-war-i/ferdinand-foch
	Foch next took charge of the French armies of the north; he now coordinated moves with the British and Belgian armies during the so-called “race to the sea.” If he did not succeed in going on the offensive, he did help check the German drive for the last true prizes of 1914, the Channel ports. Several times he was forced to brace up the nervous British commander, Sir John French, with what his biographer, B. H. Liddell Hart calls “an injection of Fochian serum.” But when the Germans ruptured the line at the Second Ypres in 1915, Foch’s insistence on counterattacks produced only unnecessary Allied losses. Death on an even larger scale was the most visible result of Foch’s Artois offensives in the spring and early fall of the year; casualties approached 150,000. After the Artois the eacutelan of the French common soldier, which he so prized, would never be the same.


http://www.newstatesman.com/culture/2014/12/offensive-excess-controversial-military-tactics-marshal-ferdinand-foch
	When war broke out in 1914 the Germans trumped moral superiority with firepower, and by the end of the month the French army had suffered over 210,000 casualties. On 23 August, the BEF was likewise mauled in its first encounter, at Mons. The British army did not recover fully from its early losses until the middle of 1918. Foch was only just able to pull off his gamble in the counterattack after the Marne, in part because the Germans overestimated the strength of the allies.
	
	...His celebrated On the Principles of War, published in 1903, spawned the doctrine of offensive à outrance – offensive to excess: the moral superiority of troops in attack would overcome all opposition. However, Foch himself, a fervent Catholic in an increasingly anti-clerical France, was not notably terrier-like; at least not until he had reached high rank.


https://books.google.com/books?id=lS_Gmi7DFFwC&pg=PT127&lpg=PT127&dq=Foch+versailles+treaty
	During the war, Foch had generally shunned reporters. His experience with the London Daily Mail in April 1919 had led to an unpleasant confrontation with Clemenceau during which he had agreed not to talk to the media. Once the signing of the Treaty of Versailles became inevitable, however, he again gave interviews in order to make sure that his voice, silenced throughout the first half of 1919, would be heard. Just weeks before the signing, he gave a prophetic interview in which he predicted the future of Europe: "And next time remember, the Germans will make no mistake. They will break through into northern France and will seize Channel ports as a base of operations against England... The Germans will have no arms for another attack you say? Ho ho! How do you know? By the time they had got them it would be too late."


https://books.google.com/books?id=lS_Gmi7DFFwC&q=Russia
	He began to speak publicly more often, deciding that "discipline is not servility." Foch firmly believed that any peace treaty that did not establish the Rhine River as Germany's western border was a betrayal to the men who had fallen in the war.

	...While little direct evidence links Foch to Rhenish independence schemes, his close professional and personal links to all three occupation generals makes it highly unlikely that he was blind to their activities. Clemenceau's representative in the Rhineland, Under Secretary of State for War Jules Jeanneney, believed that Foch was quite well informed of the Rhenish schemes and that both Fayolle and Mangin kept him regularly up-to-date. Evidence from Foch's personal notebooks indicate that as late as December 1919 he was aware of the activities of separatist movements in the Rhineland, Bavaria, and Hanover. Certainly, no evidence exists to suggest that Foch ever tried to dissuade his generals. Foch even moved his headquarters to the Rhenish city of Kreuznach, presumably to be closer to Fayolle, Mangin, and Gerard.
	...While Mangin continued to work with Dorten, Foch asked to be heard by the men deciding Europe's future. He demanded the right to speak both to the Council of Four and to the French Council of Ministers. On march 31, 1919, he was scheduled to address the Council of Four on the issue of communications with the German delegation at Spa. Instead, Foch dedicated his allotted time to a lengthy discussion of the future of the Rhineland. Foch warned the assembled politicians and diplomats that if the Allies agreed to a peace treaty that did not include a separate Rhineland, they would be committing suicide. He also spoke against the proposed military alliance as a feeble guarantee of future security:

		"There is no principle by which a victorious nation can be forced to restore the means of her own security to her enemy. After a free people has paid for her independence by more than a million and a half corpses and unparalleled devastation, no principle in the world can force her to live in perpetual fear of her neighbor, and to have alliances as her sole resource against disaster."

	Foch then asked for his speech to be translated, only to hear Clemenceau tell him that a translation was not necessary as he believed that Lloyd George and Wilson (neither of whom was fluent in French) understood his main points. Enraged, Foch twice refused to leave the room when Clemenceau dismissed him. The prime minister, evidently embarrassed at his inability to control one of his generals, leant over to Woodrow Wilson and said, "I don't know what to do, he won't leave."

	...The incident produced a "mulish obstinacy" in Foch to press for the Rhineland issue and a desire by the Council of Four to keep Foch as far away from deliberations as possible. Clemenceau began to fear that Foch would use the Rhineland issue to force a coup d'etat. He flirted with the idea of replacing Foch with the much more pliable Petain. But Foch was too popular with the French people, and Rhineland independence had too much domestic support for Clemenceau to dismiss him.

	...Having thus failed with his demands before the Council of Four, Foch went one step further to outright insubordination. On April 6, Clemenceau asked him to deliver a telegram to the German delegation at Spa communicating to them the preliminary terms of the treaty. Foch refused on the grounds that he did not understand the language in the telegram. Clemenceau accused Foch of failing to obey orders and threatening to replace him with Petain.
	
	...Having been rebuffed twice by the politicians, Foch turned to the media. ... The former article directly quoted Foch as prophetically stating:

		"Having reached the Rhine, we must stay there. Impress that upon your fellow countrymen... We must have a barrier... Remember, that these seventy millions of Germans will always be a menace to us... They are a people both envious and warlike... What was it that saved the Allies at the beginning of the war? Russia. Well, on whose side will Russia be in the future? ...And next time, remember, the Germans will make no mistake. They will break through into Northern France and will seize the Channel ports as a base of operations against England."


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Ferdinand_Foch
	On 11 November 1918 Foch accepted the German request for an armistice. Foch advocated peace terms that would make Germany unable to pose a threat to France ever again. Foch considered the Treaty of Versailles too lenient on Germany and as the Treaty was being signed on 28 June 1919, he declared: "This is not a peace. It is an armistice for twenty years". His words proved prophetic: the Second World War started twenty years and 64 days later.

	...After the reading of the pre-amble of the November 1918 armistice, Foch left the carriage, in a move that was perceived as humiliating by the defeated Germans. In 1940, after the defeat of France by Germany early in World War II, when France surrendered to Germany, Adolf Hitler, in a calculated gesture of disdain to the French delegates – left the carriage, as Foch had done in 1918.

	...Foch made a 3000-mile circuit through the U.S. Mid West and industrial cities such as Pittsburgh PA, then on to Washington, D.C., which included Ceremonies at Arlington National Cemetery for what was then called Armistice Day. During the tour he received numerous honorary degrees from American Universities.

	Foch died on 20 March 1929, and was interred in Les Invalides, next to Napoleon and other famous French soldiers and officers.

	A statue of Foch was set up at the Compiègne Armistice site when the area was converted into a national memorial. This statue was the one item left undisturbed by the Germans following their defeat of France in June 1940. Following the signing of France's surrender on 21 June, the Germans ravaged the area surrounding the railway car in which both the 1918 and 1940 surrenders had taken place. The statue was left standing, to view nothing but a wasteland.


https://www.widoobiz.com/entrepreneurs-lifestyle/marechal-foch-toujours-ete-entrepreneur-offensif/51471
https://translate.google.com/translate?sl=fr&tl=en&js=y&prev=_t&hl=en&ie=UTF-8&u=https%3A%2F%2Fwww.widoobiz.com%2Fentrepreneurs-lifestyle%2Fmarechal-foch-toujours-ete-entrepreneur-offensif%2F51471
	By Tancrède Blondé

	It is impossible on this eve of an armistice not to evoke the life and work of Marshal Foch, which enabled France to win the First World War.


https://www.widoobiz.com/a-la-une/le-management-selon-kim-jong-un/58432
https://translate.google.com/translate?hl=en&sl=fr&u=https://www.widoobiz.com/a-la-une/le-management-selon-kim-jong-un/58432&prev=search
	By Tancrède Blondé

	It is true that he is capable of executing one of his ministers with air cannon, but, as Sophocles said, "the bad example is contagious." And that, Kim Jung One can not accept it. Back on a method of management that has proved its worth in Germany and Russia in the 1930s.


https://www.gwern.net/docs/terrorism/1989-andrew.pdf
	Like much else in the study of contemporary intelligence, KGB and GRU foreign operations are commonly interpreted with almost total disregard for historical perspective. "Active measures" are widely believed to be an invention of Soviet intelligence. In reality, though the KGB has been responsible for an enormous expansion in the use made of them, their effectiveness was at least as great in tsarist times. There is no convincing evidence that any KGB-inspired press campaign in the West as been as effective as the tsarist attempting to persuade Western investors, all of whom later lost their money, to ignore the risks of investing in Russia. Before World War I, every Paris newspaper of note save for the socialist L'Humanite was successfully bribed to support tsarist government loans. By 1914, 25 percent of France's foreign investment was in Russia


https://www.widoobiz.com/j-entreprends-comme-je-suis/widooworld/entreprendre-en-moldavie-une-opportunite-de-developpement-grandissante/8547
https://translate.google.com/translate?hl=en&sl=fr&u=https://www.widoobiz.com/j-entreprends-comme-je-suis/widooworld/entreprendre-en-moldavie-une-opportunite-de-developpement-grandissante/8547
	Moldova: A Growing Development Opportunity

	By Tancrède Blondé

	Societe Generale understood this well, and it is under its subsidiary Mobiasbianca that it intervenes in Moldova. After a few years in Russia in the banking sector, Jean-François Myard was awarded the management of the Moldovan sector. What are the advantages of Moldova for a banking platform?


http://iranecoinfoblog.blogspot.com/2017/01/iran-nous-sommes-dans-une-phase-de.html
https://translate.google.com/translate?sl=fr&tl=en&js=y&prev=_t&hl=en&ie=UTF-8&u=http%3A%2F%2Firanecoinfoblog.blogspot.com%2F2017%2F01%2Firan-nous-sommes-dans-une-phase-de.html
	Iran: "We are in a phase of rediscovery of the market"

	In this new issue of Entrepreneurs du Monde, Tancrède Blondé sets out to discover Iran thanks to the French entrepreneurs who have gone to the site.

	A country that deserves to be known. Despite its somewhat dated sulphurous reputation, Iran has very interesting resources for entrepreneurs who are sick of new markets. Again we must be patient. Before you can talk business, the leader will have to meet a lot of people. "They are very attentive to the personal relationship that you can develop," says Vivaction CEO Richard Marry. 


http://www.bbc.com/news/business-29699733
	Christophe de Margerie, the chief executive of French oil company Total, has died in an air crash in Moscow.

	His corporate jet collided with a snow plough and was then engulfed in flames. All four people on board were killed.


https://www.ft.com/content/3ef55d72-58bd-11e4-942f-00144feab7de
	The tragedy follows a period of heightened tensions between Russia and the west over Ukraine, with Total’s joint venture with Russia’s Lukoil to explore shale oil in Siberia scuppered by western sanctions.

	De Margerie has been sympathetic to Russia and a defender of Total’s interests in the region. In a recent interview with the Financial Times he struck an upbeat note, saying that “it was not the first time there was a crisis between Europe and Russia”.

	There was confusion about the condition of the driver of the snow-clearing vehicle amid conflicting claims by Russian authorities that he had escaped unhurt after earlier reports said he was seriously injured.

	“It has now been established that the driver of the snowplough was in a state of alcoholic intoxication,” said Vladimir Markin, spokesman for Russia’s investigative committee. He added that the driver had been detained.


https://www.bloomberg.com/news/articles/2016-04-29/unmasking-the-men-behind-zero-hedge-wall-street-s-renegade-blog


http://www.zerohedge.com/news/2014-10-20/anti-petrodollar-ceo-french-energy-giant-total-dies-freak-plane-crash-moscow


http://www.egaliteetreconciliation.fr/Mort-de-Christophe-de-Margerie-le-mystere-reste-entier-40451.html
https://translate.google.com/translate?hl=en&sl=fr&u=http://www.egaliteetreconciliation.fr/Mort-de-Christophe-de-Margerie-le-mystere-reste-entier-40451.html


https://www.widoobiz.com/actu-business/les-trois-phrases-resument-christophe-margerie/51128
https://translate.google.com/translate?hl=en&sl=fr&u=http://www.widoobiz.com/actu-business/les-trois-phrases-resument-christophe-margerie/51128
	The three sentences that summarize Christophe de Margerie

	By Tancrède Blondé

	Death to 63 years in a plane crash in Moscow, Total's CEO was known not to have his tongue in his pocket.

	Tragic. Because of a drunken driver of snowplows in Moscow, France loses one of its greatest bosses.

	...Capable of staying for hours in an anti-chamber of an officer or of exchanging with him until the end of the night, Christophe de Margerie remains a background rider of the commercial negotiation. So much so that he had kept good contacts with Vladimir Putin. Until the day he meets the snowplow. Tragic, you are told.


https://www.cielfm.be/les-francais-ont-honore-la-memoire-du-corps-expeditionnaire-russe-une-minute-de-silence/
https://translate.google.com/translate?sl=fr&tl=en&js=y&prev=_t&hl=en&ie=UTF-8&u=https%3A%2F%2Fwww.cielfm.be%2Fles-francais-ont-honore-la-memoire-du-corps-expeditionnaire-russe-une-minute-de-silence%2F


http://archive.government.ru/eng/docs/15656/
	Vladimir Putin's address:

	Mr Prime Minister, French friends, compatriots,

	Today, we dedicate this monument to the Russian Expeditionary Force and pay tribute to the memory of our men and officers who fought far from their homeland – both for Russia and for France – performing their duty with courage and honour during WWI.

	French Marshal Ferdinand Foch, a hero and a legendary military leader of that war, often referred to as the Great War, wrote: "If France wasn't wiped off the map of Europe, we owe it first to the courage and staunchness of Russian soldiers." These sincere words are testimony to his deep respect for Russia, the Russian Army, and the Russian people.


https://books.google.com/books?id=FNemAgAAQBAJ&pg=PA10
	By Michael Jabara Carley 

	"The Bolshevik as Foe"

	In Paris, too, cooporation with the Bolsheviks was mooted. Even the soon-to-be-Allied generalissimo Ferdinand Foch seemed disposed to listen. It made sense because the anti-Bolshevik factions were weak and pro-German. The "better" Russians hoped that the Germans would put down the revolution. On the other hand, In February and March 1918 the Bolsheviks were preparing to fight the Germans. Foch and Lloyd George were among the first "realists" or pragmatists, ready to overlook Boslhevik revolutionary ideas in order to ally with them against the greater German danger.

	Would pragmatism prevail?


...


https://www.ushmm.org/wlc/en/article.php?ModuleId=10005425
	World War I was one of the most destructive wars in modern history. Nearly ten million soldiers died as a result of hostilities. The enormous losses on all sides of the conflict resulted in part from the introduction of new weapons, like the machine gun and gas warfare, as well as the failure of military leaders to adjust their tactics to the increasingly mechanized nature of warfare. A policy of attrition, particularly on the Western Front, cost the lives of hundreds of thousands of soldiers.

	No official agencies kept careful accounting of civilian losses during the war years, but scholars suggest that as many as thirteen million non-combatants died as a direct or indirect result of the war. The conflict uprooted or displaced millions of persons from their homes in Europe and Asia Minor. Property and industry losses were catastrophic, especially in France, Belgium, Poland, and Serbia, where fighting had been heaviest. 

	The "Fourteen Points"

	In January 1918, some ten months before the end of World War I, US President Woodrow Wilson had written a list of proposed war aims which he called the “Fourteen Points.” Eight of these points dealt specifically with territorial and political settlements associated with the victory of the Entente Powers, including the idea of national self-determination for ethnic populations in Europe. The remainder of the principles focused on preventing war in the future, the last proposing a League of Nations to arbitrate international disputes. Wilson hoped his proposal would bring about a just and lasting peace: a “peace without victory.”

	When German leaders signed the armistice in the Compiègne Forest on 11 November 1918, many of them believed that the Fourteen Points would form the basis of the future peace treaty, but when the heads of the governments of the United States, Great Britain, France, and Italy met in Paris to discuss treaty terms, the European contingent of the “Big Four” rejected this approach.

	Treaty of Versailles

	Viewing Germany as the chief instigator of the conflict, the European Allied Powers decided to impose particularly stringent treaty obligations upon the defeated Germany. The Treaty of Versailles, presented for German leaders to sign on May 7, 1919, forced Germany to concede territories to Belgium (Eupen-Malmédy), Czechoslovakia (the Hultschin district), and Poland (Poznan [German: Posen], West Prussia and Upper Silesia). The Germans returned Alsace and Lorraine, annexed in 1871 after the Franco-Prussian War, to France. All German overseas colonies became League of Nation Mandates, and the city of Danzig (today: Gdansk), with its large ethnically German population, became a Free City. The treaty demanded demilitarization and occupation of the Rhineland, and special status for the Saarland under French control. Plebiscites were to determine the future of areas in northern Schleswig on the Danish-German frontier and parts of Upper Silesia on the border with Poland.

	Perhaps the most humiliating portion of the treaty for defeated Germany was Article 231, commonly known as the "War Guilt Clause," which forced the German nation to accept complete responsibility for initiating World War I. As such Germany was liable for all material damages, and France's premier Georges Clemenceau particularly insisted on imposing enormous reparation payments. Aware that Germany would probably not be able to pay such a towering debt, Clemenceau and the French nevertheless greatly feared rapid German recovery and the initiation of a new war against France. Hence, the French sought in the postwar treaty to limit Germany's potential to regain its economic superiority and to rearm. The German army was to be limited to 100,000 men, and conscription proscribed; the treaty restricted the Navy to vessels under 10,000 tons, with a ban on the acquisition or maintenance of a submarine fleet.

	...The newly formed German democratic government saw the Versailles Treaty as a “dictated peace” (Diktat). Although France, which had suffered more materially than the other parties in the “Big Four,” had insisted upon harsh terms, the peace treaty did not ultimately help to settle the international disputes which had initiated World War I. On the contrary, it tended to hinder inter-European cooperation and make more fractious the underlying issues which had caused the war in the first place. The dreadful sacrifices of war and tremendous loss of life, suffered on all sides, weighed heavily not only upon the losers of the conflict, but also upon those combatants on the winning side, like Italy, whose postwar spoils seemed incommensurate with the terrible price each nation had paid in blood and material goods.

	For the populations of the defeated powers—Germany, Austria, Hungary, and Bulgaria—the respective peace treaties appeared an unfair punishment, and their governments, whether democratic as in Germany or Austria, or authoritarian, in the case of Hungary and Bulgaria, quickly resorted to violating the military and financial terms of the accords. Efforts to revise and defy the more burdensome provisions of the peace became a key element in their respective foreign policies and proved a destabilizing factor in international politics.

	The war guilt clause, its incumbent reparation payments, and the limitations on the German military were particularly onerous in the minds of most Germans, and revision of the Versailles Treaty represented one of the platforms that gave radical right wing parties in Germany, including Hitler's Nazi Party, such credibility to mainstream voters in the 1920s and early 1930s. Promises to rearm, to reclaim German territory, particularly in the East, to remilitarize the Rhineland, and to regain prominence again among the European and world powers after such a humiliating defeat and peace, stoked ultranationalist sentiment and helped average voters to overlook the more radical tenets of Nazi ideology.

	The burdensome reparations, coupled with a general inflationary period in Europe in the 1920s, caused spiraling hyperinflation of the German Reichsmark by 1923. This hyperinflationary period combined with the effects of the Great Depression (beginning in 1929) to undermine the stability of the German economy, wiping out the personal savings of the middle class and spurring massive unemployment. Such economic chaos did much to increase social unrest, destabilizing the fragile Weimar Republic.

	Finally, the efforts of the Western European powers to marginalize Germany through the Versailles Treaty undermined and isolated German democratic leaders. Particularly deleterious in connection with the harsh provisions of Versailles was the rampant conviction among many in the general population that Germany had been “stabbed in the back” by the “November criminals”—those who had helped to form the new Weimar government and broker the peace which Germans had so desperately wanted, but which ended so disastrously in Versailles. Many Germans forgot that they had applauded the fall of the Kaiser, had initially welcomed parliamentary democratic reform, and had rejoiced at the armistice. They recalled only that the German Left—Socialists, Communists and Jews, in common imagination—had surrendered German honor to an ignominious peace when no foreign armies had even set foot on German soil. 

	This Dolchstosslegende (stab-in-the-back legend) helped further to discredit German socialist and liberal circles who felt most committed to maintain Germany's fragile democratic experiment. The difficulties imposed by social and economic unrest in the wake of World War I and its onerous peace terms worked in tandem to undermine pluralistic democratic solutions in Weimar Germany and to increase public longing for more authoritarian direction, a kind of leadership which German voters ultimately and unfortunately found in Adolf Hitler and his National Socialist Party.


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Treaty_of_Versailles#Treaty
	In June 1919, the Allies declared that war would resume if the German government did not sign the treaty they had agreed to among themselves. The government headed by Philipp Scheidemann was unable to agree on a common position, and Scheidemann himself resigned rather than agree to sign the treaty. Gustav Bauer, the head of the new government, sent a telegram stating his intention to sign the treaty if certain articles were withdrawn, including Articles 227, 230 and 231. In response, the Allies issued an ultimatum stating that Germany would have to accept the treaty or face an invasion of Allied forces across the Rhine within 24 hours. On 23 June, Bauer capitulated and sent a second telegram with a confirmation that a German delegation would arrive shortly to sign the treaty. On 28 June 1919, the fifth anniversary of the assassination of Archduke Franz Ferdinand (the immediate impetus for the war), the peace treaty was signed.


http://www.history.com/this-day-in-history/keynes-predicts-economic-chaos
	At the Palace of Versailles outside Paris, Germany signs the Treaty of Versailles with the Allies, officially ending World War I. The English economist John Maynard Keynes, who had attended the peace conference but then left in protest of the treaty, was one of the most outspoken critics of the punitive agreement. In his The Economic Consequences of the Peace, published in December 1919, Keynes predicted that the stiff war reparations and other harsh terms imposed on Germany by the treaty would lead to the financial collapse of the country, which in turn would have serious economic and political repercussions on Europe and the world.

	By the fall of 1918, it was apparent to the leaders of Germany that defeat was inevitable in World War I. After four years of terrible attrition, Germany no longer had the men or resources to resist the Allies, who had been given a tremendous boost by the infusion of American manpower and supplies. In order to avert an Allied invasion of Germany, the German government contacted U.S. President Woodrow Wilson in October 1918 and asked him to arrange a general armistice. Earlier that year, Wilson had proclaimed his “Fourteen Points,” which proposed terms for a “just and stable peace” between Germany and its enemies. The Germans asked that the armistice be established along these terms, and the Allies more or less complied, assuring Germany of a fair and unselfish final peace treaty. On November 11, 1918, the armistice was signed and went into effect, and fighting in World War I came to an end.

	In January 1919, John Maynard Keynes traveled to the Paris Peace Conference as the chief representative of the British Treasury. The brilliant 35-year-old economist had previously won acclaim for his work with the Indian currency and his management of British finances during the war. In Paris, he sat on an economic council and advised British Prime Minister David Lloyd George, but the important peacemaking decisions were out of his hands, and President Wilson, Prime Minister Lloyd George, and French Prime Minister Georges Clemenceau wielded the real authority. Germany had no role in the negotiations deciding its fate, and lesser Allied powers had little responsibility in the drafting of the final treaty.

	It soon became apparent that the treaty would bear only a faint resemblance to the Fourteen Points that had been proposed by Wilson and embraced by the Germans. Wilson, a great idealist, had few negotiating skills, and he soon buckled under the pressure of Clemenceau, who hoped to punish Germany as severely as it had punished France in the Treaty of Frankfurt that ended the Franco-Prussian War in 1871. Lloyd George took the middle ground between the two men, but he backed the French plan to force Germany to pay reparations for damages inflicted on Allied civilians and their property. Since the treaty officially held Germany responsible for the outbreak of World War I (in reality it was only partially responsible), the Allies would not have to pay reparations for damages they inflicted on German civilians.

	The treaty that began to emerge was a thinly veiled Carthaginian Peace, an agreement that accomplished Clemenceau’s hope to crush France’s old rival. According to its terms, Germany was to relinquish 10 percent of its territory. It was to be disarmed, and its overseas empire taken over by the Allies. Most detrimental to Germany’s immediate future, however, was the confiscation of its foreign financial holdings and its merchant carrier fleet. The German economy, already devastated by the war, was thus further crippled, and the stiff war reparations demanded ensured that it would not soon return to its feet. A final reparations figure was not agreed upon in the treaty, but estimates placed the amount in excess of $30 billion, far beyond Germany’s capacity to pay. Germany would be subject to invasion if it fell behind on payments.

	Keynes, horrified by the terms of the emerging treaty, presented a plan to the Allied leaders in which the German government be given a substantial loan, thus allowing it to buy food and materials while beginning reparations payments immediately. Lloyd George approved the “Keynes Plan,” but President Wilson turned it down because he feared it would not receive congressional approval. In a private letter to a friend, Keynes called the idealistic American president “the greatest fraud on earth.” On June 5, 1919, Keynes wrote a note to Lloyd George informing the prime minister that he was resigning his post in protest of the impending “devastation of Europe.”


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/%C3%89tienne_Mantoux
	Étienne Mantoux (5 February 1913 – 29 April 1945) was a French economist, born in Paris. He was the son of Paul Mantoux. He is probably best known for his book The Carthaginian Peace, or the Economic Consequences of Mr. Keynes published two years after it was completed and one year after his death. In it, he sought to demonstrate that much of John Maynard Keynes' beliefs about the consequences of the Treaty of Versailles for Germany as expressed in The Economic Consequences of the Peace were wrong.

	In opposition to Keynes he held that justice demanded that Germany should have paid for the whole damage caused by World War I, and he set out to prove that many of Keynes' forecasts were not verified by subsequent events.


http://www.jstor.org/stable/10.1086/670825
	Mistakes and Myths: The Allies, Germany, and the Versailles Treaty, 1918–1921
	Sally Marks 

	For nearly forty years, historians of twentieth-century diplomacy have argued that the Versailles treat was more reasonable that is reputation suggests and that it did not of itself cause the Depression, the rise of Hitler, or World War II.


https://issforum.org/reviews/PDF/AR429.pdf
	Sally Marks.  “Mistakes and Myths: The Allies, Germany, and the Versailles Treaty, 1918–1921.”

	Reviewed by William R. Keylor, Boston University

	The Demonization of Versailles 

	Sally Marks has devoted a significant portion of her scholarly career to probing the complex details related to the peace settlement of 1919 in Europe. Her path-breaking studies of the reparation sections of the Treaty of Versailles, in particular, have shed light on an excruciatingly complex topic that had long suffered from gross misrepresentation, exaggeration, and outright falsification.


http://www.jstor.org/stable/10.1086/670825
	Mistakes and Myths: The Allies, Germany, and the Versailles Treaty, 1918–1921
	Sally Marks

	...The distorted view of The Economic Consequences of the Peace and J. M. Keyne's other works still dominates both the Anglo-American historical profession and the English-speaking educated public

	...As Steiner observed, the German view of the treaty has prevailed, especially among nonexperts in the English-speaking world, thanks to prolonged, intense Anglo-German propaganda, including Keyne's brilliant but warped polemic. Among other things, World War I ushered in the age of propaganda, owing to the popular interest in the war and the postwar, and the views of the treaty have been heavily propaganda-driven.

	...Thanks to one of the world's most successful and longest-lasting propaganda efforts, the answer was simply that the treaty was unfair.

	...But this time the defeated power was not humiliated; instead, it was able to delude itself about the war's outcome.

	[pg 25]

	Keynes was an added factor, intensifying British revisionism and hostility to treaty enforcement. The Economic Consequences of Peace, published in December 1919, was one of history's most brilliant and influential polemics, partly because few educated people then knew economics and, aware of their ignorance, accepted Keynes's distortions and omissions. While Keynes, who rarely admitted error, came to regret his book, long discredited by scholars, it lives on in new editions, academic analyses, and assumptions of less profound literature, a propaganda triumph second only to the Anglo-Germain campaign against the treaty.

	...On his relationship with Carl Melchior, see Keynes, Two Memoirs


http://www.zerohedge.com/news/2013-05-04/niall-ferguson-%E2%80%93-great-degeneration?page=2
	Keynes was a homosexual and had no intention of having children. We are NOT dead in the long run…our children are our progeny. It is the economic ideals of Keynes that have gotten us into the problems of today.


http://www.thecrimson.com/article/2013/5/7/Ferguson-Apology-Keynes/
	An Open Letter to the Harvard Community

	By Niall Ferguson

	Not for one moment did I mean to suggest that Keynesian economics as a body of thought was simply a function of Keynes’ sexuality. But...  Keynes’ sexual orientation did have historical significance. The strong attraction he felt for the German banker Carl Melchior undoubtedly played a part in shaping Keynes’ views on the Treaty of Versailles and its aftermath.	


http://www.newsweek.com/decline-putins-russia-its-way-global-irrelevance-65847
	In Decline, Putin's Russia Is On Its Way to Global Irrelevance

	By Niall Ferguson 


https://www.bloomberg.com/news/articles/2016-01-21/trump-fear-stalks-davos-as-elite-pray-for-spring-reality-check
	“If you bother to read some of the serious analysis of Trump’s support, you realize that it’s a very fragile thing and highly unlikely to deliver what he needs in the crucial first phase of the primaries,” said Niall Ferguson, Laurence A. Tisch professor of history at Harvard University. “By the time we get to March-April, it’s all over. I think there’s going to be a wonderful catharsis, I’m really looking forward to it: Trump’s humiliation. Bring it on.”


https://www.bostonglobe.com/opinion/2016/05/08/keep-calm-constitution-will-constrain-trump/vb06y2Q2O5khvkZKdHl7pI/story.html
	Keep calm — the Constitution will constrain Trump

	By Niall Ferguson


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Niall_Ferguson


http://thepenguinpress.com/book/kissinger-volume-i-the-idealist-1923-1968/


http://www.newcriterion.com/articles.cfm/Guilt-trip--Versailles--avant-garde---kitsch-7942
	Guilt trip: Versailles, avant-garde & kitsch

	by Roger Kimball

	John Maynard Keynes’s revisionist history of World War I has had enduring—and harmful—consequences.

	Think about it. The one thing that everyone knows about the Treaty of Versailles is that, because of the overly harsh terms the Allies imposed upon Germany, it led directly to Hitler and World War II. An article in The Economist in 1999 epitomized this bit of folklore: The “final crime” of the Great War, the article proclaimed, was the Treaty of Versailles, which “would ensure a second world war.”

	As usual, Mark Twain came closer to the truth. It’s not so much the things you don’t know that get you into trouble, Twain wrote, as the things you do know that ain’t so.

	In fact, as the historian Andrew Roberts argues in his History of the English-Speaking Peoples Since 1900, there are good reasons for believing that the Treaty of Versailles ought to have been a good deal harsher than it was.

	...In another work, Keynes famously wrote that “Practical men, who believe themselves to be quite exempt from any intellectual influence, are usually the slaves of some defunct economist.” Pondering what he wrote about the Treaty of Versailles, I believe I begin to understand what Baron Keynes meant. Perhaps this is the place to note how close Keynes was to the German parties of the Treaty. As Niall Ferguson points out in The Pity of War, Keynes was deeply attached to Carl Melchior, Max Warburg’s right-hand man at the Hamburg Bank of M. M. Warburg & Co. He read parts of a draft of Economic Consequences to Melchior and Warburg, and apparently profited from their response. “Thanks to Dr. Melchior’s clear explanation,” the German Foreign Office official Kurt von Lersner recalled, “Herr Keynes . . . is trying to find common ground with us.” How nice. Posterity has not, Ferguson notes, appreciated “the extent to which Keynes was manipulated by his German friends” or “the extent to which he erred in his analysis of the consequences of the peace.”


https://pjmedia.com/columnist/roger-kimball/


https://pjmedia.com/rogerkimball/2014/03/21/putin-speaks/
	Putin speaks!

	By Roger Kimball

	Not everyone has seen Valdimir's Putin's latest Op-Ed. It think it's important, and wanted to share it with readers now.


https://pjmedia.com/rogerkimball/2013/9/14/putins-horrifying-mirror/
	Putin's Horrifying Mirror

	By Roger Kimball

	What was it about Vladimir Putin’s extraordinary op-ed in The New York Times last week that so infuriated the Washington establishment? Oh, how they hated it!  ...And the great Nowhere Man, Col. Gaddafi’s good buddy, the Madcap Maverick himself, John McCain said that the op-ed was “an insult to the intelligence of every American.”


https://pjmedia.com/rogerkimball/2017/03/08/when-wiretaps-dont-matter/
	The Democrats' 'Red Scare' Narrative Is Over

	By Roger Kimball


https://pjmedia.com/rogerkimball/2017/01/19/is-the-left-a-threat/
	Is the War Against Trump a Sideshow, or a Menace?

	By Roger Kimball


https://twitter.com/rogerkimball/status/850690363497033728
	Roger Kimball

	How’s that “Trump is the puppet of Putin” narrative faring?


https://networks.h-net.org/node/28443/reviews/30113/marks-carley-1939-alliance-never-was-and-coming-world-war-ii
	Marks on Carley, '1939: The Alliance That Never Was and the Coming of World War II'
	Author: Michael Jabara Carley
	Reviewer: Sally Marks

	The Russian alliance contributed both to keeping a comparatively weakening France in the ranks of the great powers before 1914 and to French survival in the first years of the Great War. Afterwards a shattered France needed the Russian tie more than ever, but ideological factors rendered that politically impossible whereas the eastern alliances with smaller states proved an unsatisfactory substitute, potentially more liabilities than assets. Thus the Nazi challenge impelled Paris to a new Russian pact in 1935, but mutual distrust rendered it still-born. France's reluctant ally, Britain, had even more strained relations with the Soviet Union. Hostility to a historic rival was both traditional and recent, broken only by a decade of detente from 1907 to 1917; ideology and incidents aggravated the interwar relationship. In his study of the 1939 negotiations among these three powers, Michael Carley asks whether Britain and France really sought to put aside existing distrust and achieve alliance with the Soviet Union against the greatest danger, Nazi Germany.

	...Carley is on firmer ground when he demonstrates, as he does conclusively, the acute Anglo-French distrust of Soviet Russia.

	Carley also stresses that Russian distrust of Britain and France was both acute and justified, though reinforced by historic enmity to Britain and chronic suspicion of capitalist motives. One must ask, however, whether western distrust of the Soviet Union was equally justified and examine the underlying motives of Russian policy insofar as one can.

	...it is clear, as Carley says, that Russia aimed to delay war as long as possible.

	...Carley is right that the events he describes were part of the early Cold War, and his approach is a refreshing antidote to Cold War rhetoric assuming that all double-dealing lay on one side. A thorough exposition of the Russian viewpoint is immensely valuable, and Carley has made a major contribution to our understanding of Litvinov's thinking. Providing the contents of so many Soviet documents to those who do not read Russian is an important service to Clio's practitioners, for it offers a wealth of valuable and revealing detail. Undoubtedly this book will figure prominently in future debates about the origins of World War II.


https://networks.h-net.org/node/28443/reviews/30113/marks-carley-1939-alliance-never-was-and-coming-world-war-ii
	Carley displays fairly consistent sympathy for the Russian diplomatic point of view, though he never condones Stalinist brutality, shows much enthusiasm for Molotov, or fully excuses Russian policy. When there is a clash of evidence, he tends to accept the Russian version.


http://www.zerohedge.com/news/2016-10-10/why-do-they-hate-us-so-one-western-scholars-reply-worried-russian-student?page=2
	Submitted by Michael Jabara Carley via Strategic-Culture.org,

	I gave a lecture in Moscow during the spring about western-Soviet relations over the last century. With the partial exception of World War II, it is a narrative of unrelenting hostility. After I had finished, a student asked, «why do they hate us so?» The answer is not complicated. You cannot cross «da man» in the United States, that is, the powerful, wealthy US «deep state», which sets the rules for everyone else and enforces its worldwide hegemony against disobedient states and leaders.


http://www.strategic-culture.org/news/2016/11/15/can-trump-drain-the-swamp.html
	Can Trump ‘Drain the Swamp’?

	Michael Jabara Carley

 	«happy white liberals» who also support US world domination and aggression. Why shucks, backing fascists in the Ukraine and jihadists in Syria is as American as apple pie.

	In the New World Order (NWO) of neoliberalism and bipartisan US hegemonism, it is the 1%, which governs in the United States. 


http://www.strategic-culture.org/news/2017/01/09/syria-and-united-states-we-now-know.html
	Syria and the United States: We Now Know

	Michael Jabara Carley

	Somehow, it has not sunk into the general consciousness of US public opinion that the Obama administration has supported or is supporting directly or indirectly, overtly or covertly, the forces of Al Qaeda and the Islamic State in Syria (ISIL, ISIS or Daesh) in order to overthrow the government of President Bashar al Assad in Damascus. This should not be surprising because most Americans do not believe that the US government could be on the wrong side of any conflict. The Mainstream Media (MSM), both print and broadcast, serve as purveyors of this general idea. Call it «fake news» or propaganda, it works well on US public opinion.


http://www.strategic-culture.org/news/2017/04/12/will-big-lies-about-syria-chemical-weapons-spark-new-us-war.html
	Will ‘Big Lies’ About Syria’s Chemical Weapons Spark a New US War?

	Michael Jabara Carley

	The only entities using chemical weapons, sometimes as false flag operations, were and are the foreign backed Jihadist mercenaries operating in Syria.

	Nevertheless, Jihadist use of chemical weapons has been largely ignored, or the responsibility for using them, in an Orwellian turnabout, has been foisted upon the Syrian government in Damascus. The issue keeps coming up, and is used by the United States and its European and regional vassals as an implicit threat or means of pressure against the Damascus government. In fact, according to Seymour Hersh, the muckraking American journalist, the US State Department and the CIA facilitated, or were complicit in the shipping of chemical weapons from Libya to Syria through Turkey for the use of their Salafist allies.


http://www.strategic-culture.org/news/2016/12/11/fake-news-who-really-making-war-truth.html
	‘Fake News’: Who is Really Making the War on Truth?

	Michael Jabara Carley

	The other day David Ignatius, a columnist at the Washington Post, declared sententiously that «truth is losing». He meant of course «the truth» according to the US government. Ignatius recently interviewed Richard Stengel, a State Department official responsible for «public diplomacy», someone who had previously worked for Time magazine, a stellar source of «truth» and the «American way». Things are getting tough, Stengel said. We’ve entered «a ‘post-truth’ world, where the facts are sometimes overwhelmed by propaganda from Russia and the Islamic State». You can see right away where this conversation is headed. And how outrageous to compare Russia and the IS, when the original purveyors of Salafi-Jihadism are located in Washington, DC.


http://www.strategic-culture.org/news/2017/03/16/will-chrystya-freeland-finally-ruin-canadian-russian-relations.html
	Will Chrystia Freeland Finally Ruin Canadian-Russian Relations?

	Michael Jabara Carley

	On 10 January 2017 Canadian Prime Minister Justin Trudeau fired his minister of external affairs, Stéphane Dion, and replaced him with Chrystia Freeland, who was then minister of international trade. This cabinet shuffle might not have gotten much public notice except that Dion is a distinguished parliamentarian, former leader of the party and leader of the opposition, and a former key minister in the Liberal government of Jean Chrétien. Freeland, on the other hand, is a well-known Ukrainian ultra-nationalist and self-declared Russophobe and hater of Russian President Vladimir Putin.


https://networks.h-net.org/node/28443/discussions/52368/h-diplo-roundtable-silent-conflict-hidden-history-early-soviet
	Michael Jabara Carley.  Silent Conflict.  A Hidden History of Early Soviet-Western Relations
	
	Introduction by William Keylor, Boston University

	Last summer, as President Vladimir Putin annexed the Crimea (with its Russian-speaking majority) and began to apply pressure on Ukraine (with its Russian-speaking minority), I was completing my reading of Michael Carley’s book Silent Conflict in preparation for the H-Diplo roundtable on his book that I was asked to introduce. Foreign affairs specialists in the West have debated the true motivations of the current Russian strongman for undertaking this daring set of foreign policies. Is he a pragmatic realist defending his country’s vital national interests against a U.S.-backed European Union intent on luring Ukraine into the West’s orbit at Russia’s expense with the siren song of market capitalism and political democracy?  Or is he a Russophile ideologue driven by a messianic belief in the mission of expanding his country’s borders as far westward as possible?


https://www.usnews.com/news/blogs/dotmil/2012/06/18/putin-turns-to-gunboat-diplomacy-in-syria
	Russian President Vladimir Putin is increasingly worried about the fall of Assad, Russia's longtime and last remaining ally in the Middle East, experts say.

	But would Putin actually order whatever number of troops are aboard the assault ships to engage in fighting against rebel forces?

	"This is just a signal in the form of old-style gunboat diplomacy," says Boston University international relations professor William Keylor. "This is just muscle flexing."

	"This is two ships. It's not an aircraft carrier strike group," says Keylor. "That kind of large deployment would be cause for alarm."


http://www.independent.co.uk/news/world/middle-east/syria-war-aleppo-latest-putin-assad-launch-new-military-campaign-a7420431.html
	Russia deploys new aircraft carrier as new Syria offensive begins


https://networks.h-net.org/node/28443/discussions/52368/h-diplo-roundtable-silent-conflict-hidden-history-early-soviet
	Michael Jabara Carley.  Silent Conflict.  A Hidden History of Early Soviet-Western Relations
	
	Introduction by William Keylor, Boston University

	Carley now returns to the 1920s to apply his revisionist perspective to the period before there was a Hitler to deal with. The topic of Soviet foreign policy in the 1920s has received much less scholarly attention than has the 1930s and the post-World War II period. Carley has done the profession a great service by his dogged search for archives in the unwelcoming labyrinth of the unpublished Soviet records.


https://books.google.com/books?id=l5XddxYfdl4C&pg=PA256
	1939: The Alliance That Never Was and the Coming of World War II

	By Micheal Jabara Carley

	The British Conservative government hoped to avoid war, not so much by deterrence as by appeasement. Of course, appeasement did not have, by certain British lights anyway, the craven, negative connotations we now associate with the world; it meant a reasonable effort to meet Adolf Hitler's "legitimate" grievances for revision of the Versailles treaty which had settled the First World War.


https://he.palgrave.com/page/detail/the-illusion-of-peace-sally-marks/?sf1=barcode&st1=9780333985892
	Sally Marks provides a compelling analysis of European diplomacy between the First World War and Hitler's advent... In this new edition Marks also argues that the Allied failure to bring defeat home to the German people in 1918-19 generated a resentment which contributed to interwar instability and Hitler's rise.


http://www.history.com/this-day-in-history/germans-prepare-to-protest-versailles-treaty-terms
	Presented with the treaty on May 7, 1919, the German delegation was given two weeks to examine the terms and submit their official comments in writing. The Germans, who had put great faith in U.S. President Woodrow Wilson’s notion of a so-called peace without victory and had pointed to his famous Fourteen Points as the basis upon which they sought peace in November 1918, were greatly angered and disillusioned by the treaty. As Ulrich von Brockdorff-Rantzau, Germany’s foreign minister, put it: This fat volume was quite unnecessary. They could have expressed the whole thing more simply in one clause—Germany renounces its existence.

	...The Versailles Treaty was signed on June 28, 1919. Meanwhile, opposition to the treaty and its Article 231, seen as a symbol of the injustice and harshness of the whole document, festered within Germany. As the years passed, full-blown hatred slowly settled into a smoldering resentment of the treaty and its authors, a resentment that would, two decades later, be counted—to an arguable extent—among the causes of the Second World War.


http://www.bbc.co.uk/bitesize/higher/history/nationalism/hitler/revision/2/
	The Nazi party policies were deliberately vague so they might appeal to as many people as possible. It was not unusual to find people of both right and moderate-left wing politics joining the Nazis because they agreed with one or more of their policies.

	* The Nazis were violently opposed to Communism. The Communists believed all private ownership of land and assets was theft. This led many landowners and businessmen to support the Nazis.
	* Their social policies, such as better pensions and reducing unemployment, appealed to the common man and also many traditional socialists.
	* The Nazis proclaimed that they would abolish the Treaty of Versailles, that they felt unfairly punished Germany. This was a popular policy for many Germans.
	* After losing territories at Versailles, the Nazis wanted Lebensraum (living space) for their surplus population. Bluntly, they wanted more land.

	...Throughout the 1920's good organisation, effective propaganda and rallies spread the popularity of the party all over Germany.


https://edsitement.neh.gov/sites/edsitement.neh.gov/files/worksheets/Hitlerspeech.pdf
	Speech on the Treaty of Versailles (April 17, 1923)
	
	Adolf Hitler

	With the armistice begins the humiliation of Germany.  If the Republic on the day of its foundation had appealed to the country: Germans, stand together!  Up and resist the foe!  The Fatherland, the Republic expects of you that you fight to your last breath, then millions who are now enemies of the Republic would be fanatical Republicans.  Today they are the foes of the Republic not because it is a Republic but because this Republic was founded at the moment when Germany was humiliated, because it so discredited the new flag that men's eyes must turn regretfully toward the old flag.

	So long as this Treaty stands there can be no resurrection of the German people; no social reform of any kind is possible!


https://books.google.com/books?id=GeOR5LbOQwsC&pg=PA275
	Markov II displayed himself as a forceful leader. He denounced the Treaty of Versailles in a fiery speech, claiming that it had "betrayed and sold Russia" He concluded to loud applause: "Russia does not recognize the Treaty of Versailles. We must give back to the Russian people what the Russian Tsars accumulated over the centuries." The Congress members decided to create a governing body, the Supreme Monarchical Council, which was to be located in Berlin under Markov II's leadership.


http://www.sscnet.ucla.edu/soc/groups/scr/kellogg.pdf
	The most important leaders of the far-right in Russian politics in the years before the First World War were Dubrovin, Nicholas Markov, known as Markov II, and Vladimir Purishkevich, who founded a mystically-inclined successor organization to the Union of the Russian People in 1908, the Union of the Archangel Michael. Cohn asserts that the members of the Union of the Russian People and their successors “were in fact the true precursors of the Nazis” since they believed that Jews formed a capitalist-revolutionary conspiracy aimed at world dictatorship and they advocated extreme means of solving the “Jewish question,” such as deportation or even extermination. Markov II predicted in a 1911 speech in the Duma, or parliament, “All the Yids, down to the very last, will be killed.’”


http://bookfi.net/dl/548070/5d8658
	The significance of substantial White émigré influences on Hitler’s Weltanschauung has become more apparent since Brigitte Hamann convincingly argued in her 1996 work, Hitlers Wien: Lehrjahre eines Diktators (Hitler’s Vienna: Apprentice Years of a Dictator), that Hitler was not yet anti-Semitic during his “hunger years” in Vienna from 1908 to 1913. He even defended the Jews in intense political arguments with those who denounced them. Hamann’s book refutes the earlier historical consensus which had contended that Hitler developed an acutely anti-Semitic world-view during his time in Vienna.

	Further indications of the relatively late development of Hitler’s far right political ideas exist. Hitler’s correspondence and private writings from World War I (1914–1918) lack anti-Semitic passages.  Hitler’s comrades during World War I did not detect anti-Semitic views among his beliefs.  Moreover, according to Aide-de-Camp Hans Mend, Hitler’s immediate commanding officer on the Western Front in World War I, Hitler occa- sionally praised Jews, and he exhibited socialist leanings. He often held “rabble-rousing speeches” in which he called himself a representative of the “class-conscious proletariat.”  Hitler only began to crystallize his virulent anti-Bolshevik, anti-Semitic Weltanschauung in Munich in late 1919 in the context of intercultural collaboration between alienated völkisch Germans and radical White émigrés.


https://www.cia.gov/library/readingroom/docs/CIA-RDP80B01676R003600070001-7.pdf
	It is far from my intention to minimize Hitler's responsibility for the Second World War or to make light of the crimes of which he and his confederates were guilty. Nevertheless, now that the passions inflamed by war have subsided, cooler and fairer judgements may be heard. It is no longer seriously disputed that the Treaty of Versailles was unjust. Eminent statesmen of that time, such as General Smuts, had profound misgivings about signing it, because they were convinced that it raised more problems than it settled, and that it carried the seeds of another war. It was in fact the indefensible defects of the Treaty that gave Hitler the opportunity to wrest from the German people the absolute power that he needed to fulfil his nefarious aims and policies.

	The unworkable and misleading requirement, of unanimity, cunningly inserted into the Covenant of the League of Nations - just as a like requirement was later inserted in the Charter of the United Nations Organization — effectually prevented any peaceful change. So the Peace Treaties could not be revised and the situation steadily deteriorated until it became utterly intolerable. All the Western Powers now acknowledge that the Paris Peace Treaties were responsible for the rise of bitter discord and intransigent nationalism. The late Mr. Foster Dulles, Who, as a young diplomatist, had been present at Versailles in 1919, deplored "the unfortunate consequences" of these treaties, and expressly warned against the folly of again imposing upon Germany the burden of an unworkable peace. In May, 1959, at the Geneva Conference, Mr. Christian Herter, too, mentioned "the awful results of the Treaty of Versailles" and absolutely rejected the Russian peace plan for Germany, saying: "The Soviet proposal harbours the seeds of future discord and conflict." Ever since 1919, few inhabitants of the Danubian Valley have failed to understand that the political and economic arrangements devised in 1919 and 1920 were untenable; but; Paris, London, and Washington would have none of it.


https://collab.itc.virginia.edu/access/content/group/bf18c8cb-75a1-4dc1-8d3e-109c2cea5178/schuker.1919PeaceSettlement.pdf
	Twenty years ago Sally Marks famously complained about the tendency of American diplomatic historians to look exclusively at American sources and to present “the world according to Washington.”


http://www.h-net.org/reviews/showrev.php?id=7870
	Margaret MacMillan. Paris 1919: Six Months That Changed the World.

	Reviewed by Sally Marks (Independent Scholar)

	MacMillan punctures a number of long-standing myths about the Versailles treaty with Germany. She declares firmly that a real defeat was not brought home to the German people, that the power of the peacemakers was limited, that they were not responsible for the fragmentation of Europe which predated their labors, and that the blockade did not starve Germany. More importantly, neither the Versailles treaty nor France was vindictive, reparations were not crushing, the treaty was not enforced with any consistency, and it did not seriously restrict German power, for Germany (where East Prussia had been separated from other portions for most of its history) had an improved strategic position under it. Most especially, while acknowledging that the peacemakers made mistakes, particularly outside Europe, she rightly asserts that the Versailles treaty was not primarily responsible for either the next twenty years or for World War II. These views have been discussed for a generation in the scholarly literature. Yet the old propaganda-driven myths persist in popular literature, the press, and the minds of educated non-experts. In her determined effort to slay these dragons, MacMillan has done a great service.	

	...Yet the bibliography and footnotes attest to MacMillan's wide reading and careful combing of recent scholarship, especially The Treaty of Versailles: A Reassessment after 75 Years. The bibliography precedes the footnotes which for some reason is extremely unhandy... This is not entirely satisfactory. An attempt to find the origin of an erroneous statement on Russia's 1918 reparations obligation to Germany in the middle of a paragraph on German financial questions (p. 185, n. 14) produced three perfectly good citations on Germany but nothing on Russia.


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Talk%3AWorld_War_I_reparations
	This article seems to have been the target of POV pushing. Note especially these two sets of edits: [1], [2].

    The first enlarged the article from 17,243 bytes to 37,476 bytes and, some minor copyediting aside, the enlargement is almost exclusively due to stating over and over again that the Germans could have paid the reparations and did not do so out of political calculations.

	...The POV pushing can also be learned from the sources used: John Maynard Keynes, eminent economist and financial representative for England in Versailles is used for 3 sentences. Meanwhile Sally Marks (who is that?) is used as a source a whooping 43(!) times, for a total of several paragraphs. The unknown french economist Étienne Mantoux is also cited at length to disprove Keynes calculations (a ridiculous excercise, since data is taken from years when the original reparations had already been reduced).


http://www.jstor.org/stable/10.1086/670825
	Mistakes and Myths: The Allies, Germany, and the Versailles Treaty, 1918–1921
	Sally Marks [pg 26]

	Germany's constant revisionism operated in tandem with that of Britain, especially as frequent Anglo-French division rendered success possible. A German scholar noted that Germany suffered the "widespread illusion" that it could escape the consequences of the treaty by "passive noncompliance" As the United States withdrew from Europe and Britain tried to do so, Berlin recalled that it had not been defeated by continental powers and saw possibilities, spurring it to more revisionism. Some moves were costly, but Germany had funds for what it wanted. Myth making and propaganda continued until Russia's reluctant 1914 defensive mobilization became seen as a cause of the war

	...However, it is time--and past time--to abandon old myths and simplistic propaganda-driven explanations and to address instead the inherent problems and the real reasons why this cornerstone of the interwar era has for so long attracted torrents of criticism despite the contrary opinion of those who know it best.


...


https://books.google.com/books?id=X2eTBtFWQdUC&pg=PA30
	The Russian emigration was a seedbed of conspiracies and clandestine figures, a vast shadowland of grand ambitions and shabby realities. All this was so because of past-war unsettlement, because of the circumstances of the exile and an unrelenting commitment to counterrevolution, and because in a world awash with opportunities from gunrunning to selling information to tracking down spies, ex-czarist officers on-the-make were available and where most often the people to turn to. Their political adventurism fit into the wider pattern of intrusiveness by which the great events of the period pressed in on people and became in inescapable presence or fact of their lives. For White Russians who emerged out of war and revolution this intrusiveness was simply a norm; but it showed up as well in the way their politics were absorbed into the politics of others--Soviet politics, German politics, Spanish politics, Japanese politics--that is, into the greater power struggles of their day. Likewise White Russians revealed the flux of the period in their desire to reverse historical change but also in the range of possibilities open to individuals within their milieu. Before the war the riddle was, who worked for the Okhrana and who did not. A similar question was compounded by combinations that took one to Sofia, Burgos, Tokyo, and Berlin.


https://www.gwern.net/docs/terrorism/1989-andrew.pdf
	The KGB also penetrated and subverted the Paris headquarters of the remnants of the White Armies that had been defeated in the Civil War. The climax of that penetration was the kidnap and assassination of two successive heads of the White Guards, General Aleksandr Kutyepov in 1930 and General Yevgeny Miller in 1937. Emigre Trotskyists were penetrated, undermined, and their leaders assassinated in almost identical fashion. The chief aide of Trotsky's son, Lev Sedov, the main Trotskyist organiser in Western Europe, was the KGB agent, Mark Zborowski. Sedov was liquidated in 1938, followed by several other leading Trotskyists and finally by the great heretic himself in Mexico in 1940.

	By the 1930s, however, the most important targets of KGB penetration operations were Western governments and official bureaucracies. 


https://www.cia.gov/library/center-for-the-study-of-intelligence/csi-publications/books-and-monographs/okhrana-the-paris-operations-of-the-russian-imperial-police/5474-1.html
	Harting's case officer was Pyotr Rachkovsky, probably the ablest head of the Okhrana's Foreign Bureau. Rachkovsky was a pioneer. He refined the art of what we today call active measures or perceptions management techniques. 	

	...According to one authority, Rachkovsky was a "born intriguer" who "delighted" in forging documents. He allegedly was among those responsible for the anti-Semitic Protocols of the Elders of Zion, perhaps the most infamous political forgery of the 20th century. Rachkovsky's tactic of exploiting anti-Semitism for political purposes was used repeatedly during the Soviet era--for example, in Hungary in 1956, in Czechoslovakia in 1968, and in Poland in the 1980s. Such scapegoating also was evident in the so-called "Doctors Plot" in the early 1950s, when a group of Jewish doctors was accused of plotting to kill Stalin and other Soviet leaders.


http://www.sscnet.ucla.edu/soc/groups/scr/kellogg.pdf
	The greatest piece of “evidence”  that right-wing Russian elements used to support their assertions of a Jewish world-conspiracy came in the form of a vitriolic tract best known as The Protocols of the Elders of Zion. ...The Protocols were most likely fabricated in 1897 or 1898 in Paris.  The Protocols critique liberalism, claiming that it is a tool for the Jews to gain world-domination by fomenting discontent and revolt so that they can use the ensuing chaos to establish a Jewish despot to rule over the world.

	...It is important to note that the Protocols were not widely distributed in pre-Revolutionary Russian society, even in reactionary circles. They were not "discovered" until after the outbreak of the Bolshevik Revolution, after which they were widely distributed among the "White" forces during the Russian Civil War.


http://bookfi.net/dl/548070/5d8658
	Hausen is best known not for publicizing the Zunder Document, but for publishing The Protocols of the Elders of Zion. He printed the Protocols for the first time in German in 1919.

	...Hausen received information on Nilus’ personality and on the provenance of the Protocols from an intelligence agency in Berlin under General Kurlov, who had earlier served as the head of the Imperial Russian Okhrana. He had managed to be expelled...before resurfacing in Berlin and establishing his intelligence organization.

	...In April 1920, Kommissarov began working for the intelligence agency that his old protector in the Tsarist Secret Police, General Kurlov, had recently established in Berlin to provide anti-Bolshevik information to White émigrés in Germany. Despite the mistrust that he had engendered among rightist circles in the past, Kommissarov used his considerable intellectual gifts and social adroitness to find his way quickly into high society wherever he went. He began circulating in right-wing monarchical circles in Munich. He worked especially diligently to gain General Ludendorff’s favor. At the same time, however, he initiated contact with Bolshevik representatives in Germany and provided them with information on anti-Soviet activities in Germany.

	...Kommissarov, a prominent member of the Saint Petersburg Okhrana, provided the Union with additional support. ...After the outbreak of socialist revolution in the Russian Empire in 1905, he established a clandestine printing press in the basement of Okhrana headquarters. He used this press to print anti-Semitic leaflets calling for pogroms. He lost his position because of his unauthorized dissemination of pogrom literature, but his writings galvanized Black Hundred violence against Jews and socialist revolutionaries.

	...These fearsome groups gave their name to the Russian far right from 1905 to 1917. Black Hundreds carried out anti-revolutionary pogroms in October 1905 in which they killed a total of 1,622 people, 711 of whom were Jews. The pogroms of October 1905 proved the worst manifestation of Black Hundred violence.  Despite the Union’s use of illegal Black Hundred squads to terrorize and assassinate Jewish and socialist opponents, Imperial authorities supported the Union. Piotr Rachkovskii, the head of the Okhrana (Tsarist Secret Police) abroad, supported the Union’s activities. He even acted as Union leader Dubrovin’s advisor.  Representatives of the Union received even greater official recognition when they met with Tsar Nikolai Romanov II in December 1905. The Tsar assured them: “I am counting on you.”

	...Kommissarov proved a most colorful adventurer who underwent many permutations in his career of intrigue and deceit. He ultimately helped to establish Aufbau, the Munich-based völkisch German/White émigré organization that greatly influenced the National Socialist movement, in 1920 as a double agent before he openly joined the Soviet cause. 


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Aufbau_Vereinigung
	The Aufbau Vereinigung (Reconstruction Organisation) was a Munich-based counterrevolutionary conspiratorial group formed in the aftermath of the German occupation of the Ukraine in 1918 and of the Latvian Intervention of 1919. It brought together White Russian émigrés and early German National Socialists who aimed to overthrow the governments of Germany and the Soviet Union, replacing them with authoritarian régimes of the far right. The group was originally known as Die Bruecke (The Bridge). Aufbau was also the name of a periodical it brought out.

	According to Michael Kellogg, the Aufbau Vereinigung was a vital influence on the development of Nazi ideology in the years before the Beer Hall Putsch of 1923 as well as financing NSDAP with, for example, funds from Henry Ford. It gave Hitler the idea of a vast Jewish conspiracy, involving a close alliance between international finance and Bolshevism and threatening disaster for mankind. Recent research on Hitler's early years in Vienna (1905-1913) appears to have shown that his antisemitism was at that time far less developed than it became under the new influences.

	...After the death of Scheubner-Richter in the putsch, Aufbau rapidly declined, and notions of Lebensraum and Slavic inferiority, naturally unpopular with the Russians, gained a stronger hold on the Nazi movement.

	The long-term influence of Aufbau has been traced in the implementation of the final solution and in Hitler's disastrous decision to divert troops away from Moscow towards the Ukraine in 1941.

	Prominent members of Aufbau included:
	- Max Erwin von Scheubner-Richter (a Baltic German from the Russian Empire)
	- Alfred Rosenberg (a Baltic German from the Russian Empire)
	- Fyodor Vinberg (Russian officer)
	- Piotr Shabelsky-Bork (Russian officer)
	- General Vasili Biskupsky (Russian officer)
	- Erich Ludendorff


http://bookfi.net/dl/548070/5d8658
	...One of Kurlov’s collaborators, Lieutenant Iurii Kartsov, also provided Hausen with information on Nilus. While Aufbau’s leading personality Max von Scheubner-Richter later praised him as one of many fine “Russian patriots,” Kartsov had a reputation as an “utterly undependable” person. He possessed significant connections in Berlin through his work for the German intelligence agency in the Ukraine in 1918. He had dealings with Vinberg, Shabelskii-Bork, and Taboritskii, who were close to Hausen.

	...Scheubner-Richter also introduced Hitler to General Ludendorff in the framework of Aufbau, thereby setting in motion a political alliance that culminated in the calamitous November 1923 Hitler/Ludendorff Putsch.

	...First Secretary Scheubner-Richter and Vice President Biskupskii de facto led Aufbau. Hitler collaborated closely with Aufbau from 1920 to 1923. At least four White emigre Aufbau members also belonged to the National Socialist Party: Scheubner-Richter, Deputy Director Arno Schickedanz, who had fought in the Latvian Intervention, and two close collaborators with Hitler's mentor Eckart, Otto von Kursell and Rosenberg. 


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Alfred_Rosenberg
	Rosenberg was born on 12 January 1893 in Reval in the Russian Empire – today known as Tallinn, the capital of modern Estonia – to a family of Baltic Germans. His father, Waldemar Wilhelm Rosenberg, was a wealthy merchant from Latvia, and his mother, Elfriede (née Siré), was from Estonia.

	...Following the invasion of the USSR, Rosenberg was appointed head of the Reich Ministry for the Occupied Eastern Territories (Reichsministerium für die besetzten Ostgebiete). Alfred Meyer served as his deputy and represented him at the Wannsee Conference. Another official of the Ministry, Georg Leibbrandt, also attended the conference, at Rosenberg's request.

	Rosenberg had presented Hitler with his plan for the organization of the conquered Eastern territories, suggesting the establishment of new administrative districts, to replace the previously Soviet-controlled territories with new Reichskommissariats.

	...Although Rosenberg regarded all the Soviet peoples as subhumans for their communist beliefs, such suggestions were intended to encourage certain non-Russian nationalism and to promote German interests for the benefit of future Aryan generations, in accord with geopolitical "Lebensraum im Osten" plans. They would provide a buffer against Soviet expansion in preparation for the total eradication of Communism and Bolshevism by decisive pre-emptive military action.

	Following these plans, when Wehrmacht forces invaded Soviet-controlled territory, they immediately implemented the first of the proposed Reichskommissariats of Ostland and Ukraine


http://bookfi.net/dl/548070/5d8658
	Rosenberg held high posts in the Third Reich, such as leader of the National Socialist Foreign Policy Office along with his colleague Schickedanz and State Minister for the Occupied Eastern Territories. Hitler and Rosenberg worked to detach the Ukraine from the Soviet Union in collaboration with Poltavets-Ostranitsa. During World War II, Hitler’s desire to gain the Ukraine for Germany in the tradition of Aufbau led him to divert strong formations of the German Army southwards away from Moscow in 1941, thereby granting the Red Army a valuable respite. 


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Richard_Sorge
	Richard Sorge (October 4, 1895 – November 7, 1944) was a Soviet military intelligence officer, active before and during World War II, working as an undercover German journalist in both Nazi Germany and the Empire of Japan.

	...Sorge supplied Soviet intelligence with information about the Anti-Comintern Pact and the German-Japanese Pact. In 1941, through his Embassy contacts, he learned of Operation Barbarossa, the imminent Axis invasion of the USSR, and even the approximate date. Moscow received the report, but ultimately Joseph Stalin and other top leaders ignored Sorge's warnings, as well as those of other sources.


https://www.cia.gov/library/center-for-the-study-of-intelligence/kent-csi/vol9no4/html/v09i4a09p_0001.htm
	Richard Sorge has been surfaced in the Soviet Union by means of a series of newspaper articles and popular books. ...Sorge is presented as a paragon of virtue; his weakness for alcohol and women is ignored.

	...Although Moscow has for some reason suppressed Gorev's account, the glorification campaign has continued unabated since late 1964. Persons who knew Sorge even slightly have given interviews for publication.

	...It is clear that the Soviet authorities wish to present Sorge as a popular hero but have no desire at this time to publish an accurate history of his intelligence operation.


http://www.thechristiansolution.com/doc2014/605_RichardSorge.html
	World's Greatest Spy

	"Richard Sorge was the best spy of all time."


http://www.thechristiansolution.com/doc2015/702_PutinPalmyra.html
	Putin, Savior of Western Civilization


http://rbth.com/arts/2016/01/07/richard-sorge-the-master-spy-who-helped-alter-the-course-of-ww2_554247
	Richard Sorge: The master spy who helped alter the course of WW2
	
	January 7, 2016 Ajay Kamalakaran, RBTH 


http://in.rbth.com/articles/2012/12/18/india_prepares_to_welcome_a_true_statesman_21109
	India prepares to welcome a True Statesman

	18 December 2012 Ajay Kamalakaran

	There is a lot that emerging India can learn from Vladimir Putin in terms of diplomacy and undertaking of international responsibilities.


http://www.historynet.com/what-if-the-germans-had-captured-moscow-in-1941.htm
	One of the classic "what ifs" of the Second World War centers on how—or if—the German invasion of the Soviet Union in June 1941, code-named Operation Barbarossa, could have achieved a quick victory. ...What went wrong?

	...Others have pointed to Hitler's decision in August to divert most of the armored units attached to Field Marshal Fedor von Bock's Army Group Center, whose objective was Moscow, and send them south to support an effort to surround and capture the Soviet armies around Kiev, the capital of Ukraine. ...it delayed the resumption of major operations against Moscow until early autumn. This, many historians argue, was a fatal blunder.

	Yet, as historian David M. Glantz points out, such a scenario ignores what the Soviet armies around Kiev might have done had they not been trapped, and introduces too many variables to make for a good counterfactual.


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/David_Glantz
	Glantz is known as a military historian of the Soviet role in World War II. He is perhaps most associated with the thesis that World War II Soviet military history has been prejudiced in the West by its over-reliance on German oral and printed sources, without being balanced by a similar examination of Soviet source material; a more complete version of this thesis can be found in his paper "The Failures of Historiography: Forgotten Battles of the German-Soviet War (1941-1945)." Glantz has also, however, met with some criticism for his stylistic choices, such as inventing specific thoughts and feelings of historical figures without reference to documented sources


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Soviet_offensive_plans_controversy
	The Soviet offensive plans controversy refers to the debate among historians on the question of whether Soviet leader Joseph Stalin was planning to attack Axis forces in Eastern Europe prior to Operation Barbarossa.

	While most agree that Stalin made extensive preparations for an eventual war and exploited the military conflict in Europe to his advantage, the assertions that he planned to attack Nazi Germany in the summer of 1941, and that Barbarossa was a preemptive strike by Adolf Hitler, are generally discounted according to David M. Glantz.

	...David M. Glantz disputes the argument that the Red Army was deployed in an offensive stance in 1941. According to Glantz, the Red Army was only in a state of partial mobilization in July 1941, from which neither effective defensive or offensive actions could be offered without considerable delay.


https://kansaspress.ku.edu/978-0-7006-2120-0.html
	When Titans Clashed

	How the Red Army Stopped Hitler

	David M. Glantz

	In swift and stirring prose, When Titans Clash provides the clearest, most complete account of this epic struggle, especially from the Soviet perspective. Drawing on the massive and unprecedented release of Soviet archival documents in recent decades, David Glantz, one of the world's foremost authorities on the Soviet military, and noted military historian Jonathan House expand and elaborate our picture of the Soviet war effort—a picture sharply different from accounts that emphasize Hitler's failed leadership over Soviet strategy and might.


http://www.propornot.com/p/the-list.html
	...globalresearch.ca .. russia-insider.com ... zerohedge.com


http://www.globalresearch.ca/world-war-ii-the-decisive-role-of-the-russian-people-in-defeating-nazi-germany/5619
	On the other hand, the memoirs and archives of the Soviet military and political leadership were dismissed by Western authors.  They failed to serve as a scholarly and ideological “counterbalance” opposing the flow of literature by former Hitlerites. The war-time recollections published in the USSR were subject to an ideological censorship in the West so severe that oftentimes they lost any value as sources of historical knowledge.

	The first attempts to assess in a more realistic way the respective roles of the Eastern and Western Fronts were made in the West nearly 30 years after the end of WWII.

	John Erickson, a British historian, was among the first to move in this direction – in his books “The Road to Stalingrad” (1975) and “The Road to Berlin” (1983);  he demonstrated the magnitude of the actual contribution of the Eastern Front to the defeat of Nazi Germany. Next, David M. Glantz, a US military historian, wrote several books about the war on the Russian front. In 1989-2006, he published 16 works including “When Titans Clashed: How the Red Army Stopped Hitler”.


http://russia-insider.com/en/yes-russia-still-ready-war-even-nuclear-war/5324
	I fully agree with a recent article on Russia Insider entitled “NATO Would Probably Lose A War Against Russia“.  I don’t know who “Shellback” who wrote this article is, but I can immediately recognize a fellow “cold warrior” who, like me, must have spent many hours studying the works of V.G. Reznichenko and David Glantz and who knows what he is talking about.


https://www.bloomberg.com/news/articles/2016-04-29/unmasking-the-men-behind-zero-hedge-wall-street-s-renegade-blog


http://www.zerohedge.com/article/guest-post-russia%E2%80%99s-world-war-ii-experience-needs-be-better-understood?page=4
	Russia’s World War II Experience Needs To Be Better Understood

	It has been an article of faith among many Americans, young and old, that the United States “won” World War II.  And clearly our contribution in men and materiel was indispensable to the Allied victory…especially in the Pacific of course. But because of Cold War tensions immediately following the end of the conflict, Americans were never really given an accurate portrayal of how the victory in Europe against Nazi Germany went down. 

	...It is an old axiom that the war in Europe was won with British brains, American brawn, and Russian blood.  A lot of Russian blood.
	
	...Col. David Glantz has done some great work that is changing the intepretation of the Ostfront which hitherto has been dominated by German and very biased Soviet work


http://sti.clemson.edu/publications-mainmenu-38/commentaries-mainmenu-211/cat_view/33-strom-thurmond-institute/153-sti-publications-by-subject-area/158-history
	The Soviet-German War 1941-1945: Myths and Realities: A Survey Essay by David M. Glantz

	A Paper Presented as the 20th Anniversary Distinguished Lecture at the Strom Thurmond Institute of Government and Public Affairs

	Despite its massive scale, scope, cost, and global impact, it is indeed ironic that much of the Soviet Union’s Great Patriotic War remains obscure and imperfectly understood by Westerners and Russians alike. Worse still, this obscurity and misunderstanding has perverted the history of World War II overall by masking the Red Army’s and Soviet State’s contributions to ultimate Allied victory.

	...The Role of Lend-Lease in Allied Victory:
	
	Another controversial Allied contribution to the war effort was the Lend-Lease program of aid to the Soviet Union. Although Soviet accounts have routinely belittled the significance of Lend-Lease in sustaining the Soviet war effort, the overall importance of this assistance cannot be understated. Lend-Lease aid did not arrive in sufficient quantities to make the difference between defeat and victory in 1941-42; that achievement must be attributed solely to the Soviet people and to the iron nerve of Stalin, Zhukov, Shaposhnikov, Vasilevsky, and their subordinates.

	...Left to their own devices, Stalin and his commanders might have taken 12 to 18 months longer to finish off the Wehrmacht; the ultimate result would probably have been the same


https://www.cia.gov/library/center-for-the-study-of-intelligence/csi-publications/csi-studies/studies/vol47no1/article02.html
	To advance this policy, he relied heavily on Davies. In March 1943, when the Ambassador to the USSR at the time, Adm. William H. Standley, complained in Moscow that the Soviet authorities had concealed the extent of American Lend-Lease aid from the Soviet people, FDR feared that Stalin would take offense. Chastising Standley, he informed him that his sole purpose in Moscow was “full and friendly cooperation” with the Soviet Union.


http://www.history.com/this-day-in-history/fdr-introduces-the-lend-lease-program
	Roosevelt, mindful of the inherent conflict between American democracy and Soviet communism, counted on using U.S. military aid to the Soviet Union as a bargaining chip in post-war diplomatic relations.


https://www.britannica.com/event/Yalta-Conference
	After the agreements reached at Yalta were made public in 1946, they were harshly criticized in the United States. This was because, as events turned out, Stalin failed to keep his promise that free elections would be held in Poland, Czechoslovakia, Hungary, Romania, and Bulgaria. Instead, communist governments were established in all those countries, noncommunist political parties were suppressed, and genuinely democratic elections were never held. At the time of the Yalta Conference, both Roosevelt and Churchill had trusted Stalin and believed that he would keep his word. Neither leader had suspected that Stalin intended that all the popular front governments in Europe would be taken over by communists.


https://www.courthousenews.com/us-deports-russian-spy-tied-trump-camp/
	“I think he is an idiot and forgot who I am. … He got hooked on Gazprom thinking that if they have a project, he could rise up. I also promised him a lot … This is intelligence method to cheat, how else to work with foreigners? You promise a favor for a favor. You get the documents from him and tell him to go fuck himself.”


https://history.state.gov/milestones/1937-1945/us-soviet
	President Roosevelt responded by dispatching his trusted aide Harry Lloyd Hopkins to Moscow in order to assess the Soviet military situation. Although the War Department had warned the President that the Soviets would not last more than six weeks, after two one-on-one meetings with Soviet Premier Josef Stalin, Hopkins urged Roosevelt to assist the Soviets. By the end of October, the first Lend-Lease aid to the Soviet Union was on its way.


http://wunc.org/post/former-spymaster-three-decades-cia
	"But even on into the 20th century, in the 1930s and 1940s when the Soviets basically riddle the FDR administration and the Manhattan Project with - now they're estimating - about 500 spies."


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Venona_project#Bearing_of_Venona_on_particular_cases
	However, Vasily Mitrokhin was a KGB archivist who defected from the Soviet Union with copies of KGB files. He claimed Harry Hopkins was a secret Russian agent. Moreover, Oleg Gordievsky, a high-level KGB officer who also defected from the Soviet Union, reported that Iskhak Akhmerov, the KGB officer who controlled the clandestine Soviet agents in the U.S. during the war, had said Hopkins was "the most important of all Soviet wartime agents in the United States."


http://sti.clemson.edu/publications-mainmenu-38/commentaries-mainmenu-211/cat_view/33-strom-thurmond-institute/153-sti-publications-by-subject-area/158-history
	The Soviet-German War 1941-1945: Myths and Realities: A Survey Essay by David M. Glantz

	Even those who are better informed about the details of the Soviet-German War share in these common misperceptions.

	Who then is at fault for promoting this unbalanced view of the war? Certainly Western historians who wrote about the war from only the German perspective share part of the blame. However, they argue with considerable justification that they did so because only German sources were available to them.


http://www.jstor.org/stable/10.1086/670825
	Mistakes and Myths: The Allies, Germany, and the Versailles Treaty, 1918–1921
	Sally Marks

	...As Steiner observed, the German view of the treaty has prevailed, especially among nonexperts in the English-speaking world, thanks to prolonged, intense Anglo-German propaganda, including Keyne's brilliant but warped polemic.


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Blockade_of_Germany
	The blockade was maintained for eight months after the Armistice in November 1918, into the following year of 1919. According to the New Cambridge Modern History food imports into Germany were controlled by the Allies after the Armistice with Germany until Germany signed the Treaty of Versailles in June 1919.

	...However, Sally Marks believes that the German accounts of a hunger blockade are a "myth".


http://www.newcriterion.com/articles.cfm/Guilt-trip--Versailles--avant-garde---kitsch-7942
	Guilt trip: Versailles, avant-garde & kitsch

	by Roger Kimball

	Perhaps this is the place to note how close Keynes was to the German parties of the Treaty.  ...Posterity has not, Ferguson notes, appreciated “the extent to which Keynes was manipulated by his German friends” or “the extent to which he erred in his analysis of the consequences of the peace.”


http://www.nytimes.com/2004/02/21/arts/a-job-for-rewrite-stalin-s-war.html
	A Job for Rewrite: Stalin's War

	By BENJAMIN SCHWARZ

	For the most part, then, scholars were forced to rely heavily on German sources, which presented an extremely distorted view of events. 


http://www.theamericanconservative.com/articles/seven-questions-for-benjamin-schwarz/
	Schwarz: First, I should make clear that (a) I believe that America is neither an exceptional nor an indispensible nation and (b) I’m a patriot. ...But I don’t think our history shows us as any better—or any worse —than many other countries.  ...No doubt Vladimir Putin sees America’s protestations over his pursuit of what he perceives as his country’s security interest as little more than the smug and aggressive braying of insufferable hypocrites.


http://fmso.leavenworth.army.mil/documents/failures.htm
	The Failures of Historiography: Forgotten Battles of the German-Soviet War (1941-1945)
	COL David M. Glantz

	Who then is at fault for this unbalanced view? Western historians who wrote on the war from only the German perspective deserve part of the blame. But they would argue, correctly, that they did so because they used the only sources available. 

	...In general, Western appreciation of the Soviet view has been inhibited by three fundamental barriers to understanding: an ignorance of the scope of Soviet writing on the subject, an inability to obtain and read what Soviet historians have written (the language barrier), and an unwillingness to accept what those historians have written. 


http://bookfi.net/dl/548070/5d8658i
	Russian Origins of Nazism

	Archival materials housed in Moscow that have only recently become available to historians in particular necessitate a reevaluation of White émigré contributions to National Socialism. During the summer of 1945, Soviet occupying forces in German Lower Silesia discovered vast German archives as well as great amounts of documents that the Germans had seized from occupied countries, most notably France and Poland. The entire archival collection was transported to Moscow, where it was stored in secrecy from the public and even from workers in other Soviet archives. While Soviet authorities returned some of these records to East Germany during the Cold War, most of the seized archival collection remained under wraps in Moscow.

	Russian authorities only admitted to possessing files looted from Germany and declassified them in 1991 after the Soviet Union had collapsed. Historians were allowed to investigate the huge archival collection at the Center for the Preservation of Historical-Documentary Collections, which had become part of the Russian State Military Archives by the time I examined materials there in 1999–2001. I was temporarily denied access to the former Center in March 2001, likely as part of the chilled American–Russian relations that arose after the February 2001 arrest of the FBI operative Robert Hanssen as a double agent for both the Soviets and the Russians.

	In its heyday, the former Center contained large amounts of files dealing with National Socialist–White émigré collaboration, including reports from Hitler’s Geheime Staatspolizei (Secret State Police, commonly known as the Gestapo) and the Reichskommissar für die Überwachung der öffentlichen Ordnung (State Commissioner for the Supervision of Public Order), the secret intelligence office of the Weimar Republic that reported on political developments and observed foreigners in Germany. Regrettably, many State Commissioner files, most likely including one devoted specifically to Aufbau, have long been housed at the Sluzhba vneshnoi razvetki (Foreign Intelligence Service), where historians are not allowed to examine them. As a further hindrance, Russian authorities “temporarily” transferred the remaining State Commissioner documents there during the summer of 2001, fortunately after I had examined them thoroughly. I believe that I am the last Western scholar to investigate these valuable materials.


http://www.bbc.com/news/magazine-32066222
	And there are details too of endless Soviet-East German social gatherings Putin attended, to celebrate ties between the two countries.

	...He and his KGB colleagues frantically burned evidence of their intelligence work.

	"I personally burned a huge amount of material," Putin recalled in First Person. "We burned so much stuff that the furnace burst."


http://fmso.leavenworth.army.mil/documents/failures.htm
	The Failures of Historiography: Forgotten Battles of the German-Soviet War (1941-1945)
	COL David M. Glantz

	Investigation of all of these issues and others will cast more accurate light on the war and will help dispel the many myths that the war has produced, myths which have and will continue to victimize the Soviet (Russian) Army and Soviet (Russian) historiography. In the final analysis, the old axiom remains correct -- that it is better to relate one's own history than to have someone else relate it. 


https://twitter.com/rusembusa/status/763165930411036672
	David Glantz, major US historian of #WWII, decorated with @mod_russia medal 'For strengthening comradeship-in-arms'.


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Alfred_Rosenberg
	...German propaganda efforts designed to win over Russian opinion were, at best, patchy and inconsistent. Alfred Rosenberg was one of the few in the Nazi hierarchy who advocated a policy designed to encourage anti-Communist opinion among the population of the occupied territories. His interest here was mainly in the non-Russian areas such as the Ukraine and the Baltic States


http://euromaidanpress.com/2016/11/28/100099/
	When Stalin wrote to his collaborators that “we may lose Ukraine,” he was by no means expressing a paranoid suspicion. Stalin’s own analysis of future developments in Ukraine is revealing. His letter to Kaganovich about the possibility of losing Ukraine was dated August 11, 1932.


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Propaganda_in_the_Soviet_Union
	Stalin himself declared in a 1941 broadcast that Germany waged war to exterminate the peoples of the USSR. Propaganda published in Pravda denounced all Germans as killers, bloodsuckers, and cannibals, and much play was made of atrocity claims. Hatred was actively and overtly encouraged.

	...Anti-fascism was commonly used in propaganda aimed outside the USSR during the 1930s, particularly to draw people into front organizations. The Spanish Civil War was, in particular, used to quash dissent among European Communist parties and reports of Stalin's growing totalitarianism.

	...The presence of a real enemy was used to inspire action and production in face of the threat to the Father Soviet Union, or Mother Russia. ...It was termed the "Great Patriotic War" and stories presented it as a fight of ordinary people's heroism.

	...In the 1960s, reviving memories of the Great Patriotic War was used to bolster support for the regime


http://euromaidanpress.com/2014/10/28/no-russian-fairytale/
	Until recently, 28 October was celebrated in Ukraine as the “Day of liberation of Ukraine from fascist invaders.” On the round date of 70 years of this date in 2014, Ukraine’s Institute of National Memory proposes to rename the holiday the “Day of the expulsion of Nazi occupants,” and not the liberation of Ukraine.

	“After 28 October 1944, Ukraine had not become a free country, therefore liberation is an incorrect term. Liberation means freedom, liberty, but in 1944 Ukraine had not become free. After the expulsion of Nazi occupiers Ukraine found itself under Soviet domination which resulted in mass repressions and the deportations of hundreds of thousands of Ukrainians, Poles, and Crimean Tatars. The thesis of “70 years since liberation” is a continuation of the Soviet propaganda clichés that still serve Russia in the war with Ukraine”


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Media_portrayal_of_the_Ukrainian_crisis
	Media portrayals of the Ukrainian crisis, including 2014 unrest and the 2014 Ukrainian revolution following the Euromaidan movement, differed widely between Ukrainian, western and Russian media. In particular, the Russian media was accused of propagandizing, and of waging an information war during its coverage of the events. Russian channels were repeatedly criticized for the use of misleading images, false narratives, misrepresentation, suppression, and fabricated news stories, such as a child's crucifixion and the death of a 10-year-old in shelling. The BBC reported that Russian state television "appears to employ techniques of psychological conditioning designed to excite extreme emotions of aggression and hatred in the viewer", which, according to The Guardian, is part of a coordinated "informational-psychological war operation"

	...The Russian media consistently portrayed the crisis in Ukraine as having been instigated by the post-Yanukovych Ukrainian government, and represented Euromaidan as being controlled by "ultranationalist", "fascist", "neo-Nazi", and "anti-Semitic" groups

	...The Russian media focused particularly on Right Sector, portraying the group as powerful, fascist, and neo-Nazi and saying that it was persecuting Russian-speakers and Jews


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Alfred_Rosenberg
	In January 1934 Hitler had appointed Rosenberg as the cultural and educational leader of the Reich.

	...In a 18 November 1941 press conference speaking about the Jewish Question, he said:

    		...Some six million Jews still live in the East, and this question can only be solved by a biological extermination of the whole of Jewry in Europe. The Jewish Question will only be solved for Germany when the last Jew has left German territory, and for Europe when not a single Jew stands on the European continent as far as the Urals... And to this end it is necessary to force them beyond the Urals or otherwise bring about their eradication.

	...Hitler was a leader oriented towards practical politics, whereas, for Rosenberg, religion and philosophy were key and culturally he was the most influential within the party. Several accounts of the time before the Nazi ascension to power, indeed, speak of Hitler as being a mouthpiece for Rosenberg's views, and he clearly exerted a great deal of intellectual influence.


https://www.ushmm.org/wlc/en/article.php?ModuleId=10007058
	Nazi party ideologue Alfred Rosenberg introduced Hitler to the Protocols during the early 1920s, as Hitler was developing his worldview. Hitler referred to the Protocols in some of his early political speeches, and, throughout his career, he exploited the myth that "Jewish-Bolshevists" were conspiring to control the world.

	During the 1920s and 1930s, The Protocols of the Elders of Zion played an important part in the Nazis' propaganda arsenal. The Nazi party published at least 23 editions of the Protocols between 1919 and 1939. Following the Nazis' seizure of power in 1933, some schools used the Protocols to indoctrinate students. 

	...The area under his authority was the first to see the “Final Solution of the Jewish Question” carried out through the systematic murder of Jewish men, women, and children. By the end of 1941, more than half a million Jews had been annihilated; Estonia, part of the “Reichskommissariat Ostland” was the first German-occupied region declared to be “free of Jews.” Since November 1941, trains with Jews deported from the Reich arrived in the “Ostland.” SS and police officers together with Rosenberg's officials made sure that the deportees were either killed immediately on arrival or exploited in forced labor projects few could survive.

	The importance of the events in the occupied Soviet Union for the history of the Holocaust can hardly be overestimated. Despite its constant power struggles with the SS and other German agencies, Rosenberg's ministry played a key role in the evolution of the “Final Solution.” His Reich Ministry was the only government agency to send not one, but two representatives to the notorious Wannsee Conference convened by Reinhard Heydrich on January 20, 1942, to coordinate the next steps towards the mass murder of Jews in German-controlled Europe.


http://bookfi.net/dl/548070/5d8658
	Aufbau thought significantly influenced early National Socialist ideology, and Aufbau bequeathed a powerful legacy to National Socialism after 1923 as well. Scheubner-Richter’s death in the Hitler/Ludendorff Putsch served as an example of heroic sacrifice for the National Socialist cause. Biskupskii continued to channel funds to the NSDAP after 1923, and he led White émigrés in the Third Reich as the head of the Russian Trust Authority. 

	...Moreover, Aufbau’s early warnings of the “Jewish Bolshevik” peril radicalized later National Socialist anti-Bolshevism and anti-Semitism. After a period of compromise while attaining power and then consolidating their rule, Hitler’s National Socialists returned to their original intense anti-Bolshevik and anti-Semitic roots, which Aufbau had greatly influenced, by invading the Soviet Union and exterminating millions of Jews in the Final Solution. As the State Minister for the Occupied Eastern Territories, Rosenberg aided Hitler in both of these quintessentially National Socialist undertakings. To a considerable degree, apocalyptic White émigré conceptions of the “Jewish Bolshevik” menace found their expression in heinous National Socialist deeds.

	When given the opportunity under the cover of World War II, the National Socialist regime sought to destroy European Jewry, and it came dangerously close to succeeding. The most striking feature of the Final Solution proved its rationalized irrationality. Great numbers of Germans and their auxiliaries from Eastern and Western Europe devoted large amounts of scarce resources to slaughtering millions of Jews at the same time that a total war was raging which was to end either in glorious victory or abject defeat. National Socialists placed a high priority on exterminating Jews when military interests dictated using as many of them as possible for slave labor. This skewed policy indicated the considerable degree to which Hitler had internalized the apocalyptic White émigré standpoint that the Jews threatened to ruin Germany and the rest of the world as they had Russia.


http://www.foxnews.com/opinion/2013/07/09/ex-soviet-bloc-spy-chief-explains-hidden-origin-todays-jihad.html
	Thus, the Romanian DIE (counterpart of KGB foreign intelligence), which I headed, in 1972 received from the KGB an Arabic translation of the old Russian forgery, “The Protocols of the Elders of Zion.” We also received "documentary" material in Arabic produced by the Soviet disinformation "proving" America was a Zionist country whose aim was to transform the Islamic world into a Jewish fief. 

	My DIE was ordered to disseminate these documents within its targeted Islamic countries. During my later years in Romania, the DIE disseminated thousands of copies of “The Protocols” and similar “documents” each month.


http://euromaidanpress.com/2016/08/11/moscow-tv-revives-infamous-anti-semitic-forgery-protocols-of-the-elders-of-zion-euromaidan-press/
	Moscow TV revives infamous anti-Semitic forgery ‘Protocols of the Elders of Zion’


http://www.propornot.com/p/the-list.html
	...infowars.com ... intellihub.com ... wakeupthesheep.com ... educate-yourself.org ... dailystormer.com ... stormfront.org...


http://planet.infowars.com/video/the-protocols-of-the-learned-elders-of-zion
	The Protocols of the Learned Elders of Zion is a document which should be read by all. No other single document provides us with such a clear understanding of why the world is gradually moving towards a One World Government, controlled by an irreproachable hidden hand.


https://www.intellihub.com/censorship-around-world-still-high-levels/
	Of course, control of the media is a central component in any would-be tyrant’s agenda; it is no surprise that such a scheme has been outlined in key conspiracy documents such as the The Protocols of the Learned Elders of Zion


http://wakeupthesheep.com/?p=626
	Here is a summary of Zionist doctrine from a book entitled:

	“The Protocols of the Learned Elders of ZION”


http://educate-yourself.org/cn/protocolsaffirmed17sep14.shtml
	Authenticity of Protocols of Zion Affirmed

	A little-known 1938 booklet rejected the 1935 decision of a Berne Court (overturned on appeal) that the Protocols of Zion were a forgery. It foresaw that World War Two was an Illuminati (Masonic) Jewish trap. 


https://www.google.com/search?q=site%3Astormfront.org+%22protocols+of+the+elders+of+zion%22+OR+%22protocols+of+the+learned+elders+of+zion%22


https://www.dailystormer.com/jew-york-times-puts-out-new-article-proclaiming-the-protocols-of-the-learned-elders-of-zion-to-be-faked/
	Jew York Times Puts Out New Article Proclaiming The “Protocols of the Learned Elders of Zion” to be Faked

	The Jew-run New York Times put out a new article proclaiming that the “Protocols of the Learned Elders of Zion” is a fake. They’ve actually been doing this over the past 100 years to discredit the information contained in the text. This article is just the latest example of them doing this.


http://www.dailystormer.com/is-putin-one-of-us/
	Is Putin One of Us?


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Alfred_Rosenberg
	He was sentenced to death and executed with other condemned co-defendants at Nuremberg on the morning of 16 October 1946. ...Rosenberg was the only condemned man who, when asked at the gallows if he had any last statement to make, replied with only one word: "No"


...


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Julius_Evola
	...Evola took seriously a number of antisemitic canards and argued that the anti-Jewish and anti-Masonic forgery The Protocols of Zion, which he believed to be true in principle if not specifically, accurately reflected the conditions of modernity.

	...Historian Aaron Gillette described Evola as "one of the most influential fascist racists in Italian history." Evola was admired by the Italian Fascist leader Benito Mussolini. He idolized the Nazi SS and admired the SS head Heinrich Himmler, whom he knew personally


https://books.google.com/books?id=YWUxDKN80BgC&pg=PA336
	Russian fascism's main home was outside Europe, in Manchuria. The Russian Fascist Party, modelled on Mussolini's movement, was founded in the city of Harbin in 1931. Here, on the remote reaches of the Sungary river, thousands of Russians who had fled from the revolution constructed a little Russia. In a city teeming with different nationalities, the Russians printed and read numerous papers in Russian, attended the Russian cathedral, sat in cafes along the smart Bolshoi Prospekt, and talked endlessly of the war of revenge against Bolshevism. The White community was fractions and diverse, and Soviet agents encouraged their squabbles.


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Konstantin_Rodzaevsky
	On May 26, 1931, he became the Secretary General of the newly created Russian Fascist Party; in 1934 the Party amalgamated with the Russian Fascist Organization of Anastasy Vonsyatsky, Rodzaevsky becoming its leader. He modeled himself on Benito Mussolini, and also used the Swastika as one of the symbols of the movement.

	Rodzaevsky collected around himself personally selected bodyguards, and used symbolism of the former Russian Empire along with Russian nationalist symbols; like the Italian Blackshirts, the Russian Fascists wore black uniforms with black crossed belts; they were armed with weapons obtained from Japan's Imperial Japanese Army. They created an international organization of White émigrés with a central office in Harbin, the "Russian Far East Moscow", and links in twenty-six nations around the world.


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Russian_Fascist_Party
	...the RFP under Rodzaevsky had grown strong and claimed 20,000 activists by May 1935. Subsidiaries of the RFP were set up - Russian Women's Fascist Movement (RGFD), Fascist Union of Youth, Union of Young Fascists – Vanguard (boys), Union of Young Fascists – Vanguard (girls), Union of Fascist Little Ones. Rodzaevsky's book, The Russian National State, outlined the programme of the party to establish fascism in Russia by May 1, 1938, including a desire to get rid of the Jews

	...By cooperating with Japan, the RFP became the most influential émigré group in Manchukuo, setting up a party school in Harbin in 1932. Rodzaevsky also assisted the Imperial Japanese Army in the formation of the Asano Detachment, the all ethnic Russian special forces in the Kwantung Army


https://www.cia.gov/library/readingroom/docs/DOC_0000608439.pdf
	In addition, there were numerous anti-Communist White Russians in northern Manchuria willing and able to engage in intelligence activities for the Japanese.

	...The principal field intelligence units under the Intelligence Section of the Kwantung Army staff were eight Army Special Services Agencies. Of these it was the unit in Harbin which played the major role in the Manchurian operations. The Harbin ASSA used White Russians for espionage missions and these were the best of the agents available.

	...The importance of available Soviet publications, primarily newspapers published in the Far East, had somewhat belatedly become apparent to the Japanese, and the few publication analysts originally assigned to the Harbin ASSA had been augmented and formed into the Document Intelligence Division. Its staff included a large number of White Russian intellectuals


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Norihiro_Yasue
	At the age of 33, Captain Yasue was assigned as part of the Japanese intervention in Siberia, to aid the Russian White Army in their struggle against the Bolshevik Red Army. A Russian-language specialist, he was assigned to the staff of General Gregorii Semenov, a vehement anti-Semite who distributed copies of the Protocols of the Elders of Zion to all of his troops, along with weapons and rations. Along with a few dozen other Japanese soldiers, Yasue read and accepted the premises of the Protocols, and would allow this to guide much of his actions and views into the time of the beginning of World War II.

	After his return to Japan in 1922, Yasue worked in the Army Intelligence Bureau, translating the Protocols of the Elders of Zion into Japanese, while continuing to speak with Inuzuka and a handful of others about the Jewish problem in Russia. Their group grew quickly, publishing articles in internal army journals, and holding informal lectures and discussion groups.


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Koreshige_Inuzuka
	After the war, he was stationed off the coast of Vladivostok during the Siberian Intervention to aid the White Russians against the Bolshevik Red Army. It was there that he first heard of and read the Protocols of the Elders of Zion, a powerful anti-Semitic document detailing a Jewish worldwide conspiracy. The document was forged and distributed by Russian General Gregorii Semenov, a leader of the White forces.

	In 1922, after returning to Japan, Inuzuka began to gather a coterie of sympathetic officers who believed in the Protocols. This group of so-called 'Jewish-experts' slowly became larger and more outspoken over the next several years. The group published many documents detailing their thoughts on the Jewish conspiracy, including lists of known Jews, and a Japanese translation of the Protocols

	...As war with China approached in the 1930s, Inuzuka came to support the 'Manchurian faction,' a number of military men who believed that control of Manchuria was crucial to Japan's survival. 


http://imtfe.law.virginia.edu/collections/phelps-collection/2/1/hashimoto-urged-war-manchuria-witness-testifies-news-article
	Hashimoto Urged War in Manchuria, Witness Testifies News Article

	"Colonel Chaiki Shigeto and Colonel Kingoro Hashimoto urged 'positive action' be taken in Manchuria." Goes into depth on the discussions surrounding advancement into Manchuria. Subsequent testimony was heard from Ken Inukia, "son of the former Premier who was assassinated..."


https://trialinternational.org/latest-post/kingoro-hashimoto/
	Hashimoto, as a military leader, is reported to have played a pivotal role in the formulation and execution of a common plan leading Japan to wage wars of aggression to secure its domination of East Asia and the Pacific and Indian Oceans. With that purpose, Hashimoto allegedly participated in the March and October 1931 failed coups to establish a military dictatorship and in the 1932 plot to assassinate Prime Minister Inukai. He repeatedly expressed his public support for a policy of conquest and military expansion and was the founder of several radical right-wing societies within the army.


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Kingoro_Hashimoto
	In April 1922, he was assigned to the Kwangtung Army in Manchuria and was stationed at Harbin. In 1923, he was sent on special assignment to Manzhouli, near the border with the Soviet Union. From September 1927 through June 1930, he was reassigned as military attaché to Turkey. On his return to Japan, he was posted to the Imperial Japanese Army General Staff, and headed a Russian studies department. 

	...He proposed a nationalist single party dictatorship, based on socialism, which was similar to European fascism. The militarists had strong industrial support, but also socialist-nationalist sentiments on the part of radical officers.

	...Hashimoto was a fervent supporter of aggressive policies during the Second Sino-Japanese War period, and thus supported the Tripartite Pact with Nazi Germany and Fascist Italy in 1940, along with the other military extremists of the Imperial Japanese Army.


https://www.newspapers.com/newspage/43559422/
	Okawa, with Col Kingoro Hashimoto (also a defendant) and other army leaders had planned the coup. Okawa later told Shimizu that the plot had failed because the military had backed out and that Gen. Kuniaki Koiso (another of the defendants) reported "it is a direct order from the army that this plot be abandoned. Later, in August, 1931, Okawa told Shimizu that Okawa and three army colonels including Seishiro Itagaki. vice - chief of staff of the Kwantung army (now a defendant) would bring about an incident in Mukden. It came in September, 1931. Okawa subsequently promoted ultra - Nationalist movements, with the ultimate purpose of expelling the white race from Asia . . ." 


https://www.cia.gov/library/readingroom/docs/DOC_0005403452.pdf
	Segments of the Chinese Nationalist and of the Japan underground government are attempting to implement plans to provoke a third World War.

	This is being done in the name of Greater Asian-ism with the purpose of fostering an asiatic race liberation movement and reviving the influence of the Chinese Nationalist Government. OKAWA Shumei reportedly emphasized the fact that only through a third world War can complete independence of Asia be realized.

	...These four men are reported to be planning in secret the reconstruction of the Japanese military. "Their initial aim is the organization of a volunteer corps to join the Chinese Nationalists in their defense of Formosa and then to gradually increase the size and equipment of the group until it becomes a power for those whose service both the East and West will bid prior to the inevitable World War III."

	...In the event of war between the US and the USSR, ultra-rightists OKAWA Shumei, ISHIHARA Kanji and KITA Ikki groups will aid the Soviets.


https://trialinternational.org/latest-post/kingoro-hashimoto/
	Hashimoto is also said to have plotted the military seizure of Manchuria by participating in the planning of the Mukden incident of 18 September 1931, which provided the pretext for the annexation of the region by Japan a few months later. In that occasion, Japanese militaries orchestrated a fake sabotage to a Japanese railway line in north-eastern China, which was later attributed by the Imperial Army of Japan to Chinese dissident and assumed as justification to invade China. Therefore, Hashimoto was allegedly the major instigator of the second Sino-Japanese war and acted as a commander in the field during the military campaign.


https://books.google.com/books?id=x-aeAAAAIAAJ&pg=PA78
	An Instance of Treason: Ozaki Hotsumi and the Sorge Spy Ring

	By Chalmers A. Johnson

	On September 18, 1931, acting on secret orders received from Colonels Itagaki Seishiro and Ishihara Kanji of the Kwantung Army General Staff, Captain Imada Shintaro and several other officers attached to the Kwantung Army destroyed the South Manchurian Railroad tracks at Liut'iaokou, outside Mukden. The Kwantung Army then charged that Chinese had sabotaged the railroad, and it used this incident as a pretext for driving the Chinese armies from Manchuria.


https://www.britannica.com/event/Mukden-Incident
	Mukden Incident, also called Manchurian Incident

	...Japanese troops used the pretext of an explosion along the Japanese-controlled South Manchurian Railway to occupy Mukden. On September 21, Japanese reinforcements arrived from Korea, and the army began to expand throughout northern Manchuria. In Tokyo neither the high command of the Japanese army nor Prime Minister Wakatsuki Reijirō proved able to restrain the Kwangtung Army in the field, and within three months Japanese troops had spread throughout Manchuria. Wakatsuki’s cabinet fell in December, and its successor reacted to a growing tide of public opinion by sanctioning the invasion.

	The Kwantung Army met little resistance in its conquests because Chiang Kai-shek, who was intent on establishing his control over the rest of China, ordered the commander of the Chinese forces in Manchuria, Zhang Xueliang, to pursue a policy of nonresistance and withdrawal. The League of Nations, Chiang announced, would determine the outcome of the case. The Lytton Commission, appointed by the league to investigate the situation, labeled Japan as the aggressor, but Japan withdrew from the league and continued to occupy Manchuria until 1945.


https://books.google.com/books?id=x-aeAAAAIAAJ&pg=PA78
	An Instance of Treason: Ozaki Hotsumi and the Sorge Spy Ring

	By Chalmers A. Johnson

	The Manchurian Incident, as this action was called, was the opening scene in the Sino-Japanese war of 1937-45. It took the civilian Japanese government in Tokyo by surprise, and made it clear for the first time that the Japanese Army had passed beyond formal governmental control and intended to become a prime formulator, rather than an instrument, of Japanese foreign and domestic policy. It surprised Sorge and Ozaki, too.


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Hotsumi_Ozaki
	Hotsumi Ozaki (尾崎 秀実 Ozaki Hotsumi?, April 29, 1901 – November 7, 1944) was an Imperial Japanese journalist working for the Asahi Shimbun newspaper, communist, Soviet Union intelligence agent, and an advisor to Prime Minister Fumimaro Konoe.


http://therealnews.com/t2/?option=com_content&task=view&id=31&Itemid=74&jumival=2505
	The encirclement of Russia

	Chalmers Johnson: "We have to back down unless we are looking for real confrontation with Russia" Pt 3 


http://www.motherjones.com/politics/2008/08/americas-unwelcome-advances
	America's Unwelcome Advances
	The Pentagon's foreign overtures are running into a world of public opposition.

	Chalmers Johnson

	Russia, however, does not accept the US explanation, and believes these bases are aimed at it. ...It remains to be seen whether this will solidify American defensive commitments to Poland or further inflame Russia's relations with NATO. 


http://www.tomdispatch.com/blog/176033/best_of_tomdispatch%3A_chalmers_johnson_on_garrisoning_the_planet/
	Posted by Chalmers Johnson	at 4:30pm, August 9, 2015.

	...other than make the problem of terrorism worse than it is. For one thing, Russia is opposed to the expansion of U.S. military power on its borders 


http://www.propornot.com/p/the-list.html
	...zerohedge.com ... truthdig.com ... commondreams.org ... infowars.com...


http://www.zerohedge.com/news/2015-08-16/travails-empire-oil-debt-gold-imperial-dollar?page=1
	He never really questions whether empire is good or bad, sustainable or not, and at what costs. At least he does not so in the same manner as that great analyst of empire Chalmers Johnson.


http://www.truthdig.com/arts_culture/item/20080515_chalmers_johnson_on_our_managed_democracy
	Chalmers Johnson on Our ‘Managed Democracy’


https://www.commondreams.org/views/2010/11/22/telling-peoples-story-tribute-chalmers-johnson
	It was from Chalmers Johnson, a former professor of Asian Studies at the University of California who I knew by reputation as an excellent writer and commentator on Japan, Asia and U.S. foreign policy.


https://www.infowars.com/washington-opened-the-gates-of-hell-in-iraq-now-come-the-furies/
	The late, great critic of the American Imperium, Chalmers Johnson, popularized the salient concept of “blowback”. That is, the notion that if you bomb, drone, invade, desecrate and slaughter—collaterally or otherwise— a people and their lands, they might find ways to return the favor.


http://www.sandiegouniontribune.com/sdut-chalmers-johnson-contrarian-scholar-on-asia-dies-2010nov23-htmlstory.html
	Johnson rose to prominence in the 1980s, when he argued that Japan's sudden development as an economic power was carefully orchestrated by government policy and not the result of open capitalism.

	...He was founder and president of the Japan Policy Research Institute, a think tank in San Francisco.


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Hotsumi_Ozaki
	By writing books and articles Ozaki established himself as an expert in Sino-Japanese relations. Thus he was recruited by Ryūnosuke Gotō in 1937 to join the Shōwa Kenkyūkai, a think tank established by Prime Minister Fumimaro Konoe. From 1938, he was invited by Konoe to become a member of his inner circle, or “Breakfast Club”, of select members with whom he would confer on current events each week over breakfast. Ozaki, therefore, was in a position to participate in the making of decisions he was supposed to uncover.

	Ozaki learned that Japan wanted to avoid a war with the Soviet Union, and let Sorge know of it. This information proved to be of uttermost importance for the whole history of the Second World War: after Sorge relayed it to Soviet command, Moscow transferred 18 divisions, 1,700 tanks, and over 1,500 aircraft from Siberia and the Far East to the Western Front against the Nazi Germany during the most dangerous months of the Battle for Moscow, one of the turning points of the whole war.

	On July 2, 1941, Ozaki as a member of the "Breakfast Club" supported a critical decision for Japanese expansion towards the Dutch East Indies and Singapore and against Hitler's request to invade Siberia.


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Divide_and_rule
	Divide and rule (or divide and conquer, from Latin dīvide et īmpera) in politics and sociology is gaining and maintaining power by breaking up larger concentrations of power into pieces that individually have less power than the one implementing the strategy. The concept refers to a strategy that breaks up existing power structures, and especially prevents smaller power groups from linking up, causing rivalries and fomenting discord among the people.


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Warlord_Era
	The Warlord Era (simplified Chinese: 军阀时代; traditional Chinese: 軍閥時代; pinyin: Jūnfá shídài, 1916–1928) was a period in the history of the Republic of China when the control of the country was divided among its military cliques in the mainland regions of Sichuan, Shanxi, Qinghai, Ningxia, Guangdong, Guangxi, Gansu, Yunnan and Xinjiang.


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Chinese_Assassination_Corps
	In 1910, the left-wing Tongmenghui nationalist (and later anti-communist pro-Japanese collaborator and President of the Reorganized National Government of China during the Second Sino-Japanese War) Wang Jingwei, who had been influenced by Russian anarchism while studying in Japan, planned to assassinate Prince-Regent Chun (father of the young Xuantong Emperor). The plan, which was to be carried out in April, failed as Wang and his associates were arrested in Beijing in March.

	In response to the plot's failure, the Chinese Assassination Corps was formed later the same year to carry on the imprisoned would-be assassins' mission. Founded in Hong Kong, it had about ten active members in the beginning, most of which were Tongmenghui activists disillusioned with the tactic of revolutionary mass action. Instead, they turned to individual action, the propaganda of the deed, in the form of assassination. This was deeply inspired by roughly contemporary groups like the Russian People's Will, a left-wing terrorist group most well known for killing Tsar Alexander II in 1881, and the Black Hand, a Serbian pan-Slavic nationalist organization which would later go on to trigger World War I by assassinating Archduke Franz Ferdinand in 1914.


https://books.google.com/books?id=7hprt3OB-yUC&pg=PA43
	At the same time, he saw himself as following the example of Russian nihilists.

	...We Yue's sensational attack came at the end of an eventful summer in 1905, only weeks after the Tongmenghui was organized. Although Sun Yatsen himself generally opposed assassination schemes, his movement's organ, Min boa, continued to present the image of nihilst activity and to encourage assassination specifically. Before Wu Yue's testament appeared in spring 1907, such notable Tongmenghui figures as Song Jiaoren and Liao Zhongkai wrote articles on revolutionary activity in Russia or on the nihilists.

	In addition to its printed material, Minbao used illustrations to depict nihilists, assassins, and other revolutionaries, most of them Russian.

	...Two earlier studies are especially relevant to the material in this chapter. Price's Russia and the Roots of the Chinese Revolution provides great insights into the numbers ways by which developments in Russia influenced not only publicists such as Liang Qichao and activists such as Yang Dusheng, but also popular culture in China during the first years of the century.


http://etheses.whiterose.ac.uk/9813/1/341813.pdf
	More anarchist societies were established. Among them the most famous were Shi She (Real Society), Qun She (Mass Society) and Ping She (Peace Society). These three societies merged with the People's Voice Society into Jinhua She (Evolution Society) in 1919, and around the same time Zhen She (Truth Society) and Fendou She (Struggle Society) were set up. Each society published a magazine and various booklets and therefore, a prolific anarchist literature was widely distributed in China.

	The teachings of various anarchist thinkers - Proudhon, Stimer, Bakunin, Kropotkin and Tolstoy - were introduced to China, but most Chinese anarchists' favourite theory was Kropotkin's anarchist communism. As an ideology imported from abroad, anarchism could take root in China rapidly not only because it was in harmony with Chinese traditional Taoist thought, but also because the anarchist teachings of opposition to authority and oppression had a strong appeal for radical Chinese youth, who felt these ideas were simple and direct. For a period of time, anarchism became the mainstream of Chinese radical thinking. 

	...Polevoy and other agents ardently desired to expand their contacts with anarchists and other radicals throughout China. ...For this purpose, the Bolshevik agents used to make use of certain anarchists as intermediaries. For example, Huang Lingshuang accompanied Soviet agents to South China as an interpreter on several occasions; Chen Derong was sent to Jiangsu to make contact with a group of youths there; and Jiang Banruo went to Zhangzhou as a liaison man between Soviet agents and Chen Jiongming.

	Chen Jiongming was a believer in anarchism and had been a member of the China Assassination Corps led by Liu Sifu many years before. Towards the end of 1919, Chen invited anarchists such as Liang Bingxuan, Liu Shixin, Yu Keshui and Xu Zhenfeng to Zhangzhou to promote "social revolution."

	...The GMD theorist Dai Jitao made a penetrating analysis on why anarchism became an ideological trend among Chinese youths:

		After a set of significant reforms ... over the previous 20 years and more, China's politics were still not clear; the system was not improved yet; the state could not be unified; social life was still rather poor; and education and culture could not be popularised. However, oppression from the surrounding world was increasing day by day. People were anxious about whether the nation would disintegrate, and the disaster of national subjugation and racial extermination would come soon. As they felt quite helpless, nobody could find a way to struggle. Therefore, the youth's thinking naturally tended to a mentality which cast aside politics, despised law, hated the army . ... The ideological trend of anarchism from 1914 to 1917/1918 demonstrates a situation where the Chinese people had come to the end of their tether.


https://archive.org/details/BezmenovLoveLetterToAmerica
	Chronic instability breeds radicalism as a means of solving problems. Radicalism is the precondition of a power struggle which may (and has often) resulted in violent and forceful replacements of power structures. If the situation deteriorates badly, this replacement takes ugly forms of internal civil war, or revolution, or invitation of a "friendly and fraternal" neighbor, and finally ends up in the traditional way — namely, state control.

	...After several months I was formally recruited by the KGB as an informer, while still maintaining my position as a Novosti journalist. My work with the KGB entailed combining my journalistic duties with the collection of intelligence data, and the spreading of "disinformation" to foreign countries for the purposes of Soviet propaganda and subversion.

	...The main principle of ideological subversion is TURNING A STRONGER FORCE AGAINST ITSELF. Just like in the Japanese martial arts: you do not stop the blow of a heavier more powerful enemy with an equally forceful blow. You may simply hurt your hand. Instead you catch the striking fist with your hand and PULL the enemy in the direction of his blow until he crashes into a wall or any other heavy object in his way. 


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Divide_and_rule
	Historical examples

	...Following the October revolution, the Bolsheviks engaged at various times in alliances with the Left Socialist-Revolutionaries, some anarchists, and various non-Russian ethnic nationalist groups, against the White movement, Right Socialist-Revolutionaries, and other anarchist and ethnic nationalist groups. This was done to establish the Communist Party of the Soviet Union (the Bolshevik party) as the sole legal party in the Soviet Union. Similar shifting alliances were played out amongst various dissident factions within the CPSU, such as the Workers Opposition and Left Communists, with Joseph Stalin and his supporters gaining absolute power within the party by the mid-1920s.


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Warlord_Era
	The era lasted from the death of Yuan Shikai in 1916 until 1928 (with the conclusion of the Northern Expedition with the Northeast Flag Replacement, the beginning of the "Nanjing decade"). However, when old warlords, such as Wu Peifu and Sun Chuanfang, were deposed, new minor warlords persisted into the 1930s and 1940s, as the central government struggled to keep its allies under rein, a great problem for the Kuomintang (KMT) through World War II and after during the Chinese Civil War. Some of the most notable warlord wars, post-1928, including the Central Plains War, involved nearly a million soldiers. The division of the country continued after the Warlord Era until the fall of the Nationalist government at the end of the civil war.

	...The Xinhai Revolution in 1911 brought widespread mutiny across southern China. The revolution had begun in October 1911 with the mutiny of the troops based in Wuhan. Soldiers once loyal to the Qing government began to defect to revolutionary forces.


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Wuchang_Uprising
	The Wuchang Uprising was the Chinese uprising that served as the catalyst to the Xinhai Revolution, ending the Qing Dynasty – and two millennia of imperial rule – and ushering in the Republic of China (ROC).

	...On October 9 Sun Wu was at the Russian concession of Hankou where bombs were being built. A bomb accidentally exploded, causing Sun Wu serious injuries. When he was sent to the hospital, the staff discovered the group were revolutionaries and alerted the Qing government.


https://books.google.com/books?id=Kc4iBQAAQBAJ
	By Charles Emmerson

	...the casual disposal of a cigarette in a Chinese revolutionary bob factory caused an accidental explosion, brining the Qing authorities running, and forcing local army units -- who had been heavily infiltrated by revolutionaries -- to accelerate a planned rebellion.


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Warlord_Era
	Rebel troops established a provisional government in Nanjing the following year under Dr. Sun Yatsen ... Sun negotiated with Beiyang commander Yuan Shikai to bring an end to the Qing and reunify China.


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/History_of_the_Republic_of_China
	On January 1, 1912, Sun officially declared the establishment of the Republic of China and was inaugurated in Nanjing as the first Provisional President. However, power in Beijing already had passed to Yuan Shikai, who had effective control of the Beiyang Army, the most powerful military force in China at the time. To prevent civil war and possible foreign intervention from undermining the infant republic, Sun agreed to Yuan's demand for China to be united under a Beijing government headed by him. On March 10, in Beijing, Yuan Shikai was sworn in as the second Provisional President of the Republic of China.


https://www.britannica.com/biography/Song-Jiaoren
	Song Jiaoren...became one of the leading members of the Tongmenghui (“United League”), the newly organized revolutionary party of the Chinese nationalist leader Sun Yat-sen.

	After the Chinese Revolution of 1911 the former military commander Yuan Shikai became president of the new Chinese republic, and Song was one of the four Tongmenghui members invited to join the new cabinet. Song objected to Yuan’s autocratic methods, however, and he soon resigned his post.


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/History_of_the_Republic_of_China
	The republic which Sun Yat-sen and his associates envisaged evolved slowly. Although there were many political parties vying for supremacy in the legislature, the revolutionists lacked an army, and soon Yuan Shikai's power began to outstrip that of parliament. Yuan revised the constitution on his own and became dictatorial.


https://www.coloradohistoricnewspapers.org/cgi-bin/colorado?a=d&d=THD19130724-01.2.5&e=-------en-20--1--txt-txIN--------0-#A
	Herald Democrat, July 24, 1913
	One Bloody Battle Fought at Shanghai--Sun Yat Sen Heads Movement.

	New Republic is Toppling

	Peking, July 24.--The government professes to view the revolutionary movement in the south without alarm. The southern troops from Nanking, known as the "Punish Yaun" expedition have suffered a fresh reverse and retreated from Suchow Fu and taken up a strong position at Linhwaikwan...

	President Yuan Shi Kai's firm determination to suppress the rebellion is restoring confidence among the wavering Chinese and has elicited the approval of all the legations with the exception of the Russian and the Japanese. 

	...The Peking correspondent of the Daily Telegraph sends the following dispatch:
	
	"The Declaration of martial law here shows that the northern government admits its desperate position. This synchronizes with the creation of a complete complete confederate government at Nanking. Parliament has not yet been dissolved, but it is unlikely that it will survive a week.

	...The problem is insoluble save by the fall of the present regime.

	Dr. Sun Yat Sen, the former provisional president, issued a manifesto tonight irrevocably backing the rebellion. He makes three appeals, the first to Yuan Shi Kai, recounting the southern grievances and declaring that just resistance to intolerable tyranny is no rebellion. He concludes:

	'I am determined to oppose you as firmly as I did the Manchus. Retirement absolutely is your only course, in the face of the present crisis.'

 
https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Song_Jiaoren
	Song spoke out against the increasing authoritarianism of China's provisional president, Yuan Shikai, and expressed concerns towards Yuan’s indications that he would like to restore a monarchical system to China with himself as emperor. In January 1, 1912, the Republic of China was established in Nanjing. Song was appointed to reform China's legal system, and he drafted a provisional constitution, the "Republic of China Interim Government Organization Act."

	China's first election campaign

	Song Jiaoren was only thirty years old when he was tasked by Sun Yat-sen to organize the Kuomintang for China's first democratic election campaign, in 1912. In the 1912 election campaign, Song proved to be a naturally skilled political organizer


https://www.britannica.com/biography/Song-Jiaoren
	Song Jiaoren, Wade-Giles romanization Sung Chiao-jen

	...Hoping to create a political party that could capture a workable majority of the seats in the new National Assembly, Song merged the old Tongmenghui with several smaller political parties and formed the Nationalist Party. After an intensive campaign, the election early in 1913 gave the Nationalists 269 of the 596 seats in the National Assembly. Most observers expected Song to become premier of a new cabinet and a strong rival of Yuan for power.


https://books.google.com/books?id=Kc4iBQAAQBAJ&pg=PA404
	By Charles Emmerson

	When the results began to be announced in January 1913, it was clear that the Kuomintang had won the bulk of support of China’s forty million electors. In the end, the party took 269 out of 596 seats in the new National Assembly. China had, it appeared, taken a giant step towards popular democracy.

	...Not untypical of the euphoria in some quarters was Ching Chun Wang’s article at the beginning of 1913 on the pages of The Atlantic

	..."The Chinese millions have given the world the greatest revolution of modern times in the most civilized manner known to history. We have emancipated ourselves from the imperial yoke, not by brute force but by sheer reasoning and unparalleled toleration. Within the amazingly short period of four months, and without shedding over one hundredth part of the blood that has been shed in other similar revolutions, we have transformed our immense country from an empire of four thousand years’ standing into a modern democracy … Now we come forward with hands and hearts open to join the sisterhood of nations"


https://books.google.com/books?id=OlUzAQAAMAAJ&pg=PA107
	The American Charge d'Affaires to the Secretary of State
	Peking, April 1, 1913.

	Sir: I have the honor to report that there has been considerable agitation in political circles for ten days past, due for the most part to the recent assassination of Sung Chiao-jen.

	...He was credited with the authorship of the policy, advocated by that party, which demanded a responsible cabinet composed of members of the party or parties controlling the National Assembly. He had endeavored to have this policy adopted by the Provision Government. President Yuan, it is alleged by Sung's friends, had repeatedly declared that he would not be President with Sung for Premier.

	The Kuo Ming Tang is now busily engaged in circulating certain reports of alleged occurrences, which, as circumstantial evidence, tend to fasten the crime of Sung's assassination upon the President and his Cabinet. The whole country is excited by these reports and the prophets of evil are adding to the unrest by their predictions of impending trouble.

	Mr. Sung had been attending a conference of his party at Shanghai and on the evening of the 20th of March he started for Peking in company with other members of the forthcoming National Assembly. While waiting to take the train at the Shanghai station, he was shot by one We Fu-ming, who easily escaped in the excitement occasioned by the crime and took refuge in the French Concession.

	...It seems incredible that the President could have any knowledge of the plot to assassinate Sung, since he could not have deceived himself into believing that such an attack upon the leader of the opposition would not at once place the Government under suspicion and weaken his hold upon the country. He has proved himself an astute politician in the past and could undoubtedly have compassed Sung's defeat without resorting to such measures. It is not impossible, however, that some overzealous follow of Yuan may have thought he was aiding the President's cause by planning such a crime.


https://books.google.com/books?id=Kc4iBQAAQBAJ&pg=PA405
	By Charles Emmerson

	But most suspected that the order for the assassination came from much higher up: perhaps even from President Yuan Shikai himself. ‘It is not impossible that some over-zealous follower of Yuan may have thought he was aiding the President’s cause by planning such a crime’, an American diplomat in Shanghai noted, hedging his bets.


https://books.google.com/books?id=OlUzAQAAMAAJ&pg=PA107
	The American Charge d'Affaires to the Secretary of State
	Peking, April 1, 1913.

	...But it is not at all necessary to implicate any of Yuan's follows in order to account for the murder of Sung. The Nationalist Party is a conglomeration of a number of small parties ...and the resort to such a crime is not at all surprising when one reflects that the revolutionists for years past have preached and practiced assassination.	


http://www.historytoday.com/jonathan-fenby/chinese-democracy-silencing-song
	Chinese Democracy: The Silencing of Song

	By Jonathan Fenby

	The Yuan administration tried to blame the assassination on internal Kuomintang feuds, conjuring up an unknown organisation called the Women’s Assassination Group. But Ying was an immediate suspect and was arrested as he was smoking opium in a brothel. Police found the exchange of telegrams with Peking in his house, together with the murder weapon. There was also an incriminating letter from the prime minister, who soon stepped down on the grounds that he was suffering from toothache; he died of poisoning the next year. Wu was arrested and also died of poisoning while awaiting trial. Ying escaped to Peking but was stabbed to death soon afterwards in a railway compartment.


https://books.google.com/books?id=pJAuljtpbxYC&pg=PA226
	The two suspects, Ying Guixin and Wu Shiying, were in custody of the police of the International Settlement and preliminary hearings were held at the Mixed Court. After repeated requests by the Chinese government and the Chinese press, the two men were turned over to the Chinese authorities in Shanghai to be tried at the Shanghai District Court. The families of the two men hired two lawyers, but were told by Cheng Dequan, the governor of Jiangsu, that with such overwhelming evidence, neither party needed a lawyer. Within a few days Wu Shiying died mysteriously in the barracks where the two men were detained.


https://twitter.com/JonathanFenby/status/800981606840213504
	#Trump to quit #TPP. No surprise but opens space for #China. #Xi already set out stall at #APEC.


https://twitter.com/JonathanFenby/status/802556598073729024
	As Trump pulls in the horns, #China leaps in


https://twitter.com/JonathanFenby/status/830763484770103301
	new edition of my book on whether china will dominate the world now out completely redone for xi jinping years


https://twitter.com/JonathanFenby/status/783318092847968257
	Is the world becoming Easternized? LSE tonight.

	The decline of the west in the new Asian Century?


http://www.propornot.com/p/the-list.html
	infowars.com ... globalresearch.ca ... commondreams.org ... rt.com ... zerohedge.com


https://www.infowars.com/how-china-will-take-over-the-world/
	How China Will Take Over The World

	Find out why China may take America's position as the world's economic and geopolitical leader


https://www.infowars.com/40-ways-that-china-is-beating-america/
	40 Ways That China Is Beating America


http://www.globalresearch.ca/china-s-rise-in-the-world-economy-and-the-erosion-of-u-s-hegemony/10173
	China’s Rise in the World Economy and the Erosion of U.S. Hegemony


https://twitter.com/JonathanFenby/status/832962568859815937
	#China gets tougher on #NKorea - could #Xi be shifting to fill another #Trump vacuum?


http://www.zerohedge.com/news/2017-04-12/china-threatens-north-korea-never-seen-measures-if-they-dont-de-escalate
	In other words, China may be just waiting for Trump to "decapitate" the North Korean regime, to pounce and immediately fill the power vacuum.


https://uk.finance.yahoo.com/video/china-setting-itself-reassuring-power-085800967.html
	China setting itself up as 'the reassuring power': Expert

	Jonathan Fenby, chairman of the China service at TS Lombard, discusses how China is repositioning itself on the world's stage following the rise of populist U.S. President Trump.


https://www.commondreams.org/news/2017/04/24/china-warns-unhinged-trump-stop-making-matters-worse-north-korea
	China Warns Unhinged Trump to Stop Making Matters Worse With North Korea


https://www.pri.org/stories/2012-04-13/economy-underpins-power-transition-political-scandal-china
	Jonathan Fenby, a contributor to The New York Times and author on Chinese economics, said the Bo affair shows a lot about how China was working.

	"Bo Xilai was a fast-rising ... rockstar of Chinese politics," Fenby said. "He was aiming for the very top, the Standing Committee of the Politburo of the Chinese Communist Party."

	Those are the nine men who run China. This fall, six or seven of those nine men will be replaced. Bo..., Fenby said, aimed to take over the internal security operations.

	That would have made him extremely powerful.


http://www.trustedsources.co.uk/blogs/china/the-bo-xilai-case-line-up-the-suspects-and-protect-the-politburo
	Jonathan Fenby

	One of the fascinating elements in Bo Xilai’s fall has been just that – the extensive intrigue surrounding China’s most dramatic political story of this century. As we have argued previously, the political demise of the Chongqing boss has to be seen in the context of Communist Party elite politics.


http://www.zerohedge.com/news/2017-03-02/marine-le-pen-stripped-eu-parliament-immunity-tweeting-pictures-islamic-state-violen

	Le Pen is under investigation in France for posting three graphic images of Islamic State executions

	...The most likely outcome of what many have blasted as a politically-motivated decision


http://www.zerohedge.com/news/2017-03-05/white-house-asks-congress-probe-if-obama-ordered-wiretaps
	as part of investigations into Russian attempts to influence the election, the White House is requesting that the congressional intelligence committees probe whether "executive branch investigative powers were abused in 2016", a strong hint that Congress should look into Obama bugged Trump.

	“Reports concerning potentially politically motivated investigations immediately ahead of the 2016 election are very troubling,” Spicer tweeted.


https://www.ft.com/content/123523a7-45ca-3f75-872c-ddab5416fcda
	By Jonathan Fenby

	What does the Bo Xilai drama tell us about China today?

	The affair is not a matter of factional politics as some maintain. It is, in fact, the opposite – a case of a rogue element (Bo) falling foul of the established factions (Hu Jintao’s Youth League group and the Princelings under Xi Jinping) who can now close ranks and share out the spoils of the coming leadership transition.


http://www.marketwatch.com/story/much-at-stake-in-epic-china-power-struggle-2012-04-20
	I contacted old China hand Jonathan Fenby, former editor of the South China Morning Post. He’s a managing director of the China team at research firm Trusted Sources and wrote an indispensable history, “Modern China.” 

	...In a phone interview and follow-up email, Fenby said Bo’s downfall is part of an epic power struggle between two factions


http://www.newstatesman.com/politics/2015/06/what-west-should-know-about-xi-jinping-china-s-most-powerful-leader-mao
	By Jonathan Fenby

	In targeting high-profile “tigers” such as the maverick Politburo member Bo Xilai, who was sentenced to life in prison in 2013, and the former security chief Zhou Yongkang, who was given a life sentence on 11 June, Xi has shown that nobody is safe though powerful vested interests are bound to oppose him. (Besides being found guilty of corruption, Zhou was accused of divulging secret documents to his spiritual guru, who claims supernatural powers. A brief video of his sentencing showed a man who was once one of the PRC’s most powerful figures, his previously black hair turned white, evidently from having hair dye denied to him in detention.) Close associates of Hu Jintao and his immediate predecessor, Jiang Zemin, have been detained; the campaign has also swatted tens of thousands of less eminent “flies” and induced a widespread atmosphere of fear.


http://www.globalresearch.ca/tremor-within-the-chinese-communist-party/5311018
	There are, of course, certain conflicts within the bureaucracy that cannot be reduced directly to class interests or questions relating to political orientation, conflicts that may simply be attributed to personal or small group interests.

	...we have witnessed the outbreak of the most severe conflict of the last three decades within the CCP bureaucracy. This conflict came out into the open in March this year with the purge of Bo Xilai, party secretary for Chongqing, and certainly goes beyond turf wars of the ordinary kind. It reflects, on the one hand, the deep fault lines within the Chinese bureaucracy


https://www.infowars.com/china-returns-to-show-trials-of-1950s-and-60s-legal-experts-say/
	Since Xi’s inauguration, China’s television audiences in August 2013 witnessed the trial of fallen Communist Party up-and-comer Bo Xilai, whose father was publicly denounced during his own fall from grace with Mao’s administration in 1968. Other civil servants of all stripes also have been publicly purged or have made publicized confessions.


https://www.commondreams.org/views/2012/06/21/ai-weiwei-live-your-life-fear-worse-losing-your-freedom
	Reflect on Bo Xilai's case, Chen Guangcheng's and mine. We are three very different examples: you can be a high party member or a humble fighter for rights or a recognized artist. The situations are completely different but we all have one thing in common: none of us have been dealt with through fair play, open trials and open discussion. China has not established the rule of law and if there is a power above the law there is no social justice. Everybody can be subjected to harm.


https://www.theguardian.com/world/2013/aug/12/neil-heywood-mother-china-help
	The mother of the British businessman murdered by the wife of Chinese politician Bo Xilai has broken her silence, urging Beijing to show compassion and end the family's nightmare.


http://www.telegraph.co.uk/news/worldnews/asia/china/10210546/Bo-Xilai-blocked-investigation-into-Neil-Heywood-death.html
	Bo Xilai 'blocked investigation into Neil Heywood death' 


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Bo_Xilai#Organized_crime
	However, Bo's campaign was criticized for running roughshod over judicial due process and eroding the rule of law. Individuals targeted in the campaign were arbitrarily detained by the authorities, with an estimated 1,000 being sent to forced labor. Lawyers for the accused were intimidated and harassed, and in at least one case, sentenced to 18 months in prison. Allegations also surfaced over the use of torture to extract confessions. Moreover, assets seized during the campaign were allegedly redirected to help pay for Bo's popular social housing programs. The Wall Street Journal reported that $11 billion went into government coffers through the campaign. Li Jun, a fugitive businessman, asserted that he became a target of Bo anti-corruption drive as a result of a land dispute with the government. When he refused government demands to give up the land, he claims that he was abducted and tortured, and that $700 million worth of assets in his business were seized


http://www.historytoday.com/jonathan-fenby/chinese-democracy-silencing-song
	By Jonathan Fenby

	Wu shot at Song with a Browning revolver. The politician was rushed to a hospital where the doctors were told to wait for official permission from Peking to operate. By the time this came, peritonitis had set in. Song died the following morning. A western woman doctor said he could have been saved if she had been able to act immediately.

	...Chinese society remained rooted in its traditions; modern ideas about politics did spread among the intellectual elite but had a limited influence. The 1913 election had been an experiment on which much building would have been needed, not least in evolving the rule of law.


http://www.marketwatch.com/story/much-at-stake-in-epic-china-power-struggle-2012-04-20
	Fenby expects change, too, but more incrementally. 

	...“But never underestimate the power of the status quo,” he emailed me. In his new book, he emphasized the continuity of Chinese political culture over thousands of years.

	“But, for all the disruption over the centuries, the leadership — whether Imperial, Nationalist or Communist — has been loath to embrace reform of the ruling system and successive regimes have borne considerable similarities stretching back to the First Emperor,” he wrote.

	...So, let’s hope this purge and power struggle result in real reform, which would be good for everybody. But let’s not get our hopes too high. In China, the more things change, the more they stay the same. 


https://books.google.com/books?id=HopCAAAAYAAJ&pg=PA513
	Annals and Memoirs of the Court of Peking (from the 16th to the 20th Century)
	By Sir Edmund Backhouse

	Those who have followed the course of events in the Far East ... must have been struck by the general, almost unanimous concurrence of opinion, expressed in Europe and America alike, that, with the establishment of a Republican form of government, China had undergone a sudden and radical transformation; that the essential qualities of the people had been completely changed ...Students of history and sociological science are familiar with this persistent and imperishable delusion.

	...The idea of changing the social structure of a race, not to say human nature, by virtue of the Republican form of government, is one of the commonest manifestations of this perennial delusion.

	...despotic authority remains necessary for the maintenance of law and order amongst peoples incapacitated by their character and circumstances from acquiring representative institutions.

	...all human experience and biological science proclaim, nevertheless, with one voice, that the racial instincts which find their expression in China's social and political systems can only be modified by a very slow process of evolution.

	...The annals upon which we have drawn reveal on every page the truth, that this people understands and accepts the government of a despot ... let him not disturb those silent depths wherein lie all the moral and social experience of the race.


https://books.google.com/books?id=IqpFfU-AVrUC&pg=PA503
	By E. Backhouse

	As regards Russia's position in the matter, he was of opinion that China had earned the contempt of the whole world by allowing herself to be so easily intimidated.

	...Russia had been weakened by her war with Turkey, and the life of her Sovereign was daily threatened by Nihilists. He was therefore of opinion that she could by no means fight a successful war against China.


http://www.smithsonianmag.com/history/cixi-the-woman-behind-the-throne-22312071/
	The image of Cixi as a cruel and greedy tyrant gained historical traction in 1910, when Backhouse and another British journalist, J.O.P. Bland, published the book China Under the Empress Dowager. It was praised at the time for being a thoroughly researched biography, but as Seagrave notes, Backhouse forged many of the documents he cited.


https://alchetron.com/Empress-Dowager-Cixi-1163208-W
	Backhouse was later found to have forged some of his source materials when he wrote this work. This is a book that gave rise to much of the negative perspective of the dowager empress.


http://campcatatonia.org/article/1184/hugh-trevor-roper-on-sir-edmund-backhouse
	In 1910 he wangled a contract to be the agent of the great shipbuilding firm of John Brown & Co. By 1916 his “negotiations” with the Chinese government led the firm to produce “estimates and designs for six coastal-defence vessels of 10,400 tons for the Chinese navy.” But just then Backhouse disappeared from Peking and the deal evaporated.

	Meantime he had pursued his great Chinese arms caper: in 1915, he became a secret agent for the British minister, Sir John Jordan, to purchase arms privately in China for use in Europe against Germany. The demand came from the War Office and Lord Kitchener himself. Backhouse, being so well connected in both Britain and China, seemed the logical choice to take sole charge of this delicate matter ...Soon he reported success in locating hundreds of thousands of Mauser and Mannlicher rifles, hundreds of Krupp machine guns and field guns, all stashed away by local generals. He negotiated busily far and wide. Arms were “shipped” down the Yangtze. Deal followed deal. Money came from England. Vessels with arms left Shanghai for Hong Kong. Sir Edward Grey at the Foreign Office offered to ask Japan to send a cruiser to convoy them. The ships stopped at Foochow, but were rerouted and delayed at Canton.

	Jordan, at the height of his career as the most powerful and knowledgeable diplomat in China, finally went directly to get action from President Yuan Shihk’ai, but Yuan inscrutably “professed complete ignorance of the whole transaction.” So circumstantially had Backhouse built up his fantasy in secret reports and cypher cables, including even German “diplomatic protests” to Yuan, that it took some time for the Foreign Office to become unmesmerized. Jordan had Backhouse tell the whole story to the top government fixer-financier, Liang Shih-i, who was amazed and said he thought Backhouse had been duped. Jordan reported “there has evidently been a split between Liang and the party with which Backhouse was working.” So strong was Backhouse’s plausibility! Only by degrees did Jordan conclude it had all been a hoax


https://books.google.com/books?id=4sl3PwAACAAJ
	As late as 1937 the Foreign Minister wrote personally to thank him (Backhouse) for some supposed service, and the next year his undocumented but circumstantial ‘solution’ of a mysterious murder which had baffled the police

	...the victim was Pamela Werner, the adopted daughter of a retired British consul resident in Peking. Backhouse sent his ‘solution’ to the consul ... This ‘solution’ brought him great credit. It was afterward cited by Hoeppli as evidence of Backhouse’s remarkable intelligence-network.


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Sir_Edmund_Backhouse,_2nd_Baronet
	His biographer, Hugh Trevor-Roper, unmasked Backhouse as "a confidence man with few equals"

	...Derek Sandhaus, the editor of Backhouse's memoirs Décadence Mandchoue, argues that they are also an undoubted confabulation but contain plausible recollections of scenes and details.


http://www.theworldofchinese.com/2012/07/the-infamous-sir-edmund-backhouse/
	And that wasn’t the only detail Roper got wrong, according to Sandhaus, calling into question Roper’s condemnation of Backhouse’s moral integrity. He writes of how Backhouse worked with a group of Manchus to rescue huge quantities of historical artifacts from the Summer Palace ...He was apprehended at the scene by Russian troops and arrested, but still...


https://books.google.com/books?id=HopCAAAAYAAJ&pg=PA185
	By Sir Edmund Backhouse

	Inferior to the European in many things that make for intellectual and material progress, the Oriental in general, and the Chinese in particular, can claim superiority in this, that in remaining near to nature, he has escaped the shameful hypocrisies and conventional falsehoods, which play so large a part in the social systems of the Western World. Admitted, that the East's immemorial acceptance of polygamy...

	...The history of China, ancient and modern, is a serious of paroxysms; its keynote is bloodshed and famine, periods of peace and prosperity purchased by the slaughter of countless innocents. Its splendid civilization, based on an unassailable moral philosophy and the canons of the Sages has ever proved powerless against the inexorable laws of nature, against the pitiless cruelty of the struggle for life, intensified by a social system which inculcates procreative recklessness and passive fatalism. Under Mongols, Mings and Manchus the stern retributive law and its fulfilment have ever been the same, history always repeating itself, at the passing of dynasties, with fearful monotony of wholesale massacres.


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Sir_Edmund_Backhouse,_2nd_Baronet
	...Peking, during that period of World War II, was occupied by Imperial Japan, with whom Britain was at war from 1941. By then Backhouse's political views were fascist and he became a Japanese collaborator who wished fervently for an Axis victory


https://books.google.com/books?id=Kc4iBQAAQBAJ
	By Charles Emmerson

	China had, it appeared, taken a giant step towards popular democracy.

	...Not untypical of the euphoria in some quarters was Ching Chun Wang’s article at the beginning of 1913 on the pages of The Atlantic, which attempted to convince an American audience that now was the time to diplomatically recognise the new China

	...Others were distinctly more sceptical. One of them was Edmund Backhouse, probably the most famous British expert on China and a resident in Peking. ...Old wine in new bottles, he argued in a book written in 1913 with former Times journalist and Shanghai man-about-town John Otway Bland. The republic would not last

	...Students of history, he wrote, were familiar with ‘the imperishable vitality of this Utopian fallacy’. ...His prognosis was that tradition and authority – ‘throne and court’ – would reassert themselves in some shape or form, and indeed that this would be best for China’s future development. The events of the year seemed to support the case. On 20 March 1913 Song Jiaoren, leader of the Kuomintang party and premier-elect, was shot twice in Shanghai railway station


http://www.smithsonianmag.com/history/cixi-the-woman-behind-the-throne-22312071/
	George Morrison's dispatches from Peking in the late 1890s and early 1900s were the only glimpse most Westerners got inside the Forbidden City. He wasn't a bad reporter, but he made the mistake of listening to a young man named Edmund Backhouse, an Oxford-trained linguist who contributed to many of Morrison's articles. As other sources—including Morrison's own diary—later revealed, much of Backhouse's "reporting" was utter fiction. But by the time Morrison realized this, it would have damaged his own reputation too much to reveal the truth.


https://books.google.com/books?id=lRutfJcvOEgC&pg=PA110
	The Correspondence of G. E. Morrison 1912-1920

	The conflict between the old forces centered on Yuan Shih-k'ai in the North and the republicans in the South come into the open with the murder of Sung Chiao-jen. ...A fervent advocate of parliamentary democracy who placed great faith in ousting Yuan and his military clique by constitutional means

	...Yuan was disturbed by Sung and his colleagues who, with a good deal of noise, vowed to overthrow his regime. Hence the murder of Sung


https://www.cnas.org/publications/blog/5-questions-with-someone-interesting-charles-emmerson
	5 Questions with Someone Interesting: Charles Emmerson

	CP: ...the U.S. Coast Guard’s only fully working icebreaker, the Polar Star, has engine trouble and will not be functional until early next year. What does this mean for the United States or globally?

	CE: Well it’s interesting. For a long time the United States has not cared much, or not appeared to care very much, about its capacity in the Arctic. ...But there’s been a sort of crescendo for the last couple of years, people saying “Well, Canada’s getting interested, Russia’s getting interested. What’s the U.S. doing?” And the answer to that question has been: not very much.

	...That may have been a wakeup call within the Coast Guard that the U.S. doesn’t have very much capacity

 	...I think it’s interesting to note the extraordinary disparity between the number of ice breakers that for example Russia has and the U.S.

	...So, you can see that the U.S. has sort of fallen behind


https://www.rt.com/op-edge/321560-arctic-race-us-russia/
 	'Arctic ice breaker: Russia leads America, 27-1' 

	Russia is so far ahead of the US in the Arctic, so the idea of a competition or a new race to conquer the Arctic simply doesn’t exist, James Carden, executive editor at the American Committee for East-West Accord told RT. 


http://www.zerohedge.com/news/2017-01-30/russia-launches-biggest-arctic-military-expansion-fall-ussr
	Russia Launches Biggest Arctic Military Expansion Since Fall Of USSR

	"History is repeating itself," Vladimir Blinov, a guide on board the icebreaker Lenin, which is named after communist revolutionary Vladimir Lenin, told a recent tour group. "Back then (in the 1950s) it was the height of the Cold War and the United States was leading in some areas. But we beat the Americans and built the world's first nuclear ship (the Lenin).

	...The build-up has been noticed in Washington. U.S. Defense Secretary James Mattis, in a written submission following his confirmation hearing, described Moscow's Arctic moves as "aggressive steps" and pledged to prioritize developing a U.S. strategy

	...For Russia, the issue of militarizing the Arctic boils down to a simple equation: we have to do it before others do. 

	...The Arctic, the U.S. Geological Survey estimates, holds oil and gas reserves equivalent to 412 billion barrels of oil, about 22 percent of the world’s undiscovered oil and gas. 


https://www.cnas.org/publications/blog/5-questions-with-someone-interesting-charles-emmerson
	5 Questions with Someone Interesting: Charles Emmerson

	there's certainly an increasing convergence in terms of the idea that climate change is the reality ... although there are still a number of Russian scientists – including at the Arctic and Antarctic Research Institute in St. Petersburg – who argue that the anthropogenic contribution is generally overstated in the West. The argument put to me there was that what we’re now seeing in the Arctic – and there’s no denying that Arctic warming is real – is a blip, and it may actually be overshadowed by a natural cooling effect over time.

	...But in terms of effects, it really depends on who you talk to. Not so much in terms of whether there are impacts, now, of some warming in the Arctic, but in terms of whether these are a good or a bad thing.


http://www.reuters.com/article/food-climatechange-idUSL5N10O4SI20150814
	Global food shortages will become three times more likely as a result of climate change and the international community needs to be ready to respond to price shocks to prevent civil unrest, a joint U.S.-British taskforce warned on Friday.


https://www.infowars.com/antarctic-expeditions-confirm-no-global-warming/
	Antarctic Expeditions Confirm No Global Warming


https://www.infowars.com/heres-why-global-warming-is-complete-b-s/
	Here’s Why Global Warming Is Complete B.S.

	The real agenda the globalists are pushing


https://www.infowars.com/polar-bear-numbers-still-on-the-rise-despite-global-warming/
	Polar Bear Numbers Still On The Rise, Despite Global Warming


https://twitter.com/realdonaldtrump/status/527388136306143232
	Just out - the POLAR ICE CAPS are at an all time high, the POLAR BEAR population has never been stronger. Where the hell is global warming?


https://www.ft.com/content/37204df0-48d2-11df-8af4-00144feab49a
	by: Charles Emmerson

	In 2007 a Russian-led mission planted a flag on the seabed at the North Pole, demonstrating a unique capability and provoking anxiety among other northern powers.

	Russian hydrocarbon production – key for the country’s external influence and domestic stability – is likely to turn north as old fields decline. Europe (including Britain) may find itself increasingly dependent on Arctic gas. 


https://books.google.com/books?id=Kc4iBQAAQBAJ
	By Charles Emmerson

	The hopes, dreams and ambitions of European and American investors and prospectors, and their search for raw materials and for markets, shaped what happened in Persia and in central Asia, in China and in Argentina, in South Africa and in India. 'Capitalism has triumphed all over the world', wrote an exiled Russian Marxist living in Austrian Galicia, Vladimir Lenin.


https://books.google.com/books?id=D8W8ZZcIQrwC&pg=PA54
	By Charles Emmerson

	Today, as Russia seeks to recreate a heroic self-image for itself in the twenty-first century, it is natural for it to return to the glorious success of the Soviet Union, just as the Soviet Union appropriated exploration successes of Imperial Russia.

	...At the time of writing, the U.S Coast Guard had only two functional icebreakers...


http://chinadigitaltimes.net/2012/12/the-song-of-song-death-of-a-revolutionary/
	Gady Epstein

	The song of Song

	The shot that killed Song Jiaoren was not heard around the world. But it might have changed Chinese history.

	Song Jiaoren—30 years old, sporting a Western suit and a wisp of a moustache

	...Song (above, centre) was exultant. A fortune-teller had told him—when he was a fugitive in Japan, plotting a violent end to the Qing dynasty—that he would serve as prime minister for 30 peaceful years. With his Jeffersonian ideals and admiration for Britain’s Parliament, he was ready to change his country’s fate.

	...Who ordered his death? The official inquiry eventually ran cold. 

	The man whom most historians blame, and who benefited most directly from the hit, was the recipient of Song’s dying plea for democracy. President Yuan had no interest in granting that wish. A career soldier who had served the Qing government and negotiated its abdication (to him), Yuan is the cartoon villain of this tale, with the bushy moustache, round open face and slightly overfed build of an indulged monarch.

	He was also canny, ruthless and megalomaniacal. Yuan did not want a strong prime minister, nor did he want the Nationalist Party to write a constitution that would limit his own power. He most certainly did not want democracy—and snuffed it out. In 1915 he tried to restore imperial rule and have himself made emperor. His death in 1916 left a divided country, fought over by warlords and bandits.

	...How far did an assassin’s bullet change China’s destiny—just as the killing of Archduke Franz Ferdinand in Sarajevo soon afterwards changed Europe’s?

	...“The Chinese people can only be governed autocratically; they cannot enjoy freedom.” Perhaps after 50 years, he suggested, “we can give them the books of [Jean-Jacques] Rousseau and tell them about the deeds of [George] Washington.”

	The Chinese people, long yoked by Confucian tradition and insulated from Western influences, may have been unprepared for the radical terminology of liberty.

	...Until then China had been largely ignorant of three centuries of new thinking by the “barbarians” of the West.

	...Song, like many of his generation, found bitter confirmation of Manchu weakness in the news of China’s embarrassing defeat to Japan in 1895. Then 13 years old, he ran off from his family “to wail under a Kusamaki tree”.

	...It was there that substantial numbers of Chinese students learned the language of democracy (the Chinese words for “democracy” and “freedom” were created by Japanese writers using Chinese characters). 

	...He was persistently short of money and took succour in booze and opium.

	But he was clear-eyed enough to distinguish between the documents of the great liberal democracies and those of autocracies such as Prussia and Russia
	
	...What did this first go at democracy look like? Partisans roughed up opposing candidates and activists, carried guns near polling stations to intimidate voters, bought votes with cash, meals and prostitutes

	...“What can one do with a society like this one? I’m really sorry I ever returned.” Disgusted, and believing his opponents had cheated, Liang would temporarily throw in his lot with Yuan’s rule, even as evidence suggested the president had assassinated his chief political rival.

	...Might Song have saved the Republic by living? If he had not been assassinated, some scholars believe, Sun would not have attempted his second revolution, and Yuan would have continued as an incorrigible president with too much power—a disappointing outcome, but not as catastrophic as the country’s slide into anarchy proved to be.

	...There were other turning points to come that might have sealed democracy’s fate, whether or not Song had lived. The Japanese invasion and occupation of China would have wrought havoc in the country under any government, creating an opportunity for, among others, Communist rebels.

	
	http://cdn.static-economist.com/sites/default/files/imagecache/1872-width/images/print-edition/20121222_XSH001_0.jpg


http://www.paulsoninstitute.org/events/2015/11/12/why-chinas-communist-party-endures-gady-epstein-at-paulson-institute/
	Epstein began by sharing stories from his travels as a teen to the Soviet Union

	"Xi has made it plainly obvious that China does not intend to evolve into a western-style system.”


https://books.google.com/books?id=lscqBwAAQBAJ&pg=PA291
	Gady Epstein, an expert on the Chinese information superhighway...


http://fivebooks.com/interview/gady-epstein-on-china-and-the-internet/
	Gady Epstein recommends the best books on China and the Internet

	...It may not be directly advancing democracy in the Western sense

	...From Jiang Zemin to Hu Jintao, to now Xi Jinping, the importance of using the Internet as a tool in their propaganda strategy has become increasingly clear over time. They’ve made it explicit.

	Are there any specific examples? Say the huge protests over the Diaoyu Islands outside the Japanese Embassy last year. Was that the government using the Internet to get people out on the streets?

	In the case of anti-Japanese protests, it’s a little bit more complex than that. In some sense, that is allowing an existing online sentiment to express itself. 


http://view.news.qq.com/original/intouchtoday/n2757.html
https://translate.google.com/translate?hl=en&sl=zh-CN&u=http://view.news.qq.com/original/intouchtoday/n2757.html
	Last night, CCTV "news network", "focus interview" reported "Tsinghua students PX terms of war" story - intention is obvious, the mainstream media hope to use Tsinghua students spontaneous action 


http://view.news.qq.com/original/intouchtoday/n3500.html
https://translate.google.com/translate?hl=en&sl=zh-CN&u=http://view.news.qq.com/original/intouchtoday/n3500.html
	The news of the pollution incident in Changzhou Foreign Language School has not been broken in the past few months, including Xinhua News Agency, the new network and the local Changzhou Daily and other media have follow up, the local government has been rumor, clarification, claiming that "site assessment Standards compliant". Many local users said that the local government has been on the matter has been suppressed attitude and practice


https://www.google.com/search?q=site%3Ahttp%3A%2F%2Fview.news.qq.com%2Foriginal%2Fintouchtoday%2F+%E6%99%AE%E4%BA%AC


http://view.news.qq.com/original/intouchtoday/n2740.html
https://translate.googleusercontent.com/translate_c?depth=1&hl=en&rurl=translate.google.com&sl=zh-CN&sp=nmt4&tl=en&u=http://view.news.qq.com/original/intouchtoday/n2740.html
	Putin revitalized the country, the style of toughness in line with China's nationalist sentiment

	Putin boycotted the West also coincides with the psychology of the Chinese people

	...So not only the media mislead the people, the people also based on their own needs to choose to select Putin

	As mentioned earlier, the Chinese media did not present a complete Putin. 


http://view.news.qq.com/original/intouchtoday/n3012.html
https://translate.google.com/translate?hl=en&sl=zh-CN&u=http://view.news.qq.com/original/intouchtoday/n3012.html
	After a series of turmoil, on March 18 this year, the Crimea region was incorporated into Russia. ...Putin vowed to end this history, his speech from time to time by the participants all cheered, applause Cheers and tears interrupted.

	March 20, the Russian public opinion research center released poll data show that Putin's support rate increased by 15.1% to 75.7%, ...In the eyes of many Russians, Putin is not only a wrist leader, but also a recovery of lost national hero.


http://view.news.qq.com/original/intouchtoday/n2779.html
https://translate.google.com/translate?hl=en&sl=zh-CN&u=http://view.news.qq.com/original/intouchtoday/n2779.html
	On the one hand, corruption news from Putin opponents, the US Treasury in the sanctions statement only with a very conservative description

	In fact, as early as 2007, there are "anti-Putin" Russian political scholars to the "Guardian" revealed that Putin may through the agency relationship, with a large number of Russian oil and gas company shares, worth 40 billion US dollars.

	...On the other hand, Putin's luxury life is legally supported, and private life is airtight, there is no direct evidence to prove its corruption 


http://view.news.qq.com/original/intouchtoday/n2730.html
https://translate.google.com/translate?hl=en&sl=zh-CN&u=http://view.news.qq.com/original/intouchtoday/n2730.html
	Recently, the US State Department published an article "President Putin's fabrication: the Ukrainian 10 fallacy", bluntly, "Russia for its illegal military activities in Ukraine, there is no lack of false, called the novel." And the Russian Foreign Ministry is fighting back "(the US article) is shameless, unguarded in the implementation of the 'double standard'," (the West) notorious objective and democratic value of what? " The two sides so big mouth bickering, what is right and wrong?

 	The radical demonstrations in Ukraine made Russia find the reasons for the intervention

	Ukrainian square movement is no lack of "murder and arson", not completely legal, democratic demonstrations

	...Russia also found the moral and legal reasons for the intervention 

	...The United States on the independence of the Crimea attitude "double standard" suspected

	After the Russian population accounted for the majority of the Crimean shouted independence, Obama said, "I am in this morning signed an administrative order will endanger all Ukrainian sovereignty and territorial integrity of the organization and individuals to impose sanctions for the future referendum of the Crimea Violation of the Ukrainian Constitution is also contrary to international law. 

	...However, many people have pointed out that Kosovo's independence is also a violation of the Serbian constitution, but the United States supports Kosovo's referendum independence, the Serbian government and Russia's opposition turned a deaf ear. 


https://www.google.com/search?q=site%3Ahttp%3A%2F%2Fview.news.qq.com%2Foriginal%2Fintouchtoday%2F+%E6%97%A5%E6%9C%AC


http://view.news.qq.com/original/intouchtoday/n3305.html
https://translate.google.com/translate?hl=en&sl=zh-CN&u=http://view.news.qq.com/original/intouchtoday/n3305.html
	Japan has become a popular destination for Chinese tourists, in addition to shopping, and even physical examination has also become a tourism project

	...However, the so-called "high-tech investigation of cancer" expensive no problem, there are hidden dangers, not recognized by the international mainstream academic community

	...So, to Japan, "high-tech investigation of cancer" in the end what is the benefit? The answer may be two, and have nothing to do with cancer. First, the high panic of cancer to spend money to buy comfort;


http://view.news.qq.com/original/intouchtoday/n2940.html
https://translate.google.com/translate?hl=en&sl=zh-CN&u=http://view.news.qq.com/original/intouchtoday/n2940.html
	Since 1993, the Japanese government formally established a foreigner training system and skills training system.

	Is labor and not labor, training system to go to the Japanese workers become "slave workers" 

	...Trainees' rights are often infringed, and Japan is of course dutyless, and China is also responsible

	The lack of legal system, the reasons for the lack of legal awareness of expatriate workers and other reasons, have caused the expatriate labor service personnel in foreign countries vulnerable to the rights and interests of foreign workers, Violations and defenses.


http://view.news.qq.com/original/intouchtoday/n2840.html
https://translate.google.com/translate?hl=en&sl=zh-CN&u=http://view.news.qq.com/original/intouchtoday/n2840.html
	Abe's collective right of self-defense has even had the possibility of a Japanese military conflict with China and other countries in the South China Sea

	...So what is Abe's desire for collective self-defense? To the security of the idea of the think tank "on the reconstruction of the legal basis for security and security" submitted a report, which put forward some scenarios. One of the typical examples is that if the Strait of Hormuz is blocked by the mines, then Japan can be requested by the United States for demining operations; or the Korean Peninsula, the situation is unstable, when the US warships were attacked, whether there is no Japanese warships, Japan The SDF can fight back the "enemy ship". Although Abe and his thinkers deliberately limited the scope of the United States to such an allies attacked the request of Japan, but people still worried that the collective right of self-defense will actually let Japan have unlimited expansion of self-defense excuse


http://view.news.qq.com/original/intouchtoday/n2655.html
https://translate.google.com/translate?hl=en&sl=zh-CN&u=http://view.news.qq.com/original/intouchtoday/n2655.html
	Recently, the Chinese media have reported, reproduced the "Aoi and other five Japanese people were Japanese media as a traitor" message. However, the Japanese media in Japan, "check the matter." So how did this fake message come from?


http://view.news.qq.com/original/intouchtoday/n2600.html
https://translate.google.com/translate?hl=en&sl=zh-CN&u=http://view.news.qq.com/original/intouchtoday/n2600.html
	China and Japan re-dispute. At the same time, many people are concerned about a news, Korean media reports, the Japanese Self-Defense Force staff believe that the quality of self-defense players far stronger than the Chinese soldiers, because now the Chinese soldiers are mostly "little emperors." How to look at the military quality of the dispute?

	...So the Japanese if the young Chinese soldiers have a lot of "little emperors", in fact, young people in Japan is not so hard-working


http://view.news.qq.com/original/intouchtoday/n2771.html
https://translate.google.com/translate?hl=en&sl=zh-CN&u=http://view.news.qq.com/original/intouchtoday/n2771.html
	People generally hear the civil claims case, basically have a common: litigation filed in Japan. Whether it is mainland China, Taiwan, or South Korea, Southeast Asian countries, whether it is enslaved labor or comfort women filed litigation, lawsuit had to play in Japan So why in this case in 1989, will be able to open trial in Shanghai Maritime Court, and the Japanese companies have to respond to it?

	...Therefore, the "seizure of Japanese merchant ships" although it sounds very rare, domineering, but in fact can not be said to be a "unconventional" situation.


http://view.news.qq.com/original/intouchtoday/n2697.html
https://translate.google.com/translate?hl=en&sl=zh-CN&u=http://view.news.qq.com/original/intouchtoday/n2697.html
	Recently, the Japanese public television station NHK new high-level field still trees openly denied the Nanjing massacre, controversial. ...provides a good perspective for us to interpret the new movements of the right wing of Japan.

	...there have been many diplomatic frictions between China and Japan. Abe has also been criticized again by comparing Sino-Japanese relations with Britain and Germany before the war. But recently the most noteworthy trend, it is Abe single-handedly promote the "NHK right wing."

	...In 1938, Chiang Kai-shek tried to preach Japan's responsibility for the Nanjing Massacre, but all the countries in the world ignored them, and why did they, in the absence of a memorial to the Nanjing Massacre, Because it never happened. " He also claimed that "war states all committed atrocities, so there is no need to tell this kind of thing to the next generation of Japan."

	In fact, has long been denied the Nanjing Massacre, in its Twitter is full of explicit right-wing speech. He roared: "If other countries attack Japan, send the constitutionalists who gave up their wars to the battlefield and let them say to the enemy army: 'There is Article 9 of the Japanese Constitution.'" He has given the people who have served the peace constitution A nickname called "paranoid pacifist", so with Prime Minister Abe. 

	...The Sino-Japanese relations in the plight of the prisoners may also have serious consequences

	As " Japanese militarism has risen again?" "The analysis of the right wing does not mean militarism, denying the Nanjing massacre does not mean that the Japanese right-wing would like to come to a war. But a lot of things are not so controllable, in the territorial issue, in the historical issues, between China and Japan can be said to be faced with a step can not give back the "prisoner's dilemma"


http://view.news.qq.com/original/intouchtoday/n2930.html
https://translate.google.com/translate?hl=en&sl=zh-CN&u=http://view.news.qq.com/original/intouchtoday/n2930.html
	Outside Japan, Doraemon is also popular. According to the Japanese famous comprehensive publishing house school primary school statistics, in the 1970s, Hong Kong and Taiwan appeared "duo A dream" piracy works. After 1991, East Asia, Southeast Asia and Europe became the main export area of Doraemon". In addition, Doraemon animation version in Central and South America, the Arab world and other 35 countries around the world broadcast.

	...Cultural aggression and cultural exchanges, the division of the distinction between the standard to follow, the so-called cultural aggression on the untenable

	What is aggression? What is cultural aggression? ...First, the goal is to learn from each other, or a country to other countries of the enslavement, such as World War II, Japan in its occupied areas of China to promote Japanese education, is to enslave the people in the occupied area, which is typical of cultural aggression; 


http://view.news.qq.com/original/intouchtoday/n3063.html
https://translate.google.com/translate?hl=en&sl=zh-CN&u=http://view.news.qq.com/original/intouchtoday/n3063.html
	To the big said that the Chinese side that the sovereignty of the Diaoyu Islands belong to China, the reason is the case, the Chinese official first discovered the Diaoyu Islands and had to use, are "preemptive."

	And since ancient times, the Chinese people are so aware of. The Eastern Han Dynasty "custom" has had such a record

	...These provisions, with many modern countries, such as Japan, France and so on are the same.


http://fivebooks.com/interview/gady-epstein-on-china-and-the-internet/
	Gady Epstein recommends the best books on China and the Internet

	It is something you’ll see an obsession with from the Party as well. They want to crush rumours, they’re constantly sending out directives against spreading rumours and even arresting people for spreading rumours – as in the supposed “coup attempt” of March 2012. That authoritarian instinct to control rumours is fascinating.


http://www.reuters.com/article/us-china-corruption-special-report-idUSBREA4M00120140523
	He was caught up on the wrong side of a titanic power play, multiple sources say, because of his business partnership with the son of former domestic security chief, Zhou Yongkang. In a campaign unprecedented in modern China, Xi is determined to bring down Zhou for making a behind-the-scenes grab for power, the sources say.

	...Zhou had envisioned himself as the power behind the throne in retirement if and when Bo took over, the sources said. "Zhou Yongkang wanted to be Cixi'," a third source said, referring to the empress dowager of China's last imperial dynasty who ruled from behind the scenes.

	Zhou and Bo also toyed with the idea of Bo becoming premier and ranked number three in the Standing Committee behind President Xi and Li Keqiang, who would have been kicked upstairs and made head of parliament, three sources with ties to the leadership said.

	This scenario never played out. But the leadership was shocked when it learned about the alleged plot, the sources said. It was unclear how it was uncovered. "This would have overturned the 17th congress resolution," one source told Reuters, referring to an unpublicized decision made at the party's five-yearly conclave in 2007 to make Li premier. "It would have been tantamount to a palace coup," a second source said.


http://www.reuters.com/article/us-china-politics-corruption-idUSKBN14I039
	A Chinese general is being investigated for suspected bribery, the defence ministry said on Thursday, a man connected to the jailed former domestic security chief and one of the most senior incumbent military officials to be targeted for graft.

	...As head of the 2.3 million-strong armed forces, President Xi Jinping has made his fight against military corruption a top priority, with officers warning that the problem is so pervasive it could undermine China's ability to wage war at a time when Beijing has increasingly projected its influence in the region and surrounding seas.

	The People's Liberation Army is already reeling from Xi's anti-corruption campaign, which has seen dozens of officers investigated and jailed, including Xu Caihou and Guo Boxiong, both former vice chairmen of the Central Military Commission.

	Xu died of cancer before he could appear in court.

	Wang previously worked closely with former Chinese domestic security tzar Zhou Yongkang, who was jailed for life in 2015 in one of the country's biggest corruption scandals in decades.


http://www.bbc.com/news/world-asia-china-17476760
	Damaging coup rumours ricochet across China

	Damian Grammaticas

	Have you heard? There's been a coup in China! Tanks have been spotted on the streets of Beijing and other cities! Shots were fired near the Communist Party's leadership compound!

	OK, before you get too agitated, there is no coup. To be more exact, as far as we know there has been no attempted coup.


http://www.bbc.com/news/world-asia-china-24177264
	Admiration lingers for Bo Xilai in China's Chongqing

	Damian Grammaticas

	Bo Xilai's own trial in August riveted millions of Chinese. One of the most recognisable and popular politicians in China, he was one of the Communist Party's rising stars. His father had a prominent part in China's revolution. That makes Bo Xilai a Communist Party "princeling", so powerful many believed him almost untouchable.

	Love for Bo

	The court hearings were filled with revelations of infidelity and corruption in Mr Bo's family. There were photos of a secret villa in the south of France. Mr Bo didn't accept the charges meekly as most officials would. He called his wife "crazy", and his former police chief a "liar" for alleging he'd tried to cover up her crime.

	For the Communist Party it was an unedifying, damaging spectacle. But the party wants people to believe it is serious about tackling corruption and this case demonstrates how nobody is above the law, how the courts show no favour to the party's elites. But in Chongqing many believe it was really about eliminating Bo Xilai as a political force.

	...Bo Xilai was transforming Chongqing. As the local Communist Party boss, he oversaw its rise to become one of the fastest growing economic regions of China. He had a reputation as a decisive, effective leader, and despite his downfall, he's still admired in the city.

	Zhang Anhao, a farmer who does part-time labouring jobs in the city, told me: "In Chongqing 80% of us approved of him. Honestly, all the ordinary people and low-level officials supported him. The 20% who didn't were corrupt officials, or thieves and robbers, because Bo cracked down on them. He was good at his job. He was making Chongqing a better place. What we need are more officials like him."

	As he spoke, a woman walking past chimed in: "Chongqing people love Bo Xilai. Some officials just care about keeping their bosses happy. But Bo Xilai worked for the people. Who doesn't support him in Chongqing?"

	Genuinely popular


http://archives.cnd.org/HXWK/author/XIE-Bin/kd091019-2.gb.html
https://translate.google.com/translate?hl=en&sl=zh-CN&u=http://archives.cnd.org/HXWK/author/XIE-Bin/kd091019-2.gb.html
	Bo Xilai is Mao, Deng, Jiang, Hu after a dazzling star. For thousands of years, the people have been in the dark bitter hope that the arrival of Jun, and finally look forward to the people of the great savior Mao Zedong. ...Needless to say, of course, the great hero of China today Bo Xilai. Some people say that Bo Xilai is China's Putin, some people say that he is the mainland's Ma Ying-jeou. Putin Ye Hao, Ma Ying-jeou Ye Hao, anyway, his ability there, who can not block his glory. Bo Xilai deserves to be the brightest star in China's politics today!


http://www.bbc.com/news/world-asia-china-24175779
	Why Bo Xilai was brought down

	...Mr Bo is accused of corruption and covering up the murder of the British businessman Neil Heywood. 

	Mr Bo's wife has already been found guilty of poisoning the Briton, with whom she had a business dispute.

	Mr Bo remains a popular figure. But, as Damian Grammaticas reports from the city of Chongqing, he is almost certain to receive a long jail sentence, with his political rivals determined to use the scandal to end his career. 


http://www.abc.net.au/news/2013-08-23/chinas-bo-xilai-puts-up-defence-against-bribery-charges/4909156
	Fallen Chinese politician Bo Xilai has described his wife as "insane" after his corruption trial heard video testimony from her implicating him in bribery.

	In a pre-recorded interview played to the court, Gu Kailai said she had told her husband about a series of suspicious gifts from businessman Xu Ming.

	Prosecutors allege Bo was offered bribes totalling $3.8 million by the Dalian businessman, in exchange for political favours.


http://web.archive.org/web/20140722203415/http://www.businessinsider.com/what-the-downfall-of-bo-xilai-means-for-china-2012-3
	Initially, Bo Xilai’s open, charismatic style — in sharp contrast to typically stiff Chinese technocrats — made him something of a darling with the foreign media and foreigners in general (a fact that did not necessarily do him any favors with his Chinese peers).  He was perceived as a liberal (in the classical sense), heralding a more accessible and cosmopolitan way of conducting Chinese politics.  He was China’s JFK, and Chongqing was his Camelot.  Gradually, that perception began to shift.  While many in the reform camp welcomed his crackdown on organized crime in Chongqing, they were also dismayed by the heavy-handed, authoritarian methods that were used — more like one gang (Bo’s and/or the Party’s) crushing its rivals than anything resembling “rule of law.”  Then came Bo’s “red culture” campaign, with songs and slogans harkening back to Mao and the Cultural Revolution (despite the fact that Bo’s own family suffered greatly at the hands of the Red Guards). 


https://books.google.com/books?id=TdMavvoQvxwC&pg=PT225
	Tiger Head, Snake Tails: China today, how it got there and why it has to change
	By Jonathan Fenby

	The dramatic fall of his fellow princeling, Bo Xilai, did nothing to impede the culmination of Xi's rise to the top. Despite having made a much-publicized visit in 2010 to laud the Chonqing model, Xi plainly did noting to protect Bo two years later ...In September 2012, when Xi abruptly disappeared from view for two weeks without any explanation, the rumor mill went into overdrive with stories of ailments ranging from back trouble to liver cancer and a heart attack -- or that he had been attacked by Bo's military supporters.


http://www.bbc.com/news/world-asia-china-19553903
	Where is Xi Jinping?
	Damian Grammaticas

	Is Xi Jinping sick? Has he had a mild heart attack? Did he hurt his back playing football or swimming? Is he extraordinarily busy preparing for the day, probably next month, when he will be elevated to take over from Hu Jintao as the head of China's Communist Party, or is there some more sinister power struggle happening?

	All have been suggested as explanations on China's buzzing social media sites.

	It has even been claimed he was injured in a car crash, which was maybe a plot against him. But that seems fanciful.


http://www.telegraph.co.uk/news/worldnews/asia/china/9535613/Xi-Jinping-mystery-deepens-amid-speculation-over-health-of-Chinas-next-president.html
	Analysts have dismissed the most sensational online claims, posted on a US website and subsequently retracted, that Mr Xi had suffered an assassination attempt as part of an internal struggle for power struggle.

	“If that did happen or if the party leadership believed that such an attempt was made I think you would have Beijing crawling with police and security forces,” said Steve Tsang, a China expert from the University of Nottingham.


https://www.usatoday.com/story/news/world/2015/09/01/china-parade-japan-world-war-anniversary/71513302/
	BEIJING — China decided to pull out all the stops for a national celebration of its role in World War II — its first since the conflict ended 70 years ago this week.

	...This nation also views the end of the war as the end of a "century of humiliation," a period when China was too weak to stop imperial powers such as Russia, Britain and Germany from intervening in its affairs.

	...“First and foremost this parade is for the domestic audience,” said Steve Tsang, head of the School of Contemporary Chinese Studies at the University of Nottingham in England. “The legitimacy of the party is based on the narrative of leading the country to victory. It doesn’t matter that that version of events doesn’t bear any resemblance to reality.”


https://www.rt.com/op-edge/china-snowden-cause-trouble-554/
	China is not going to open its doors to Snowden, though him releasing the information was incredibly useful for the Chinese government, Steve Tsang, director of China Policy Institute, told RT. 

	...RT:But now the Chinese authorities seem to be quite loyal to the leak. Otherwise why would they choose to speak out, while he was on their territory in Hong Kong?

	ST: It was incredibly useful windfall for the Chinese government, when Mr. Snowden spoke out. And the fact, that he spoke out from a Chinese territory and making it clear, that one of those countries, what was being spied on was China and that include even a Chinese University. That was just really useful for the Chinese government to counter the American claims of Chinese cyber espionage against the US.

	RT:But do you think that some of the Edward Snowden’s revelations actually worked in China's favor?

	ST: He was certainly worked in China's favor, because the reality is that: in this world, everybody, who’s got a capability spies on everybody else.

	The issue really is: who can claim the moral high ground? The United States has been claiming that moral high ground while at least until Mr. Snowden made his revelations, which really weakened the Americans claims to the moral high ground. And this is what became so useful from the Chinese perspective.


http://www.thedailybeast.com/articles/2014/01/03/snowden-lied-about-china-contacts.html
	Snowden’s Beijing Benefactors?
	There's evidence that Snowden may have lied about his contacts with China.


http://www.thedailybeast.com/author/gordon-g-chang


http://www.politico.com/blogs/politico-now/2013/06/cheney-snowden-is-a-traitor-possibly-chinese-spy-166329
	Cheney: Snowden is a 'traitor,' possibly Chinese spy


https://twitter.com/realdonaldtrump/status/344142983848923136
	A coincidence that the NSA leaker is living openly in Hong Kong?! At the same time the Chinese Pres. met with Obama in CA.


https://twitter.com/realdonaldtrump/status/346993964483743746
	Snowden is sitting in China and taunting the U.S. He is mocking us as a Country. Great time to place a tax on China trade if not turned over


https://www.rt.com/news/china-power-transition-185/
	As for domestic issues, people in Beijing expect the new government to deliver on promised reforms.  The prevailing sentiment seems to be a hope for more democratization, and more equality.

	...However, the new political elite will likely do little to increase freedoms in the country, according to the China expert Steve Tsang. 

	“Essentially what you believe as political reform that will lead to some kind of democratization is not what the Chinese leaders are thinking about,” Tsang told RT. “They are committed to reform in the political arena in order to strengthen the capacity of the communist party to stay in power. And in so far as that goes, they are sincere about reform, but not in terms of democratization.”


https://www.forbes.com/sites/stevetsang/2015/02/16/why-chinas-xi-jinping-is-still-far-from-chairman-mao-status/
	Why China's Xi Jinping Is Still Far From Chairman Mao Status

	Steve Tsang

	The Party has tightened its grip on Chinese society and free speech. The defining policy of Xi’s leadership, after two years as president, is an unrelenting and far-reaching crackdown on corruption among Party officials. The focal point of the clean-up campaign is the fall of former security chief Zhou Yongkang, the most senior leader in Communist Party history to face criminal investigation for corruption.


https://www.theguardian.com/commentisfree/2012/mar/15/bo-xilai-china-analysis
	Professor Steve Tsang

	Bo Xilai is down, but is he out? No one outside the inner core of the Chinese Communist party leadership knows for sure. Perhaps even those inside do not yet know. The future of Bo, until Thursday the powerful party secretary of Chongqing, is still being decided. He has not lost membership of the politburo and is not officially under arrest – at least not yet. But why is his downfall, or at least his disgrace, being played out in slow motion?

	It is all about the political system and the nature of politics in the People's Republic, which is consultative Leninist in nature. To bring someone as senior and powerful as Bo down is highly painful for the party, which is the establishment in China. Factional divisions and interest groups within the party mean that delicate negotiation and balancing need to be undertaken before the fate of someone like Bo can be decided. It is not up to General Secretary Hu Jintao and Premier Wen Jiabao, while the general public can only be spectators.

	...Bo is the only truly charismatic top-level leader China has had since Deng Xiaoping died in 1997.


http://www.bbc.com/news/world-asia-china-19553903
	Where is Xi Jinping?
	Damian Grammaticas

	And if Mr Xi is about to take over as China's leader for the next 10 years his health is an issue that is significant for the Communist Party, for China and for the rest of the world.


http://fivebooks.com/interview/gady-epstein-on-china-and-the-internet/
	Gady Epstein recommends the best books on China and the Internet

	They’re even worried about non-seditious rumours?

	Yes, anything that might lead to instability or panic. They were concerned about the rumours about salt-buying after Fukushima happened. There were rumours that you needed to get salt and there was a rush on salt. At that time they mobilized people to counteract those rumours, saying the rumours were false. They don’t have to be seditious, they see rumours as inherently worrisome. Of course the notion of trying to chase down every rumour in the age of the Internet seems Sisyphean, but this is actually an ancient instinct of Chinese Empire…


https://www.infowars.com/japanese-nuclear-meltdown-means-detrimental-health-effects-worldwide/
	After repeated denials by the Japanese Government insisting that radiation leakage from their nuclear power plants was a non-issue, recent video and reported evidence confirms the horrific truth. Japan is now preparing for the worst case scenario evacuating hundreds of thousands of people. The radioactive release may soon reach Canada and the United States and exposure may last months.

	Is Radioactive Poison Prevention Possible?

	Supplements such as kelp and potassium iodide do have a preventative effect on the thyroid

	...Potassium iodide (also called KI) is a salt of stable (not radioactive) iodine. 


http://www.globalresearch.ca/how-to-reduce-your-risk-of-radiation-from-fukushima/5359613?print=1
	How to Reduce Your Risk of Radiation from Fukushima 

	It is well-known that potassium iodide works to protect against damage from radioactive iodine bysaturating our body (the thyroid gland, specifically) with harmless iodine, so that our bodies are unable to absorb radioactive iodine from nuclear accidents.


http://www.zerohedge.com/article/tepco-stock-implodes-radioactive-iodine-fukushima-seawater-now-3355-above-limit?page=1
	Jesus fucking Christ! My wife is 12 weeks pregnant with our first child. Guess I'd better stock up on salt. 


http://www.wiley.com/WileyCDA/WileyTitle/productCd-0745679277.html
	In this new edition of his widely acclaimed book, renowned China expert Jonathan Fenby shows


https://books.google.com/books?id=TdMavvoQvxwC&pg=PT225
	Tiger Head, Snake Tails: China today, how it got there and why it has to change
	By Jonathan Fenby

	The rare officials who speak out about scandals are usually swiftly gagged.

	...In such a climate panic spreads easily. After the Japanese nuclear crisis in 2011 Zhejiang province was swept by rumors that contamination was blowing across the sea and that salt could provide protection. Despite government denials that there was anything to fear, mass buying of salt ensued at prices jacked-up by merchants. When salt supplies ran out, people stocked up on salty products such as soy sauce and fermented bean curd. The rumors spread to Beijing and set of panic buying there. It al died down after a while and a man was arrested and fined a small amount for spreading rumors on the Internet. But several newspapers presumed to speculate that the whole affair would not have taken place if people had more trust in statements from the government.


http://alphahistory.com/chineserevolution/dowager-empress-cixi-dragon-lady/
	Cixi was also targeted by Sinophobes in the Western press. Many stories about her were derived from scurrilous and fanciful propaganda written by foreigners, particularly the British baronet and conman Edmund Backhouse. Writing in his 1910 book China under the Empress Dowager, Backhouse claimed that Cixi was a sadistic nymphomaniac who was not averse to ordering an execution if someone happened to annoy her. Backhouse’s main primary source for these stories was the diary of a Qing official, however this manuscript was later proved a forgery.


http://fivebooks.com/interview/gady-epstein-on-china-and-the-internet/
	Gady Epstein recommends the best books on China and the Internet

	Maybe it’s sensible though, if you’re trying to rule so many people.

	Whether or not it’s sensible is an interesting question. Also 2000 years ago, another emperor’s approach was to actually collect information from rumours.


https://twitter.com/gadyepstein/status/848610869416255488
	Interesting footnote to Kushner-China: I hear Chinese ambassador's initial conduit to Kushner was Wendi Deng


https://twitter.com/gadyepstein/status/843294377682391040
	Truly this language from US SoS is precisely like a Chinese statement. I can almost hear official Chinese translator's voice when reading


https://twitter.com/eosnos/status/842026432935165956
	 Gady Epstein Retweeted 

	Donald Trump just made $15.8m sale to Chinese biz linked to military intelligence. Ethics adviser won't comment.


https://twitter.com/gadyepstein/status/841774071864020992
	Kushner a "central player" & "moderating voice" on China, while cutting $400m deal with super-connected Chinese co


https://www.infowars.com/emergency-alert-communist-chinese-now-taking-over-us-media/
	EMERGENCY ALERT: Communist Chinese Now Taking Over US Media
	Alex Jones breaks down how the Communist Chinese are taking over all forms of US media and entertainment

	...Comical. It is ALL a show put on by the Jews to distract attention from the Jews.

	One of the Jews being, Israeli/US Dual Citizen Jared Kushner, firmly dug in to the White House, Privy to all the 'US" Intelligence briefings.


https://www.infowars.com/china-is-the-real-great-satan-americas-1-enemy/
	China Is The Real Great Satan, America’s #1 Enemy

	Trump’s next obstacle is freeing America from China’s shackles


http://fivebooks.com/interview/gady-epstein-on-china-and-the-internet/
	Gady Epstein recommends the best books on China and the Internet

	The more fundamental problems – the deeper cracks in the foundation of the system – persist and get worse. Down the road there could be some crisis or catastrophe or economic crash, that will lead to both social unrest and political uncertainty and quite dicey times


https://books.google.com/books?id=OlUzAQAAMAAJ&pg=PA107
	The American Charge d'Affaires to the Secretary of State
	Peking, April 1, 1913.

	The "Republican Advocate" of Shanghai threatens that Sung's death will be avenged by a reign of terror more frightful than that of the French Revolution. But such talk is easy under the protection of the Foreign Settlement of Shanghai which has always been a city of refuge or, more properly speaking, a cave of Adullam for conspirators against the Government, whether it by Manchu Monarchy, or Chinese Republic.


http://publishing.cdlib.org/ucpressebooks/view?docId=ft7870085f&chunk.id=d0e3969&toc.depth=1&toc.id=&brand=ucpress
	The binge and scandal of the city took in the White Russians; interwar Shanghai would have been unimaginable without them. Few travelers to Shanghai failed to remark on their presence. To do so would be to visit Paris and miss the Eiffel Tower or to tour Hollywood and ignore the studios. Twenty-five thousand of these refugees descended on the city by the late thirties.

	...For many others, however, Shanghai was the last, wretched stop on the line. Shipwrecked and destitute, they drifted into every dirty business the city had to often In Shanghai that meant a plenitude of possibilities—gunrunning, drug trafficking, petty crime, touting, espionage


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Ilie_C%C4%83t%C4%83r%C4%83u
	He was by then receiving his orders from the Okhrana, Russia's spy ring.

	...During the last months of the world war, he was in the Shanghai International Settlement


http://cdn.calisphere.org/data/13030/89/kt538nf189/files/26001_XIIIb_Outgoing_Dispatches.pdf
	Okhrana Files

	Re: Mikhail Chernavskiy, going to Genoa to meet woman arriving from Shanghai


https://books.google.com/books?id=OlUzAQAAMAAJ&pg=PA108
	But, while there may be no reign of terror at hand, there is undoubtedly too much talk on the one side of bomb-throwing and assassination, and too much disposition on the other side to resort to summary execution to get rid of dangerous opponents: and it is quite true that leaders of both sides are in constant dread of attack.

	The Minister of Foreign Affairs receives threatening letters every day and the President has left his residence but two or three times since his inauguration and has had the streets heavily guarded when he went out.


https://books.google.com/books?id=c7A5AQAAMAAJ&pg=PA570
	The recent assassination of Sung Chiao-jen ... of which President Yuan is suspected to have been the instigator, was enough to kindle the revolutionary risings which had long been smouldering.


https://books.google.com/books?id=c61MAAAAYAAJ&pg=PA262
	On July 18 Kwantung declared independence and the following proclamation was issued by the Tutuh, Chen Chuing-ming, and the Provincial Assembly:--

	"The fates have been cruel to our Republic. Under the appearance of a Republic Yuan Shih-kai rules with absolute despotism. All his crimes cannot be enumerated, but we can mention at least twelve which are prominent:--

	...He hired assassins to murder Sung Chiao-jen, and when proof was produced he allowed Hung Shih-tso to escape, and arranged for Lin Shih-ching and Tsen Ping to be poisoned at Peking

	...When the complicity of the Government in the murder of Sung Chia-jen was discovered he tried to suppress protests from the people by force"


https://www.britannica.com/place/China/Japan-and-the-Ryukyu-Islands
	That summer, revolutionary leaders organized a revolt against Yuan, later known as the Second Revolution, but his military followers quickly suppressed it. Sun Yat-sen, one of the principal revolutionaries, fled to Japan. Yuan then coerced parliament into electing him formally to the presidency, and he was inaugurated on October 10, the second anniversary of the outbreak of the revolution. By then his government had been recognized by most foreign powers. When parliament promulgated a constitution placing executive authority in a cabinet responsible to the legislature, Yuan revoked the credentials of the KMT members, charging them with involvement in the recent revolt. He dissolved parliament on Jan. 10, 1914, and appointed another body to prepare a constitution according to his own specifications. The presidency had become a dictatorship.


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Yuan_Shikai#Revival_of_monarchy
	In late 1915, rumors were floated of a popular consensus that the monarchy should be revived. With his power secure, many of Yuan's supporters, notably monarchist Yang Du, advocated for a revival of the monarchy, asking Yuan to take on the title of Emperor. Yang reasoned that the Chinese masses had long been used to autocratic rule, the Republic had only been effective as a transitional phase to end Manchu rule, and China's political situation demanded the stability that only a monarchy could ensure. 


https://books.google.com/books?id=YGS8AwAAQBAJ&pg=PA220
	it is telling that key people who supported Yuan's monarchical scheme included strong nationalists such as Yang Du and a leading constitutional scholar, the American political scientist Frank Goodnow. ...Starting in late 1906, Yang published a serious of articles under the rubric "Jintie zhuyi shuo" (the theory of gold-ironism) ...According to his own definition, the theory of gold-ironism was concerned with how to make China economically rich and militarily powerful, with gold standing for wealth and iron for power. In this long treatise of gold-ironism, he devoted much space to his idea of internationalist nationalism, arguing that, since the new world order was based on economic and military power, if China wanted to survive in this new environment, it had to play the same game as the great powers.


https://books.google.com/books?id=Ac5eFSWg02QC&pg=PA110
	Hunan would be the young, militaristic nation that would rise up and transform the region around it, building a new empire under its own leadership, leading the other provinces (by force if necessary) into a new federation, a China built on the model of--and living under the protection of--Hunan. Like Cai E, Yang Du believed that the essence of the Chinese future was contained in Hunan. ...Yang believed that the Hunanese were the only force standing between China and the foreign imperialists.


https://books.google.com/books?id=GolZDgAAQBAJ&pg=PA163A
	Zhang cited Yang Du: "The purpose of the name 'central state' is to demarcate outer regions from central regions. The purpose of the name "central Hua" is to distinguish between the Hua [Chinese] high culture and the Yi [barbarian] low culture"

	...Zhang's strategy to incorporate non-Chinese regions into a Chinese nation-state was through assimilation and thus was close to Liang's ideas of "greater nationalism."

	...Before Zhang gave his own reasons for including the "three wild domains," he criticised Yang Du's reasons. Zhang quoted:

		Russia is the leader among our opponents. Russia certainly wishes every day to snatch Mongolia and the Turkic Muslim areas to put them in her sack. Now, when Russia sees that there is division among China's ethnicities, and that the Mongols' and Turkic Muslim's level is not enough to build a state on their own, how could they not want to invade and occupy the Mongol and Turkic Muslim regions? And as soon as Russia has occupied the Mongol and Turkic Muslims regions, Britain will inevitably invade Tibet, and France will inevitably invade Yunnan and Guangdong. So, if the territory of the Han Chinese people is not protected, then the cause of domestic division will lead to the effect of foreign division.


https://www.jstor.org/stable/1405322?seq=1#page_scan_tab_contents
	Outer Mongolia had been a satellite of Tsarist Russia since 1911, and since the Russian Revolution, the first satellite of Soviet Russia

	...Through the secret "circles" organized in Mongolia, primarily against the Chinese, the spirit of revolution prepared a favorable background and social justice. The Russians, however, were looked upon as a foreign invading power, but they were not felt so visibly as the Chinese were. Besides, the Russian Revolution apparently stood on the principle of equality among the proletarians of all the nations. The revolutionary Russians extended supposedly friendly hands to the unorganized Mongols, hands which were not trusted but still appeared better than the Chinese.


https://books.google.com/books?id=Ac5eFSWg02QC&pg=PA125
	"Those who wish to transform society," he wrote in that chapter, "cannot do so by working with the foundations of the old society; they must destroy the old society and purify themselves of it completely." As he laid out his argument for the necessity of total revolution, he explained that his theory had foreign roots: "In today's world, and in all countries," he wrote, "there are no greater exmplars of the 'spirit of destruction' than the anarchists of Russia." The Russian doctrine of anarchism was just then beginning to circulate in Japan, and Yang Yulin became its first serious Chinese proponent. To put his theories into practice, in May 1903 he founded a group called the Citizens' Military Education Society, which advocated the use of assassination as a political tool.

	...they founded the Translations journal together with Yang Du in 1902.


http://citeseerx.ist.psu.edu/viewdoc/download?doi=10.1.1.946.4603&rep=rep1&type=pdf
	The article examines the important role that the Hunan First Normal School and the changing Chinese elite, especially Yang Changji, played in fostering and shaping the careers and thoughts of so many radical intellectuals (including Mao) who became the founding figures of the Chinese Communist Party (CCP) and later the leaders of China.

	...During his years in Japan, Yang believed that China’s survival depended on education to raise the quality of its people. Chinese students in Japan at this time were intellectually active, and in Tokyo, they founded more than twenty journals. Youxue yibian (Study Abroad and Translations), begun by the Hunanese students Yang Du and Yang Yulin, was among the best known. At Yang Yulin’s invitation, in 1903, Yang Changji published part of his 1898 diaries in Youxue yibian, and these selections revealed what was then Yang’s philosophical thinking.


http://shanghaiist.com/2011/02/23/searching_through_shanghais_unprote_3.php
	Yang Du, previously known as Yang Chengchan, was as Baidu calls it an "unusual politician for his time," having dabbled in the Qing Dynasty, Yuan Shikai's failed monarchy, the KMT and the Chinese Communist Party (though he never saw them win over China). Besides being a member of every major Chinese movement of the early 20th century...


https://www.era.lib.ed.ac.uk/bitstream/handle/1842/8807/Zhang2002.pdf;jsessionid=92F10E5254E80CA663C59CCAFEAC71CF?sequence=1
	Yang Du, another member of the Hunanese elite and one of Yang Changji's old acquaintances, became a rising but short-lived political star active in the organisation of Yuan Shikai's campaign for enthronement as China's emperor.

	Yuan...concluded the humiliating treaty "Twenty-one Demands" with Japan in May 1915 without the consent of the legislature. Yang Du played a leading and decisive role in forming the Peace Planing Society in August 1915 and in directing the ideological preparation for Yuan's enthronement. Some of Hunan's leading figures were involved in the so-called popular "petition" calling for Yuan to assume the emperorship.	


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Yuan_Shikai#Revival_of_monarchy
	On 20 November 1915, Yuan held a specially convened "Representative Assembly" which voted unanimously to offer Yuan the throne. On 12 December 1915, Yuan "accepted" the invitation and proclaimed himself Emperor of the Chinese Empire under the era name of Hongxian

	...The Hongxian Emperor expected widespread domestic and international support for his reign. However, he and his supporters had badly miscalculated. Many of the emperor's closest supporters abandoned him, and the solidarity of the emperor's Beiyang clique of military protégés dissolved. There were open protests throughout China denouncing the Hongxian Emperor. Foreign governments, including Japan, suddenly proved indifferent or openly hostile to him, not giving him the recognition anticipated. Sun Yat-sen, who had fled to Tokyo and set up a base there, actively organized efforts to overthrow the Hongxian Emperor. The emperor's sons publicly fought over the title of "Crown Prince", and formerly loyal subordinates like Duan Qirui and Xu Shichang left him to create their own factions.

	...On 25 December 1915, Yunnan's military governor, Cai E, rebelled, launching the National Protection War. The governor of Guizhou followed in January 1916, and Guangxi declared independence in March. Funding for the Hongxian Emperor's accession ceremony was cut on 1 March, and Yuan formally abandoned the empire on 22 March after 83 days. This was not enough for his enemies, who called for his resignation as president.


https://books.google.com/books?id=OlUzAQAAMAAJ&pg=PA108
	The American Charge d'Affaires to the Secretary of State
	Peking, April 1, 1913.

	The really serious feature of the situation is that the peace of the whole Country seems to depend upon this one man. ...It is not that I believe Yuan to be an ideal president or a brilliant statesman, but simply that, in my opinion, the only choice lies between Yuan and chaos.


https://www.gutenberg.org/files/14345/14345-h/14345-h.htm
	The Fight for the Republic in China by B. L. Putnam Weale

	Extraordinary rumours circulated endlessly among the common people that there would be great trouble on the occasion of the Dragon Festival, the 5th June; and what actually took place was perhaps more than a coincidence.

	Early on the 6th June an electric thrill ran through Peking—Yuan Shih-kai was dead! At first the news was not believed, but by eleven o'clock it was definitely known in the Legation Quarter that he had died a few minutes after ten o'clock that morning from uraemia of the blood—the surgeon of the French Legation being in attendance almost to the last. A certificate issued later by this gentleman immediately quieted the rumours of suicide

	..."I did not wish this end," he is reported to have whispered hoarsely a few minutes before he expired, "I did not wish to be Emperor. Those around me said that the people wanted a king and named me for the Throne. I believed and was misled." And in this way did his light flicker out. 


https://books.google.com/books?id=j9ICAAAAMAAJ
	Manchu and Muscovite

	By. L. Putnam Weale

	The book to be read by those who wish to understand the true position of Russia in Manchuria at the moment of the outbreak of the Russo-Japanese war. . .Writing with an authority that cannot be doubted, and supporting his conclusions by an exhaustive array of carefully investigated facts, Mr. Weale formulates one long indictment of the Russian in Manchuria.

	...Readers should understand that Mr. Weale's very timely and instructive book was written before the outbreak of war between Russian and Japan, although several of his forecasts, e.g., the taking of the Dalny, have already been fulfilled.

	...When you are in Ninguta, therefore, you incline to the opinion that after all the Russian may be willing to evacuate, but that he is truly afraid to do so until Japan is definitely settled with. Continuing this line of thought, the movement of troops going on unceasingly along the railway assumes a purely defensive aspect, and seems in no way aggressive. You might even begin to think that you have been mentally maligning the poor Slav after all; that there is something to be said for his point of view. But when you are giving way to your feelings in this way, it is proper and reasonable to remember that you have already received half-a-dozen conflicting impressions in different parts of Manchuria. For instance, in Harbin you almost though Russia and Manchuria were synonymous terms, as the Russian pretends he does; in the country away from the railway you have thought the whole thing a myth; when you hear Russians talk you know they are aggressive; when you read his newspaper, published for foreign consumption, you are convinced it is the Japanese who wish to carve the Slav up, and that the Slav is, on the other hand, merely acting in the interests of Europe and civilisation, with no thoughts of personal gain or advantage. So with all these impressions fighting on against the other, it is best to be extremely wary in Manchuria, and merely to observe carefully and make up your mind long afterwards.


https://books.google.com/books?id=Lc5AAQAAMAAJ
	Mr. Weale writes: "Russia, although she lost something by the great war, has gained in compactness." Against Mr. Putnam Weale's elaborate proof that Russia in some degree looks forward to an eventual renewal of war...


http://www.cshagen.com/tag/bertram-lenox-simpson/
	Simpson, better known by his pseudonym Putnam Weale

	...The Manchu Dynasty fell on his watch, and he became an advisor to Chinese presidents and warlords, who one by one stripped away his dreams of a united China.  With apocryphal clarity he foresaw the upcoming Japanese invasion and warned the world, producing nearly one book every year.

	...All his adult life Simpson strove for change. He didn’t stop until the day three assassins entered his home on Woodrow Wilson Road in the former German Concession, now Jiefang South Road, and shot him in the back.


https://books.google.com/books?id=YGS8AwAAQBAJ&pg=PA222
	One direct result of the open military opposition to Yuan was that China became divided internally. Yuan's death also deprived the northern Beiyang faction of a leader and "caused internal dissension," and so even dead he still played a role in the birth of warlordism. This may be his single most powerful legacy.


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Chinese_Civil_War
	The anti-monarchist and national unificationist Kuomintang party and its leader Sun Yat-sen sought the help of foreign powers to defeat these warlords, who had seized control of much of Northern China.

	Sun Yat-sen's efforts to obtain aid from the Western countries were ignored, however, and in 1921 he turned to the Soviet Union. For political expediency the Soviet leadership initiated a dual policy of support for both Sun and the newly established Communist Party of China, which would eventually found the People's Republic of China.

	...In 1923, a joint statement by Sun and Soviet representative Adolph Joffe in Shanghai pledged Soviet assistance for China's unification. The Sun-Joffe Manifesto was a declaration of cooperation among the Comintern, KMT and the Communist Party of China. Comintern agent Mikhail Borodin arrived in China in 1923 to aid in the reorganization and consolidation of the KMT along the lines of the Communist Party of the Soviet Union. The CPC joined the KMT to form the First United Front


https://books.google.com/books?id=2RHIAeZEYjIC&pg=PA61
	The agents also reported that Joffe had offered Russian moral and financial support to Sun and the Koumintang on condition that the agree (a) immediately and openly to recognize the Soviet as the legitimate government; (b) to conclude an open alliance with the Soviet government; and (c) to place no restrictions on Bolshevik propaganda in China. Dr. Sun was agreeable to the first two conditions but no to the third


https://books.google.com/books?id=71OcBQAAQBAJ&pg=PA37&lpg=PA37
	The revolutionary atmosphere that prevailed during the First United Front brought many disparate groups together for the common causes of eradicating warlordism and resisting imperialism, but also served the communist cause well. For the duration of the United Front, the Youth League was able to take advantage of revolutionary sentiment to elevate its profile and expand its membership and it could do all of this entirely in the open.


https://books.google.com/books?id=2RHIAeZEYjIC&pg=PA61
	...Dr. Sun held that the Communist order or even the Soviet system could not actually be introduced in China. This view was entirely shared by Mr. Joffe, who was further of the opinion that China's paramount and pressing problem was to achieve national unification and attain national independence. Regarding this task he had assured Dr. Sun that Chin had the warmest Sympathy of the Russian people and could count on the support of Russia.


http://etheses.whiterose.ac.uk/9813/1/341813.pdf
	Another Chinese whom Popov visited was someone called Chin, who was reported to be an "anarchist working on a Chinese paper of Shanghai." ...It is worth noticing that, when Joffe arrived in Shanghai in 1923 he wrote a letter to a Chinese of the "New Russia Society" in Shanghai, whose surname was "Ch'in".  ...No matter who this "Chin" or "Chin" was, it indicated that the agents of Soviet Russia and the Comintern were successful in gaining the co-operation of some important Chinese anarchists. 

	...General Potapov's team visited Zhangzhou and they held several talks with the anarchists as well as with General Chen. In a talk, Potapov said:

		"If you understand socialism and admit the necessity of social revolution, no matter which way you go and what action you take, you are our Russian Bolsheviks' comrades. Therefore, we should work together and help each other. The Soviet Government wish to have friendship with all revolutionaries in the world, especially in Asian countries."

	...Since Esperanto was a language many Chinese anarchists knew, and was used in some Chinese anarchist periodicals, the Soviet agents tried to have a hand in Esperanto teaching in Shanghai and Beijing. In February 1920, a Soviet agent V. A. Stopany, who had formerly been a bookkeeper with the Russian Publishing and Printing Company and was working on the Shanghai Life, started a free night school for teaching Esperanto in Shanghai with Lu Shikai, an old Chinese anarchist scholar of Esperanto and one of Zhang Mochi's close friends. The night school was held at the New China School (Xinhua Xuexiao), which was a peripheral organisation of the Anarchist Comrades' Association. All the teachers at the Night School were anarchists. It was said that there were at most one hundred students attending the classes. Stopany often expounded his Communist ideas to his students, and encouraged "the study of Esperanto as a knowledge of that language would enable them to promote internationalism and Communism. " Soon the Esperanto Night School and the activities of its staff aroused the suspicion of the authorities in Shanghai. In a secret interview, Lu Shikai admitted that he and his Russian confrere were working in the interests of the Bolsheviks. 

	...The Soviet agents also made contact with anarchists in some other cities, but it is not necessary to go into the same detail in each case. Suffice it to say that their goals were to enlist the help of the Chinese anarchists for their revolutionary propaganda campaign; to use their organisational network for the establishment of the Socialists' League (see Chapter 6) and early Communist groups and to persuade some of the anarchists to change their beliefs and to become Communists.

	...Why was it that the largest groups of Chinese radicals whom the Soviet agents got in touch with at first were anarchists? To answer this we must take into account the special historical background and Soviet Russia's policies towards anarchists at that time. By doing so we will see then that what the Bolsheviks did among the Chinese was by no means accidental. 

	Firstly, as has been shown, anarchism was a type of radical socialist thought which had long been disseminated and therefore had widespread influence in China. Anarchists were the only formation in China at that time to advocate a social revolution from below. In all, there were more than fifty anarchist societies in China during the May 4th period. Moreover, all anarchists are internationalists. Without exception, the Chinese anarchist movement kept close links with the international anarchist movement. With this tradition, the Chinese anarchists were attuned to accepting aid from foreign countries and, conversely, offering help to their foreign comrades.

	Secondly, anarchist and Marxist ideologies have certain points in common. Both advocate social revolution to overthrow capitalist rule and eliminate the system of exploitation. Their ultimate aim is to realize an ideal society without classes or states. Anarcho-communism's principle of production and distribution in a future communist society, namely "from each according to his ability, to each according to his needs", is identical with that of Marxism. Originally anarchism and Marxism were different schools within the same working class movement, as Min sheng correctly pointed out, Marxists and anarchists belonged to "the same category but to different schools".

	Thirdly, many anarchists sympathised with and supported the Bolshevik Revolution from the very beginning. Since the events of the October Revolution followed in some ways the pattern anticipated by the anarchist theorists, for instance, the expropriation of the bourgeoisie, seizure of the means of production and establishment of workers' control and abolition of class distinctions and civil ranks, some anarchists regarded them as having met "certain fundamental principles and methods of Anarchist Communism. " The Chinese anarchists also hailed Russia's social revolution. A Chinese anarchist periodical Laodong (Labour Monthly) wrote: "Now China's neighbor Russia has waged a just and honorable social revolution to make equal the rich and the poor. " Another article in this periodical even described the Russian Bolsheviks as espousing anarcho-communism and thus regarded them as their "Russian brothers". Zhu Qianzhi, an anarchist student at Beijing University, expressed the opinion of many Chinese anarchists when he wrote that: "at that time the ordinary youths in China who advocated revolution, admired Russia's success and tried to use violent force to achieve the goals [of anarchism]."

	...the Bolsheviks made efforts to draw support from anarchists internationally. Since most anarchists and anarcho-syndicalists glorified revolution and advocated "direct action" by the masses to destroy capitalist rule, Lenin counted on them to play an important role in the "World Revolution". The Bolsheviks adopted quite different tactics towards anarchists in Russia and their co-thinkers in other countries. Not long after the October Revolution the Bolsheviks began their suppression of the Russian anarchist movement because the anarchists were denouncing the Bolsheviks' dictatorship. On the other hand, in their activities abroad the Bolsheviks were inclined to treat foreign anarchists in a friendly fashion. 


https://books.google.com/books?id=tOSeAAAAIAAJ&lpg=PA124
	Shortly after Miyazaki and the others helped start Min Pao, they themselves put out a magazine that was frankly international and socialist in nature. 
	
	...After the February Revolution of 1905 in Russia, several refugees and revolutionaries had made their way to Nagasaki. There they formed a revolutionary party with Dr. Nicolai Russel at its head. ...In 1906 Sun Yat-sen traveled to Annam with Kayano Chochi. On his way, he met Russel. The two discussed general problems, and agreed that their revolutions had complementary aims. 
	
	...Miyazaki, Kayano, and several others met these Russians in 1906. Together with several socialists, they published a magazine called Kakumei hyoron (Revolutionary review) which was to speed both revolutions.


https://books.google.com/books?id=r3AJFusMHJwC&pg=PA370
	The Chinese revolutionaries in Japan then were greatly influenced by the ideas of Russian anarchists, many of whom had fled to Japan after the failure of the Russian revolution in 1905. Wang Ching-wei's editorial tone in this period was distinctly militant. In the 1 February 1910 issue of Min Pao, he wrote a fiery discourse, "On the Revolutionary Current," advocating assassination to spark the overthrow of the dynasty.


https://books.google.com/books?id=tOSeAAAAIAAJ&lpg=PA124
	The Doctor's scientific training made research in bomb assembly possible, and before long materials were being smuggled to him inside rubber dolls. We are told that the explosives Wang Ching-wei intended for the Prince Regent in 1909 were made from photographic supplies by the Russians in Nagasaki.


http://articles.latimes.com/2010/aug/01/entertainment/la-ca-alex-butterworth-20100801
	Rachkovsky followed his prey abroad; as head of the Paris branch of the Okhrana, he planted agents among the émigrés who goaded angry, naïve young people into what the author describes as "heinous crimes of which they might never have otherwise conceived." Butterworth credibly documents instances across Europe in which a mysterious figure appeared in anarchist circles, armed with cash and access to explosives, provoked them to target public places for maximum damage, then vanished just as the police swooped in — sometimes before the bombs went off, sometimes not.


https://libcom.org/history/chinese-anarchist-movement
	The editor of the secret Min-pao was Wang Ching-wei, an ardent supporter of Sun and one definitely influenced by the Anarchist writings of this period. ...And Wang was to be the final hero of the Paris journal. Its last issue, published on May 21, 1910, might well have been called the Wang Ching-wei special edition, since it was devoted almost entirely to praise of Wang for his attempted assassination of the Manchu Prince Regent.


https://books.google.com/books?id=7hprt3OB-yUC&pg=PA64
	As his hearing approached, Wang Jingwei decided to make a straightforward testimony before Zaifeng, believing that his statement would be published and would arouse public support for the revolutionary movement. Wang repeated the major theme of his Min bao articles, that the government's proposed constitution would be futile, nothing more than a device for perpetuating Manchu authority. At the hearing Wang found another way to express his idealism: he had sewn copies of his Min boa articles into his clothing, and when asked why, he replied, "These articles were written in ink; I wanted to translate them into blood."

	...the China Assassination Corps

	In organizing their own corps, Liu Sifu and his associates intended to continue Wang Jingwei's mission.


http://anarchism.pageabode.com/andrewnflood/fenby-northern-expedition-shanghai-massacre
	Fenby on the Northern Expedition and Shanghai massacre

	One of Chinese anarchism’s most significant early figures Wang Jingwei, crops up throughout the text as one of Chiang Kai-Shek's main rivals. Wang Jingwei was one if the first Chinese anarchists, working as part of a group in Paris in 1905 he published a journal which translated many classic anarchist writings into Chinese and which had a considerable influence on the development of the Chinese left. However Wang Jingwei’s anarchism is never mentioned in the book as by the time Chiang Kai-Shek’s story starts it is far in his past and...


https://books.google.com/books?id=2RHIAeZEYjIC&pg=PA62
	Apparently Dr. Sun had some reason for optimism as a result of his talks with Joffe, the most important Soviet official he had met, for he sent one of his closest associates, the American-born and Japanese-educated Liao- Chung-ki'ai, to Japan to confer with Joffe. ...Chinese sources are most unrevealing about the supposedly month-long talks between the two men. If Liao wrote to Sun, the letters remain unpublished. Katsuji Fuse, a newspaper correspondent who interviewed Joffe in Japan, later wrote that Joffe and Liao drafted plans for a military academy modelled on the system developed by Trotsky in Soviet Russia, and that Joffe promised assistance for establishing such an academy.


http://ieas.berkeley.edu/gas/sjas/sjas_journal/v1_2010_Fall.pdf
	James Lin discusses the political indoctrination program implemented in officer training at the Whampoa Military Academy in China under the Kuomintang (KMT) during the 1920s. Drawing from recently opened archival sources and new scholarship, Lin shows that the indoctrination program, historically rooted in a KMT-Soviet alliance, drew not only from Nationalist leader Sun Yat-sen's Three Principles of the People, but also from Leninist thought. The incorporation of Leninist ideology, and the motivations behind grounding the Whampoa indoctrination system in ideology as opposed to loyalty to a region or a province, provoke broader historical questions on nation building in Republican China.

	...the Russian observers only seemed to believe that Sun's personal bodyguards were absolutely loyal to him.


http://spartacus-educational.com/Mikhail_Borodin.htm
	Under Borodin's direction, the Bolshevik "advisers" (sovetniki) established the Whampoa Military Academy; its commander was Chiang Kai-shek, but the guiding hand on the staff was General Blyukher's. Simultaneously, Borodin's sovetniki planted Chinese Communists (whose party had been founded in 1920) in key positions within the K.M.T. and its "National-Revolutionary Army." 


https://books.google.com/books?id=juRoAAAAMAAJ
	Borodin was one of the few Lenin loyalists during the disintegration of Lenin's group following the party congress and during the 1904 battle to build a new party organization


https://books.google.com/books?id=Q4MI_fPGURIC&pg=PA115
	...Borodin did not openly oppose it for fear that Chiang would think that all Soviet advisers sided with Wang Jingwei

	...Chiang demanded that the communists should not occupy key positions in the GMD and asked that a list of the communists within the GMD be submitted to the chairman ...Borodin considered the restrictions on communists to be too harsh.

	...Borodin reminded his colleagues that it was not yet time to engage in a struggle against Chiang; the urgent and current task was to prepare future opportunities so they should not rupture relations with Chiang for the time being.


https://books.google.com/books?id=zDKsAAAAIAAJ&pg=PA27
	Chiang wrapped himself in radical phrases and presented himself to Borodin and to the masses as the Red hope of the revolutionary army. Borodin therefore employed every possible political stratagem to drive Chiang to the top of the heap.

	...Huston ...wrote on the other hand that the Comintern agent knew exactly what he was doing. "Borodin had dreamed of five years in which he hoped to have the laborers and peasants of Kwangtung organized into a revolutionary force that would sweep over China."

	...At the time when Shanghai Communists were handing the city over to Chiang, the foreign quarter buzzed with rumors to the effect that the Kuomintang leader was preparing for a second coup.	

	...Following their tactics of the preceding year, Russian Communists denied these stories. A split within the Kuomintang was absolutely out of the question, they said. A revolutionary like Chiang Kai-shek could not possibly co-operate with counterrevolutionists


https://books.google.com/books?id=Q4MI_fPGURIC&pg=PA116
	The split of the new government to two locations--Nanchang and Wuhan--severely damaged relations between Chiang Kaishek and Borodin. In early January 1927, Chiang went to Wuhan in person and tried to persuade Borodin to give up Wuhan as the capital. Not only did he fail in his goal, but Borodin humiliated him in public. Months later Chiang would burst out in anger when he recalled the scene. ...Borodin's insistence on making Wuhan the new capital had split the national revolution.


https://books.google.com/books?id=MOT_axUIWooC&pg=PA57
	On April 2, 1927, Wu Chih-hui presented a letter to the Central Supervisor Committee. It contained a proposal for a party purge and was approved unanimously by the committee. Meanwhile, Wang Ching-wei had returned from France on April 1 and he convened several high-level party meetings in which the decision was made to have the Central Executive Committee meet in Nanking to discuss the communist problem. To our surprise, on April 5, Wang Ching-wei and the Chinese Communist party leader...publicly stated that the Koumintang and the Communist party would continue to cooperate. Wang Ching-wei then secretly left Shanghai for Wuhan to cooperate with the Communists and prevent our party from eliminating them. The Kuomintang members were now split between Wuhan and Nanking.


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Shanghai_massacre
	On April 9 Chiang declared martial law in Shanghai and the Central Control Commission issued the "Party Protection and National Salvation" proclamation, denouncing the Wuhan Nationalist Government's policy of cooperation with CCP. On April 11 Chiang issued a secret order to all provinces under the control of his forces to purge Communists from the KMT.

	Before dawn on April 12 gang members began to attack district offices controlled by the union workers, including Zhabei, Nanshi and Pudong. Under an emergency decree, Chiang ordered the 26th Army to disarm the workers' militias; that resulted in more than 300 people being killed and wounded. The union workers organized a mass meeting denouncing Chiang Kai-shek on April 13, and thousands of workers and students went to the headquarters of the 2nd Division of the 26th Army to protest. Soldiers opened fire, killing 100 and wounding many more. Chiang dissolved the provisional government of Shanghai, labor unions and all other organizations under Communist control, and reorganized a network of unions with allegiance to the Kuomintang and under the control of Du Yuesheng. Over 1000 Communists were arrested, some 300 were executed and more than 5,000 went missing.


https://books.google.com/books?id=zDKsAAAAIAAJ&pg=PA29
	...leaders in Moscow, despite the fact that their policies had been based upon continued co-operation with the Kuoumintang Left, insisted that the time for peasant agitation had arrived. "Without an agrarian revolution, victory is impossible," Stalin wired his agents in China in late May 1927. Certain old leaders of the Central Committee of the Kuomintang, he stated, were afraid of what was taking place. Consequently, the Communists must arrange for drawing a large number of peasant and working-class leaders into the Wuhan Government to change the structure of the Kuomintang, for setting up a military tribunal to punish those maintaining contact with Chiang or attacking workers and peasants, and for raising a reliable army of about 20,000 Communists and 50,000 revolutionary workers and peasants before it was "too late."

	One Jun 1, 1927, this telegram was brought to the attention of Wang Ching-wei who, with expressions of extreme consternation, took immediate action against Borodin and the Chinese Communists. Within a few weeks the former was on his way back to the Soviet Union, and the Chinese Communists were hiding out wherever they could escape detection.


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Shanghai_massacre
	the Wuhan Kuomintang also began to violently purge Communists  ...More than 10,000 communists in Canton, Xiamen, Fuzhou, Ningbo, Nanjing, Hangzhou and Changsha were arrested and executed within 20 days. ...In the year after April 1927, over 300,000 people were killed across China in anti-Communist suppression campaigns carried out by the KMT.

	...Some National Revolutionary Army commanders with Communist backgrounds who were graduates of Whampoa Military Academy kept their sympathies for the Communists hidden and were not arrested, and many switched their allegiance to the CCP after the start of the Chinese Civil War.


http://bookfi.net/dl/1026321/4847c5
	The "sleeper" now wakened was a general called Zhang Zhizhong (whom we shall refer to as ZZZ), commander of the Shanghai-Nanjing garrison. In 1925 he had been a teacher at Whampoa, the Russian-funded and Russian-staffed military academy near Canton. From the day of its founding, Moscow made a determined effort to plant high-level agents in the Nationalist military.

	...ZZZ held the pivotal job of chief of the Shanghai-Nanjing garrison. He tried to talk Chiang into launching a "first strike" against Japan--not in northern China, where the fighting was, but 1,000 kilometres to the south, in Shanghai, where the small Japanese garrison was not involved in any military action at this stage. Chiang did not reply to this proposal, even though ZZZ repeated it many times.

	...At the end of July, right after the Japanese occupied Peking and Tianjin, ZZZ cabled Chiang again, arguing strongly for "taking the initiative" to start a war. After ZZZ said he would only do so if the Japanese showed unmistakable signs of attacking Shanghai, Chiang gave his conditional consent, stressing: "You must wait for orders about when this should happen."

	But on 9 August, without authorisation, ZZZ staged an incident outside Shanghai airport, where a Chinese army unit, which he himself had specially stationed there, shot dead a Japanese marine lieutenant and a private. A Chinese prisoner under sentence of death was then dressed in a Chinese uniform and shot dead at the airport gate, to make it seem that the Japanese had fired first. The Japanese gave every sign of wishing to defuse the incident, but ZZZ still bombarded Chiang with requests to launch an offensive, which Chiang vetoed. On the morning of the 13th, the Generalissimo told ZZZ not to launch a war "on impulse," but to "study and discuss" all the angles again, and then submit his plan. ZZZ pressed next day: "This army is determined to start the offensive against the enemy at 5 p.m. today Here is the plan. . ." On the 14th, Chinese planes bombed the Japanese flagship Izumo, as well as troops and navy planes on the ground, and ZZZ ordered a general offensive. But Chiang stopped him: "You must not attack this evening. Wait for order."  

	When no order arrived, ZZZ outflanked Chiang by issuing a press release next day; claiming, falsely; that Japanese warships had shelled Shanghai and that Japanese troops had started attacking the Chinese. With anti-Japanese feeling running high, Chiang was put on the spot. The following day; 16 August, he finally gave the order: "General assault for dawn tomorrow."

	But after one day's fighting, Chiang ordered a halt, on the 18th. ZZZ simply ignored the order and expanded his offensives. All-out war became unstoppable as large Japanese reinforcements began to arrive on 22 August.

	The Japanese inflicted tremendous casualties. In Shanghai, 73 of China's 180 divisions--and the best one-third--over 400,000 men, were thrown in, and all but wiped out. The conflict here consumed virtually all of China's nascent air force (which Chiang so treasured that he had not sent a single plane to the northern front), and the main warships. It significantly weakened the military force Chiang had been painstakingly building up since the early 1930S. The Japanese suffered much fewer, though still heavy; casualties: about 40,000.

	Once Chiang was forced into all-out war, Stalin moved with alacrity to bolster Chiang's capability to sustain a war. He signed a non-aggression treaty with Nanjing on 21 August, and started to supply Chiang with weapons. China could not manufacture any weapons except rifles. Stalin advanced Chiang U.S. $250 million for arms purchases from Russia, which included 1,000 planes, plus tanks and artillery and committed a sizeable Soviet air force contingent. Moscow sent some 300 military advisers, headed for a time by the Chinese-speaking General Vasili Chuikov, later of Stalingrad fame. For the next four years, Russia was not only China's main supplier of arms, but virtually its only source of heavy weapons, artillery and planes.

	Moscow was exhilarated by the turn of events, as the Soviet foreign minister, Maksim Litvinov, admitted to French vice-premier Leon Blum. According to Blum, Litvinov told him that "he [Litvinov] and the Soviet Union were perfectly delighted that Japan had attacked China [adding] that the Soviet Union hoped that way between China and Japan would continue just as long as possible..."


https://books.google.com/books?id=MY1tBgAAQBAJ&pg=PA119
	Wang Jingwei continued to object. In two telegrams to Chiang Kai-shek he was blunt:

		This morning, Wang Chonghui showed me his telegram to you. He says that according to his investigations, declaring war on Japan is harmful rather than beneficial to China. ...The Japanese enemy is well prepared. After China declares war on Japan, the world's nations will declare neutrality and no longer offer foreign aid to China


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Reorganized_National_Government_of_the_Republic_of_China
	On 30 March 1940, Wang became the head of state of what came to be known as the Reorganized National Government of China based in Nanjing, serving as the President of the Executive Yuan and Chairman of the National Government.  In November 1940, Wang's government signed the "Sino-Japanese Treaty" with the Japanese, a document that has been compared with Japan's Twenty-one Demands for its broad political, military, and economic concessions.

	In June 1941, Wang gave a public radio address from Tokyo in which he praised Japan, affirmed China's submission to it, criticised the Kuomintang government, and pledged to work with the Empire of Japan to resist communism and Western imperialism.


https://books.google.com/books?id=kHKlDAAAQBAJ&pg=PA214
	After Wang Jingwei established the puppet government in Nanjing in March 1940, a discussion of setting a Central Reserve Bank of China was placed on its agenda. ...the financial minister of the Wang Jingwei regime, and the financial minister of the Japanese Embassy signed a secret memorandum regarding a proposal to establish the Central Reserve Bank. Two days later, the puppet government approved the proposal.

	...the CRB actively engaged in dissolving and reorganizing Chinese government banks in Shanghai.  The Central Reserve Bank took over control of the Central Bank, the Farmers Bank and the Central Trust Bureaus and placed them under Japanese supervision. The Central Reserve Bank reorganized the Bank of China and the Bank of Communication, and cut off their relations with the Nationalist government.

	...On May 16, 1941, the Wang Jing-wei government issued an executive order to prosecute those who were not willing to accept new notes. One year later, the parity between CRB notes and fabi changed to one to two.

	...The psychological effect of the people's faith in the currency during the war was crucial to the success or failure of a currency. ...The failure of the national currency destroyed China's monetary base.


http://bookfi.net/dl/1026321/4847c5
	The outbreak of full-scale war between Japan and China brought Mao immediate benefits. Chiang Kai-shek finally acceded to the Communists' key demand, which he had till now refused to consider--that the Red Army could keep its autonomy. Mao thus kept control of his own army, even though it was supposed to be part of the armed forces of the central government. Though Chiang was supreme commander of the Chinese army, he could not give orders to the Red Army, and had to couch his commands in the form of "requests." In addition, the CCP was now in effect, legitimised. Communist prisoners were released and the CCP was allowed to open offices in key cities, and to publish its own papers in Nationalist areas.

	And yet this was just the beginning of Mao's gains from the Sino-Japanese War, which lasted eight years and took some 20 million Chinese lives. It ended up weakening Chiang's state enormously, and enabling Mao to emerge in possession of a giant army of 1.3 million. At the beginning of the war, the ratio of Chiang's army to Mao's was 60:1; at the end, it was 3:1.

	...He bombarded his military commanders with telegrams such as: "Focus on creating base areas. . . Not on fighting battles. . ." And when the Japanese were sweeping across the province of Shanxi, he ordered: "Set up our territory in the whole of Shanxi province." He said years later that his attitude had been: "The more land Japan took, the better."


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Wang_Jingwei
	after the Japanese were successful in occupying large areas of coastal China, Wang became known for his pessimistic view on China's chances in the war against Japan. He often voiced defeatist opinions in KMT staff meetings


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Reorganized_National_Government_of_the_Republic_of_China
	The Japanese used various methods for subjugating the local populace. Initially, fear was used to maintain order


https://books.google.com/books?id=tOPQCwAAQBAJ&pg=PA23&lpg=PA23
	"Communist propaganda,' as the police called it, addressed various issues.  ...Among the publications seized by the police, two focused on the violence in Nanjing: "Japan under the Threat of Fascism" in Far-Eastern War News no. 4 (Janurary 10, 1938), and What War Is. ...The newspaper's editor of the Far-Eastern War News, who learned of the massacre from a New York Times article, briefly informed the readers about violence committed by the Japanese military after the capture of the city. In an item titled "A Matter for Great Regret," he wrote:

	At the time the Japanese military captured Nanjing, there were wide-scale looting, rape, and atrocities, which had not been seen in the past. Foreign witnesses were surprised and expressed the opinion that "the battle of Nanjing" would remain not as a brilliant victory in Japanese war history, but as a shameful incident that would ruin national dignity." It is concluded that the large-scale atrocities that took place in Nanjing can be attributed to a deterioration in military discipline among ordinary soldiers influenced by fascist officers, such as Colonel Hashimoto [Kingoro]


http://imtfe.law.virginia.edu/collections/tavenner/8/2/brief-hashimoto-kingoro


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Shiro_Azuma
	When I tried to cut off the first one, either the farmer moved or I mis-aimed. I ended up slicing off just part of his skull. Blood spurted upwards. I swung again... and this time I killed him... We were taught that we were a superior race since we lived only for the sake of a human god—our emperor. But the Chinese were not. So we held nothing but contempt for them... There were many rapes, and the women were always killed. When they were being raped, the women were human. But once the rape was finished, they became pig's flesh.


https://books.google.com/books?id=wkHyjjbv-yEC&pg=PA246
	While the city was being systematically ravaged, a Japanese colonel named Hashimoto, who belonged to an extremist antiforeign group, set up his heavy artillery to prevent refugees from escaping up the Yangtze River to the west.


http://ww2days.com/chinese-quisling-ousts-chiang-regime-2.html
	Wang headed a regime that was strongly anti-Communist. In November 1941 he joined with the leaders of Japan, Italy, and Nazi Ger­many in the Anti-Comintern Pact, a thirteen-nation alliance against the Soviet Union.


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Alfred_Rosenberg
	German propaganda efforts designed to win over Russian opinion were, at best, patchy and inconsistent. Alfred Rosenberg was one of the few in the Nazi hierarchy who advocated a policy designed to encourage anti-Communist opinion among the population of the occupied territories. 


http://euromaidanpress.com/2014/10/28/no-russian-fairytale/
	Until recently, 28 October was celebrated in Ukraine as the “Day of liberation of Ukraine from fascist invaders.” On the round date of 70 years of this date in 2014, Ukraine’s Institute of National Memory proposes to rename the holiday the “Day of the expulsion of Nazi occupants,” and not the liberation of Ukraine.


http://www.propornot.com/p/the-list.html
	russia-insider.com


http://russia-insider.com/en/nazi-roots-ukraines-conflict/ri12535
	Nazi Roots of Ukraine’s Conflict

	Nazi-affiliated have gained substantial power in today’s U.-backed Ukrainian regime. But that's OK because facing Russian 'bad guys' they're automatically 'good guys'


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/File:Wang_Jingwei_Regime_3rd_anniversary_parade.JPG


https://www.marxists.org/reference/archive/mao/selected-works/volume-2/mswv2_28.htm
	UNITE ALL ANTI-JAPANESE FORCES AND COMBAT THE ANTI-COMMUNIST DIE-HARDS

	Comrade Mao Tse-tung delivered this speech at a mass rally in Yenan to denounce Wang Ching-wei.


http://bookfi.net/dl/1026321/4847c5
	Mao's approach met with resistance from his own commanders, who were keen to fight the Japanese. On 25 September, the Red Army had its first engagement with the Japanese, when a unit under Lin Biao ambushed the tail end of a Japanese transport convoy at the pass of Pingxingguan, in northeast Shanxi, near the Great Wall. Although this was a minor clash-and against a non-combat unit, which, according to Lin, was mainly asleep-it was the first time Communists had killed any Japanese (outside Manchuria). If Mao had had his way this fight would not have happened at all. According to a report Lin Biao wrote in 1941 in Russia (where he was receiving treatment for bullet wounds), Mao had repeatedly refused to authorise the action: "When battles started between the Japanese army and the Nationalist army I more than once asked the CC [Central Committee: i.e., Mao] for a decision to organise a powerful strike against the Japanese. I never received an answer, and I ended up giving battle near Pingxingguan on my own initiative."


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Second_Sino-Japanese_War#Course_of_the_war
	At the start of 1938 the leadership in Tokyo still hoped to limit the scope of the conflict to occupy areas around Shanghai, Nanjing and most of northern China. They thought this would preserve strength for an anticipated showdown with the Soviet Union, but by now the Japanese government and GHQ had effectively lost control of the Japanese army in China.

	...China began to adopt the strategy of "trading space for time". The Chinese army would put up fights to delay the Japanese advance to northern and eastern cities, allowing the home front, with its professionals and key industries, to retreat west into Chongqing. As a result of Chinese troops' scorched earth strategies, in which dams and levees were intentionally sabotaged to create massive flooding, Japanese advances began to stall in late 1938.

	During this period, the main Chinese objective was to drag out the war for as long as possible, thereby exhausting Japanese resources while building up Chinese military capacity. 

	...Local Chinese resistance forces, organised separately by both the communists and KMT, continued their resistance in occupied areas to pester the enemy and make their administration over the vast land area of China difficult. In 1940 the Chinese Red Army launched a major offensive in north China, destroying railways and a major coal mine. These constant harassment and sabotage operations deeply frustrated the Japanese army and led them to employ the "Three Alls Policy" (kill all, loot all, burn all). It was during this period that the bulk of Japanese war crimes were committed.

	...Stilwell had a strong desire to assume total control of Chinese troops and pursue an aggressive strategy, while Chiang preferred a patient and less expensive strategy of outwaiting the Japanese. Chiang continued to maintain a defensive posture despite Allied pleas to actively break the Japanese blockade


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Soviet_invasion_of_Manchuria
	As agreed with the Allies at the Tehran Conference in November 1943 and the Yalta Conference in February 1945, the Soviet Union entered World War II's Pacific Theater within three months of the end of the war in Europe. The invasion began on 9 August 1945, exactly three months after the German surrender on May 8 (9 May, 0:43 Moscow time).

	Although the commencement of the invasion fell between the American atomic bombings of Hiroshima, on 6 August, and only hours before the Nagasaki attack on 9 August, the timing of the invasion had been planned well in advance and was determined by the timing of the agreements at Tehran and Yalta, the long term buildup of Soviet forces in the Far East since Tehran, and the date of the German surrender some three months earlier; on August 3, Marshal Vasilevsky reported to Premier Joseph Stalin that, if necessary, he could attack on the morning of 5 August.

	At 11pm Trans-Baikal (UTC+10) time on 8 August 1945, Soviet foreign minister Vyacheslav Molotov informed Japanese ambassador Naotake Satō that the Soviet Union had declared war on the Empire of Japan, and that from August 9 the Soviet government would consider itself to be at war with Japan. At one minute past midnight Trans-Baikal time on 9 August 1945, the Soviets commenced their invasion simultaneously on three fronts to the east, west and north of Manchuria

	...The Imperial Japanese Navy did not contribute to the defense of Manchuria, the occupation of which it had always opposed on strategic grounds. Additionally, by the time of the invasion, the few remnants of its fleet were stationed and tasked with the defense of the Japanese home island in the event of an invasion by American forces.

	Compounding the problem, the Japanese military made many wrong assumptions and major mistakes, the two most significant being:

	- They wrongly assumed that any attack coming from the west would follow either the old railway line to Hailar, or head into Solun from the eastern tip of Mongolia. The Soviets did attack along those routes, but their main attack from the west went through the supposedly impassable Greater Khingan range south of Solun and into the center of Manchuria.

	- Japanese military intelligence failed to determine the nature, location and scale of the Soviet buildup in the Far East. Based on initial underestimates of Soviet strength, and the monitoring of Soviet traffic on the Trans-Siberian railway, they believed the Soviets would not have sufficient forces in place before the end of August, and that an attack was most likely in autumn 1945 or in the spring of 1946.

	...However, although this redeployment had been initiated, it was not due to be completed until September, and hence the Kwantung Army were in the midst of redeploying when the Soviets launched their attack simultaneously on all three fronts.

	...The invasion of Manchuria contributed to the surrender of Japan and the end of World War II. In addition, the Soviet occupation of Manchuria, along with the northern portions of the Korean Peninsula allowed for those regions to be transferred by the Soviet Union into the control of communist backed regimes. The control of these regions by communist governments backed by Soviet authorities would aid in the rise of Communist China and shape the political conflict of the Korean War.

	...Many Japanese settlers committed mass suicide as the Soviet army approached. Mothers were forced to kill their own children before killing or being killed themselves. The Japanese army often took part in the killings of its civilians. The commander of the 5th Japanese Army, General Shimizu, commented that "each nation lives and dies by its own laws." Wounded Japanese soldiers who were incapable of moving on their own were often left to die as the army retreated.

	The Soviets laid claim to Japanese enterprises in the region and took valuable materials and industrial equipment.

	British and US reports indicate that the Soviet troops that occupied Manchuria (about 700,000) looted and terrorized the people of Mukden, and were not discouraged by Soviet authorities from "three days of rape and pillage". In Harbin, Chinese posted slogans such as "Down with Red Imperialism!" Soviet forces ignored protests from Chinese communist party leaders on the mass rape and looting.


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Chinese_Civil_War#Resumed_fighting_.281946.E2.80.931949.29
	By the end of the Second Sino-Japanese War, the balance of power in China's civil war had shifted in favor of the Communists. Their main force grew to 1.2 million troops, with a militia of 2 million. Their "Liberated Zone" contained 19 base areas, including one-quarter of the country's territory and one-third of its population; this included many important towns and cities. Moreover, the Soviet Union turned over all of its captured Japanese weapons and a substantial amount of their own supplies to the Communists, who received Northeastern China from the Soviets as well.

	In March 1946, despite repeated requests from Chiang, the Soviet Red Army under the command of Marshal Malinovsky continued to delay pulling out of Manchuria while Malinovsky secretly told the CPC forces to move in behind them, which led to full-scale war for the control of the Northeast. These favorable conditions also facilitated many changes inside the Communist leadership: the more hard-line faction finally gained the upper hand and defeated the opportunists. Prior to giving control to Communist leaders, on March 27 Soviet diplomats requested a joint venture of industrial development with the Nationalist Party in Manchuria.

	Although General Marshall stated that he knew of no evidence that the CPC was being supplied by the Soviet Union, the CPC was able to utilize a large number of weapons abandoned by the Japanese, including some tanks


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/George_Marshall#Post_War:_China
	In December 1945, President Harry Truman sent Marshall to China, to broker a coalition government between the Nationalist allies under Generalissimo Chiang Kai-shek and Communists under Mao Zedong. Marshall had no leverage over the Communists, but he threatened to withdraw American aid essential to the Nationalists. Both sides rejected his proposals and the Chinese Civil War escalated, with the Communists winning in 1949. His mission a failure, he returned to the United States in January 1947. Chiang Kai-shek and some historians later claimed that cease-fire, under pressure of Marshall, saved the Communists from defeat. As Secretary of State in 1947–48, Marshall seems to have disagreed with strong opinions in The Pentagon and State Department that Chiang's success was vital to American interests, insisting that U.S. troops not become involved.


https://books.google.com/books?id=Csbuuqe_rE0C
	Chiang Kai-shek saw the Second Battle of Siping in this context: as a part of the war to defend China against the imperialist ambitions of the Soviet Union, in which the Chinese Communist forces were merely Stalin's stooges. This was a war that Chiang had lost in 1949, but which might have come out very differently, Chiang argued, if the Second Battle of Siping and its aftermath had been handled differently. The battle itself, Chiang said, had been "another decisive battle against the Communist troops." As he described it, the three hundred thousand men under Lin Biao's command had been utterly defeated: "More than half the Communist effectives became casualties." Reports from the front, he said, "all agreed that barring some special international complications the Chines Communists would not be able to fight anew after the terrific punishment they had just taken at the hands of the Government forces."

	Then there came the ceasefire and the suspension of Du Yuming's pursuit of the Communist forces. Chiang believed that if his armies had continued their pursuit, "Communist remnants in northern Manchuria would have been liquidated." Without a base area in northern Manchuria, the remaining Communist forces in Manchuria would have been deprived of Soviet support and "a fundamental solution to the problem of Manchuria would have been at hand." Instead, "the moral of Government troops in Manchuria began to suffer" and Lin Biao rebuilt his forces in northern Manchuria. "The subsequent defeat of Government troops in Manchuria in the winter of 1948," said Chiang, "was largely due to the second ceasefire order." In this view, Siping was the decisive battle that could have been--if only a ceasefire, negotiated by George Marshall, had not intervened. Defeat had been snatched from the jaws of victory.


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/George_Marshall#Analysis_of_Pearl_Harbor_intelligence_failure


http://www.nytimes.com/1990/10/28/opinion/a-soviet-agent-harry-hopkins.html
	A Soviet Agent? Harry Hopkins?
	By Verne W. Newton

	The former K.G.B. agent Oleg Gordievsky seems intent on making the same muddle of history that Kremlin planners have made of the economy. He has captured headlines by claiming that Harry L. Hopkins, Franklin D. Roosevelt's trusted friend and adviser, was an "agent of major significance" of the Soviet Union.

	What is infuriating is how the Western press is aiding Mr. Gordievsky's efforts to craft a best-seller. In the excerpts of his book, "KGB: The Inside Story," I have seen, he never calls Mr. Hopkins a spy. Yet headline writers do.


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Venona_project#Bearing_of_Venona_on_particular_cases
	Moreover, Oleg Gordievsky, a high-level KGB officer who also defected from the Soviet Union, reported that Iskhak Akhmerov, the KGB officer who controlled the clandestine Soviet agents in the U.S. during the war, had said Hopkins was "the most important of all Soviet wartime agents in the United States."


http://www.nytimes.com/1990/10/28/opinion/a-soviet-agent-harry-hopkins.html
	A Soviet Agent? Harry Hopkins?
	By Verne W. Newton

	Gen. George C. Marshall predicted that Mr. Hopkins's enormous contributions to his country would never be appreciated. But then, as that renowned savant Senator McCarthy warned us, General Marshall was always in Stalin's hip pocket.


https://books.google.com/books?id=Csbuuqe_rE0C
	Chiang did not explicitly blame George Marshall for his failure to follow up on the "decisive battle" of Siping. Indeed, Chiang portrays himself as the prime mover behind the ceasefire, in which he, acting out of a misplaced confidence in the better side of human nature, had generously given the Chinese Communists "another chance to prove their loyalty to the nation"--a generosity of spirit which, he saw afterward, had been a mistake.


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Chinese_Civil_War#Resumed_fighting_.281946.E2.80.931949.29
	With the breakdown of talks, all-out war resumed. This stage is referred to in mainland China and Communist historiography as the "War of Liberation". On 20 July 1946 Chiang Kai-shek launched a large-scale assault on Communist territory with 113 brigades (1.6 million troops). This marked the final phase of the Chinese Civil War.

	Knowing their disadvantages in manpower and equipment, the CPC executed a "passive defense" strategy. It avoided the strong points of the KMT army and was prepared to abandon territory in order to preserve its forces. In most cases the surrounding countryside and small towns had come under Communist influence long before the cities. The CPC also attempted to wear out the KMT forces as much as possible. This tactic seemed to be successful; after a year, the power balance became more favorable to the CPC. They wiped out 1.12 million KMT troops, while their strength grew to about two million men.


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Liaoshen_Campaign
	After the winter offensive of 1947 in Manchuria, the PLA had expanded into 13 infantry armies, one artillery army, 15 independent divisions as well as 3 cavalry divisions, approximately 54 divisions consisting of over 700,000 men in a field army. The Communist forces also had approximately 300,000 irregulars, effectively controlling 97% percent of the land and 86% of the population in Manchuria by August 1948. While the Nationalist government still had a strength of 44 divisions, a total of 550,000 men including the police force, the PLA had reached numerical superiority.

	The Nationalist forces were isolated in Shenyang, Changchun and Jinzhou, none of which were connected to each other. In addition, the PLA had control of Jingha Railway, cutting off the supply line to Shenyang and Changchun. Since the supplies had to be airlifted with enormous difficulties, the Nationalist government were prepared to retreat from Changchun and Shenyang and withdraw to Jinzhou when necessary to prevent the PLA forces in Manchuria from entering Shanhai Pass.


http://www.nytimes.com/2009/10/02/world/asia/02anniversary.html
	CHANGCHUN, China — Unlike in other cities taken by the People’s Liberation Army during China’s civil war, there were no crowds to greet the victors as they made their triumphant march through the streets of this industrial city in the heart of Manchuria.

	Even if relieved to learn that hostilities with Chiang Kai-shek’s Nationalist Army had come to an end, most residents — the ones who had not died during the five-month siege — were simply too weak to go outdoors. “We were just lying in bed starving to death,” said Zhang Yinghua, now 86, as she recalled the famine that claimed the lives of her brother, her sister and most of her neighbors. “We couldn’t even crawl.”

	...The 40,000 who survived did so by eating insects, leather belts and, in some cases, the bodies that littered the streets. By the time Communist troops took over the city, every leaf and blade of grass had been consumed during the final desperate months.

	...Lung Ying-tai, a University of Hong Kong professor who studied the siege of Changchun, said nearly every elderly army officer she interviewed for her book about the civil war, “Big River, Big Sea — Untold Stories of 1949,” broke down when recounting what he experienced. “It’s an unspeakable national trauma that has not once been opened up and gently treated for 60 years,” she said.

	The book, which was published last month in Taiwan and promptly banned on the mainland, seeks to portray the horror of the civil war through the stories of those who survived. “There are not too many left who can clearly remember,” she said.

	The elderly survivors who gather in Changchun’s Labor Park most days are not eager to tell their tales. But after some prompting, the details spill out. They describe babies too weak to cry, brides sold for a morsel of food and the milewide no man’s land where thousands perished in full view of troops under orders from Gen. Lin Biao to turn Changchun into a “dead city.”

	In the first few months of the siege, food could be purchased, albeit at exorbitant prices. By the end of the summer, people were trading thick gold rings for a biscuit.

	“At first we ate rotten sorghum, then corncobs and then the bark off the trees,” said Meng Qinghua, 85. “After a week of not eating you’d get very sleepy. Once that happened, you would start to die.”

	The few airdrops of aid, delivered by American planes, were quickly gobbled up by Nationalist troops. When those stopped, the soldiers stole food from civilians at gunpoint. In the poorer quarters of the city, according to “White Snow, Red Blood,” 9 of 10 families were wiped out.

	Although her family was relatively well off, Zhang Yinghua said there was nothing to be bought by the end of summer. They opened their pillows and consumed the corn husk filling. Later they boiled and ate leather.

	Then 25, Ms. Zhang understood that swallowing such unpalatable matter was the only way to survive. “Every day we would eat a spoonful, just enough to maintain the flicker of life, but the children would not,” she said. When her 6-year-old sister and her 9-year-old brother finally died, her parents, barely able to stand, dragged their bodies to the street.


http://community.seattletimes.nwsource.com/archive/?date=19901122&slug=1105487
	Zhang said the Communist army's decision to surround the city in May 1948 was accompanied by an order prohibiting civilians from leaving, in order to put maximum pressure on the Nationalists' grain reserves.

	He cited a report from a People's Liberation Army officer filed Sept. 9, 1948, saying Communist troops were shooting and beating fleeing residents, who at times were seen ``throwing their babies behind them in order to escape the city.''

	``Not allowing the starving city residents to leave and sending other starving citizens back into the city has become difficult to explain to the troops,'' the officer's report says.

	The author quoted cables from other officers asking that the army be allowed to save starving people. The requests were denied, he wrote.

	At one point, thousands of residents were caught between the two forces. All food in the city had been requisitioned by the Nationalists, and the Communists refused to let the civilians pass, so they died there, slowly, the book says.

	``Changchun was like Hiroshima,'' Zhang wrote. ``The casualties were about the same. Hiroshima took nine seconds; Changchun took five months.''


http://www.nytimes.com/2009/10/02/world/asia/02anniversary.html
	Some of those charged with enforcing the blockade have come to regret their participation. Wang Junru said he was 15 when the Communists forced him to join a militia for teenagers. Later, he joined 170,000 other soldiers ordered to drive back hungry civilians. “We were told they were the enemy and they had to die,” he said.

	...Now 76 and embittered, he said young people should learn about what happened in Changchun — and during the rest of the civil war. “They only know the propaganda,” he said. “Maybe if they know how horrible war is, they can try to avoid it in the future.”


http://community.seattletimes.nwsource.com/archive/?date=19901122&slug=1105487
	Between the time the Chinese books were written in the late 1980s and the time they were published, however, China's limited political reforms became a casualty of the 1989 crackdown on the pro-democracy movement.

	Although high-ranking military officers criticized the books, they did not stop their own publishing houses from putting them out.


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Siege_of_Changchun
	The siege would last for 150 days, and resulted in the deaths from starvation of an estimated 80 percent of the civilian population. The siege ended when the People's Liberation Army entered Changchun after the Nationalist 60th Army and New 7th Army surrendered.

	Lin Biao commanded the Communist forces during the siege.


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Lin_Biao#Official_Chinese_narrative
	"Lin Biao incident"

	...Lin died when a plane carrying him and several members of his family crashed in Mongolia on September 13, 1971, allegedly after attempting to assassinate Mao and defect to the Soviet Union. Following Lin's death, there has been widespread skepticism in the West concerning the official Chinese explanation


http://ww2.odu.edu/ao/instadv/quest/LinBiao.html
	Distorting History: Lessons From The Lin Biao Incident

	By Qui Jin

	After the crash, Chinese officials issued strongly worded statements accusing Lin Biao of an attempted assassination of Mao, conspiracy to split the Chinese government, and masterminding an abortive coup d’etat. According to the official version, after all these plots failed, Lin and his family fled, intending to fly to the Soviet Union to defect.

	Despite strong verbal condemnations, however, the Chinese government failed to provide conclusive evidence to support the accusations, and above all, failed to provide convincing explanations of three key points: Why would Lin, the brilliant architect of pivotal victories in the Chinese Civil War who had been doggedly loyal to Mao for decades, suddenly attempt an ill-conceived coup? Why, when the alleged coup failed, would he defect to the Soviet Union when Taiwan and the United States were safer havens?

	...Many have asked me why I came to the United States to study Chinese history. My answer has always been the same — to study the Lin Biao Incident. ...after I came to the United States in 1989, I spent seven years in school, focusing both my master’s thesis and Ph.D. dissertation on this event before finally publishing the results in a recent book.

	Why is this particular occurrence so important to me that I would spend years of my life to study it?


https://books.google.com/books?id=Kc5wutpAuHgC&pg=PA68
	The Culture of Power: The Lin Biao Incident in the Cultural Revolution
	By Qiu Jin

	In March 1938, a severe injury removed Lin from military duty for several years until he resumed active command in 1942. In the winter of 1939 he went to the Soviet Union for medical treatment, but his stay there is shrouded in mystery; it is not even clear where and for how long Lin stayed in the hospital. Li Tianmin believes that the purpose of Lin's stay in the Soviet Union was not just medical. Ten other military officers accompanied him, most of who stayed at the Frunze Military Academy.


https://books.google.com/books?id=no4bCgAAQBAJ&pg=PA92
	Lin Biao's commander on the ground at Siping was Li Tianyou ...in 1939 he was sent to the Soviet Union for treatment of "severe neurosis." Li stayed in Russia for around four years, undergoing medical treatment and then studying as a special student at the Frunze military academy.


https://books.google.com/books?id=4cRgDQAAQBAJ&pg=PA171
	In 1938 when Lin Biao went to the battle in Shaanxi, he put on a Japanese uniform presented to him by his Japanese friends and was mistakenly shot by Yan Xi Shan's soldiers and got hurt in the back. He was sent to Moscow for medical treatment


https://www.cia.gov/library/readingroom/docs/DOC_0000283487.pdf
	...in early 1938, Lin was separated from Mao for four years while he was under treatment in the USSR. Lin got on very will with the Russians


https://books.google.com/books?id=Kc5wutpAuHgC&pg=PA68
	The Culture of Power: The Lin Biao Incident in the Cultural Revolution
	By Qiu Jin

	Some sources treat Lin as the Chinese representative to the Comintern and as such Mao's personal representative to Stalin. Mao did not trust Wang Ming, through whom the CCP normally communicated with the Soviets.  The only evidence from Soviet sources of Lin's presence is an article in the Communist International in August 1940 by a person named "Ling Pao."


https://digitalarchive.wilsoncenter.org/document/121890.pdf?v=af7b0cffe035f614832206e3b9f88a30
	January 04, 1939
	Translation of a Letter from Governor Shicai Sheng to Cdes. Stalin, Molotov, and Voroshilov

	...When a lecturer of the anti-Japanese University, Lin Biao, a senior Chinese Communist Party official, went to Moscow to be treated he visited me in the Governor's office with Fang Lin and had the following conversation with me


http://community.seattletimes.nwsource.com/archive/?date=19940327&slug=1902294
	The Soviets, it turned out, had extensive medical and dental records on Lin from a 1938-41 stay in Moscow, when he received treatment. Pulling out a sheaf of grisly photographs and materials, Tomilin detailed how he had matched wartime wounds to Lin's head, documented in the old Soviet medical records and in rare photographs, with grooves in the skull found at the crash site.


https://books.google.com/books?id=irZwPdzsH1EC&pg=PA163
	Mr. Brezhnev: We had treated Lin Piao earlier when he came to Moscow for medical treatment; we have documents in the files; X-rays of his teeth, etc. 


https://books.google.com/books?id=Kc5wutpAuHgC&pg=PA68
	The Culture of Power: The Lin Biao Incident in the Cultural Revolution
	By Qiu Jin

	It is also not clear whether Lin had any contact with Stalin or whether Lin served in the Soviet army against the Nazis while in the Soviet Union. During the Cultural Revolution, the Red Guards reported that Lin had been involved in the Stalingrad Campaign, and that Stalin had been so impressed by Lin's military prowess that he gave Lin his own pistol. This information, however, cannot be considered reliable because of the prevalence of propaganda in China during that period.


https://www.newspapers.com/newspage/158957135/
	The Daily Reporter from Greenfield, Indiana

	It is known that Lin was in the USSR for medical treatment after having been wounded in 1938. For three years. It is widely reported that he was an "observer" at the defense of Stalingrad.


https://books.google.com/books?id=Kc5wutpAuHgC
	The Culture of Power: The Lin Biao Incident in the Cultural Revolution
	By Qiu Jin

	...There are numerous incredible stories about Lin Biao's health problems, though they almost certainly contain elements of truth. There is little reason for the authors of the stories to have lied about Lin's health.

	...the defeat at Siping, which cost some 40,000 casualties. This was the first major defeat in Lin's career as a military commander. He attributed the loss to his own underestimation of Guomindang forces and to insufficient time to prepare properly.

	...Lin concentrated his troops along the railway lines from Shenyang to Beijing and launched the Liaoshen campaign. He captured the city of Jinzhou first, then proceeded to Changchun and Shenyang, overcoming strong resistance from Guomindang forces.

	...He may have been in the Soviet Union from 1953 to 1956 because of poor health.

	...When He Zizhen left Yanan for the Soviet Union for a rest,

	...In the mid-1950s, Jiang seemed to be repeating He Zizhen's tragedy. IN 1956 she almost collapsed physically and mentally and went to the Soviet Union to be treated 

	...Jiang Qing's devotion to Mao was unquestionable.


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Jiang_Qing#Death_of_Mao_Zedong


https://books.google.com/books?id=Kc5wutpAuHgC
	The Culture of Power: The Lin Biao Incident in the Cultural Revolution
	By Qiu Jin

	Although contemporary Chinese writers now typically portray Jiang as a dragon lady who took advantage of her husband's power to play her own political role, Mao probably could not have found a more appropriate wife. 


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Jiang_Qing#Political_persecution_of_enemies
	Jiang Qing incited radical youths organized as Red Guards against other senior political leaders and government officials, including Liu Shaoqi, the President at the time, and Deng Xiaoping, the Deputy Premier. Internally divided into factions both to the "left" and "right" of Jiang Qing and Mao, not all Red Guards were friendly to Jiang Qing.

	Jiang's rivalry with, and personal dislike of, Zhou Enlai led Jiang to hurt Zhou where he was most vulnerable. In 1968 Jiang had Zhou's adopted son (Sun Yang) and daughter (Sun Weishi) tortured and murdered by Maoist Red Guards. Sun Yang was murdered in the basement of Renmin University. After Sun Weishi died following seven months of torture in a secret prison (at Jiang's direction), Jiang made sure that Sun's body was cremated and disposed of so that no autopsy could be performed, and so that Sun's family could not have her ashes. In 1968 Jiang forced Zhou to sign an arrest warrant for his own brother. In 1973 and 1974, Jiang directed the "Criticize Lin, Criticize Confucius" campaign against premier Zhou because Zhou was viewed as one of Jiang's primary political opponents. In 1975, Jiang initiated a campaign named "Criticizing Song Jiang, Evaluating the Water Margin", which encouraged the use of Zhou as an example of a political loser. After Zhou Enlai died in 1976, Jiang initiated the "Five Nos" campaign in order to discourage and prohibit any public mourning for Zhou.


https://www.cia.gov/library/readingroom/docs/polo-22.pdf
	Central Intelligence Agency
	Intelligence Report
	Mao's "Cultural Revolution" III. The Purge of the P.L.A and the Stardom of Madame Mao

	...She has been quick to break those who oppose her. Even Mao's top two lieutenants, Lin Piao and Chou En-Lai, recognize her as dangerous. And Mao's use of the madame has actually increased the danger to his own position.


https://books.google.com/books?id=Kc5wutpAuHgC
	The Culture of Power: The Lin Biao Incident in the Cultural Revolution
	By Qiu Jin

	In the eyes of many Chinese, Ye Qun was also a malicious woman, greedy, capricious, and mean. Some members of Lin Biao's staff, however, described Ye as benign and caring,


https://www.cia.gov/library/readingroom/docs/polo-22.pdf
	Central Intelligence Agency
	Intelligence Report
	Mao's "Cultural Revolution" III. The Purge of the P.L.A and the Stardom of Madame Mao

	...the extremist Madame Mao was still its real leader, and Yeh Chun--Lin Piao's wife, and a person who seemed of the same type as Madame Mao--seemed to be increasingly important

	...Lin's wife may soon have, if she does not already have, a role second only to Mao's wife in conducting the ongoing purge


https://books.google.com/books?id=Kc5wutpAuHgC
	The Culture of Power: The Lin Biao Incident in the Cultural Revolution
	By Qiu Jin

	In Li's account, he did not realize the Lins were going to "betray the country" until he heard Lin himself ask Liguo on the car on the way to the airport, "How far away would Irkutsk be?" During the next few seconds, Li was torn over what to do. Finally, he realized what was happening; everything Doudou had told him was suddenly clear, and he realized that the group was heading for the Soviet Union. Torn between loyalty to his master and the well-being of his own family, Li asked himself what would happen to his wife and children if he were labeled a traitor to the country. He dared not think along that line.

	The car continued at high speed, approaching Building 58, the office of Unit 8341. By his own account, Li decided to side with his family instead of his master the moment he saw troops lining up beside the road at Building 58. He suddenly ordered the chauffeur to stop the car and jumped out before anyone in the car could stop him. It was at this point that gunshots rang out and Li was wounded. Nobody knows who fired the shots, though some eyewitnesses insist that Li shot himself. Zhang Qinglin, who attended to Li Wenpu on the spot, also insists that Li shot himself. In any case, the car stopped only for a second and then rushed ahead again.

	...There is no evidence to support the official claim that Lin had been actively involved in planning a final escape to the Soviet Union. 


https://books.google.com/books?id=Kc5wutpAuHgC
	In Li's account ... he heard Lin himself ask Liguo on the car on the way to the airport, "How far away would Irkutsk be?"


https://www.cia.gov/library/readingroom/docs/DOC_0000253617.pdf
	Central Intelligence Agency
	Intelligence Report
	The Purge of Lin Piao's "Conspiratorial Clique": A Tentative Reconstruction

	Most accounts agree that Lin had made plans for flight if necessary -- possibly contingent, as alleged, on the fortunes of his scheme to kill Mao in East China.

	...Lin and his wife and son -- leaving Lin's proteges behind in Peking -- were probably (as alleged) aboard the elite Trident aircraft which took off hurriedly from an airfield near Peitaiho after midnight on the night of 12-13 September and which crashed and burned at about 0300 on 13 September near the Soviet border, on a line with the big air complex at Irkutsk.


http://ww2.odu.edu/ao/instadv/quest/LinBiao.html
	Distorting History: Lessons From The Lin Biao Incident

	By Qui Jin

	The study of the event also raises disturbing questions about political control and the distorting forces active in modern China. It gives a clear example how the Chinese government tries to manipulate public thinking. Government officials have created a false narrative, a completely different picture, using almost the same evidence; forced those involved to “confess” their crimes by using only partial evidence against them; and implanted, without public complaint, the “official story” into the public record. Most Chinese don’t know enough to object to the government’s version of the Lin Biao Incident.


https://www.cia.gov/library/readingroom/docs/DOC_0000253617.pdf
	Central Intelligence Agency
	Intelligence Report
	The Purge of Lin Piao's "Conspiratorial Clique": A Tentative Reconstruction

	This Staff has received constructive comment on this study from a number of other offices of the Central Intelligence Agency, all of whom agree on the credibility of the essentials of the CCP's case against Lin, and several of whom agree in general with other findings of this study.

	...Lin and his proteges had concluded correctly that it was Mao's intention ultimately to purge them. To prevent this and to secure the succession, Lin's group planned a military "coup" against Mao, one which envisaged Mao's assassination if necessary. ...When Lin's plans for a coup were frustrated, he attempted to flee to the USSR


https://www.quora.com/Was-Lin-Biaos-attempted-coup-backed-by-Soviet-Union
	Was Lin Biao's attempted coup backed by Soviet Union?

	Julio Pino, Historian, Bad Hombre at Kent State University (1992-present)

	Highly unlikely. The circumstances of Lin Biao’s death, his plane supposedly crashing in Mongolia on his way to the Soviet Union, are laughable.

	...Lin Biao is said to have launched an assassination attempt against Mao’s personal train, and having failed, hopped aboard a plane bound for Moscow. Disney could not have written a better script.


http://www.washingtontimes.com/news/2016/jan/20/julio-pino-kent-state-prof-under-fbi-investigation/
	An associate professor at Kent State University in Ohio is being investigated by the FBI for possibly supporting the Islamic State, according to school officials. 

	The probe was revealed by a student newspaper after its editor was interviewed by the FBI as part of its probe into professor Julio Pino. 

	An unknown FBI agent told KentWired.com that a joint terrorism task force has been investigating the history professor for the last year and a half and said there is no direct threat to the university. 

	The agent said the FBI had interviewed several faculty members and more than 20 of Mr. Pino’s students. He is also being investigated for allegedly recruiting students to join the Islamic State


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Chinese_Civil_War#Fighting_subsides
	After the decisive Liaoshen, Huaihai and Pingjin campaigns, the CPC wiped out 144 regular and 29 non-regular KMT divisions, including 1.54 million veteran KMT troops. This effectively smashed the backbone of the KMT army.

	...On 23 April they captured the KMT's capital, Nanjing. The KMT government retreated to Canton (Guangzhou) until October 15, Chongqing until November 25, and then Chengdu before retreating to Taiwan on December 10. By late 1949 the People's Liberation Army was pursuing remnants of KMT forces southwards in southern China, and only Tibet was left. In addition, the Ili Rebellion was a Soviet-backed revolt by the Second East Turkestan Republic against the KMT from 1944–49, as the Mongolians in the People's Republic were in a border dispute with the Republic of China.

	...On October 1, 1949, Mao Zedong proclaimed the People's Republic of China


https://www.cia.gov/library/readingroom/docs/CIA-RDP85T00153R000300020014-2.pdf
	There is a term in party jargon coined by Lenin himself: 'a useful idiot.'


http://bookfi.net/dl/1026321/4847c5
	...he was deterred by having to learn Russian. He made a stab at it, taking lessons from a Russian emigre (and agent), Sergei Polevoy But according to Polevoy the other students teased Mao when he could not even master the alphabet, and he left in a huff Unlike many of his radical contemporaries, including most of the future Chinese Communist leaders, Mao went to neither France nor Russia.


https://en.wikiquote.org/wiki/Mao_Zedong#Quotes
	The chaos caused was on a grand scale and I take responsibility. Comrades, you must all analyse your own responsibility. If you have to shit, shit! If you have to fart, fart! You will feel much better for it.
	--Speech At The Lushan Conference (23 July 1959)


    Maybe you're afraid of sinking. Don't think about it. If you don't think about it, you won't sink. If you do, you will.
	--Swimming advice to physician Zhisui Li (1966), quoted in The TIME 100 (13 April 1998)


	[Mao] has played politics with Asian cunning. … [and] has always been a master at concealing his true intention. … I was always on my guard with him.
	--Nikita Khrushchev, as quoted in A. Doak Barnett (1977) China and the major powers in East Asia, page 352


http://bookfi.net/dl/1026321/4847c5
	Mao clashed frequently with his tutors. He ran away from his first school at the age of ten, claiming that the teacher was a martinet. He was expelled from, or was "asked to leave," at least three schools for being headstrong and disobedient. His mother indulged him but his father was not pleased, and Mao's hopping from tutor to tutor was just one source of tension between father and son. Yi-chang paid for Mao's education, hoping that his son could at least help keep the family accounts, but Mao disliked the task. All his life, he was vague about figures, and hopeless at economics. Nor did he take kindly to hard physical labour. He shunned it as soon as his peasant days were over.

	...Mao did not organise any peasant action in the style of poor versus rich. This was partly because he thought it was pointless. He had told Borodin and some other Communists before, on 18 January 1924:

		if we carry out struggles against big landlords, we are bound to fail. [In some areas, some Communists] organised the illiterate peasants first, then led them in struggles against relatively rich and big landlords. What was the result? Our organisations were immediately broken, banned, and these peasants not only did not regard us as fighting for their interests, they hated us, saying that if we hadn't organised them, there would not have been disasters, or misfortune. Therefore, until we are confident that our grassroots branches in the countryside are strong . . . we cannot adopt the policy of taking drastic steps against relatively rich landowners.

	Mao was being pragmatic. A Communist called Wang Hsien-tsung in Mao's area was organising poor peasants to improve their lot at the time when Mao was in Shaoshan. He was accused of being a bandit, and was arrested, tortured and beheaded by the local police.

	...When Mao first told the troops that they were about to become "Mountain Lords"--bandits--they were dumbfounded. This was not why they had joined a Communist revolution. But, speaking in the name of the Party, he assured them that they would be special bandits--part of an international revolution. Banditry was also their best chance, he argued: "Mountain Lords have never been wiped out, let alone us."


https://www.thevintagenews.com/2016/09/26/1958-mao-zedong-ordered-sparrows-killed-ate-much-grain-caused-one-worst-environmental-disasters-history/
	In 1958 Mao Zedong ordered all the sparrows to be killed because they ate too much grain. This caused one of the worst environmental disasters in history


http://bookfi.net/dl/1026321/4847c5
	...he wrote extensive commentaries on a book called A System of Ethics by a minor late-nineteenth-century German philosopher, Friedrich Paulsen. In these notes, Mao expressed the central elements in his own character, which stayed consistent for the remaining six decades of his life and defined his rule.

	...Mao's attitude to morality consisted of one core, the self "I," above everything else: "I do not agree with the view that to be moral, the motive of one's action has to be benefiting others. Morality does not have to be defined in relation to others . . . People like me want to . . . satisfy our hearts to the full, and in doing so we automatically have the most valuable moral codes. Of course there are people and objects in the world, but they are all there only for me."

	Mao shunned all constraints of responsibility and duty: "People like me only have a duty to ourselves; we have no duty to other people." "I am responsible only for the reality that I know, he wrote, "and absolutely not responsible for anything else. I don't know about the past, I don't know about the future. They have nothing to do with the reality of my own self." He explicitly rejected any responsibility towards future generations. "Some say one has a responsibility for history: I don't believe it. I am only concerned about developing myself. . . I have my desire and act on it. I am responsible to no one."

	...He argued that conscience could go to hell if it was in conflict with his impulses:

		These two should be one and the same. All our actions. . . are driven by impulse, and the conscience that is wise goes along with this in every instance. Sometimes . . . conscience restrains impulses such as over-eating or over-indulgence in sex. But conscience is only there to restrain, not oppose. And the restraint is for better completion of the impulse.

	As conscience always implies some concern for other people, and is not a corollary of hedonism, Mao was rejecting the concept. His view was: "I do not think these [commands like 'do not kill,' 'do not steal' and 'do not slander'] have to do with conscience. I think they are only out of self-interest for self-preservation." All considerations must "be purely calculation for oneself and absolutely not for obeying external ethical codes, or for so-called feelings of responsibility. . ."

	...These attributes he held to be reserved for "Great Heroes"--a group to which he appointed himself For this elite, he said:

	Everything outside their nature, such as restrictions and constraints, must be swept away by the great strength in their nature . . . When Great Heroes give full play to their impulses, they are magnificently powerful, stormy and invincible. Their power is like a hurricane arising from a deep gorge, and like a sex-maniac on heat and prowling for a lover. . . there is no way to stop them.


http://uselessdissident.blogspot.com/2008/11/interview-with-yuri-bezmenov-part-three.html
	...reach filthy-rich movie makers; intellectuals, so-called ‘academic’ circles; cynical, egocentric people who can look into your eyes with angelic expression and tell you a lie. These are the most recruitable people: people who lack moral principles, who are either too greedy or too much suffer from self importance. They feel that they matter a lot. These are the people whom the KGB wanted very much to recruit.


https://www.cia.gov/library/readingroom/docs/esau-35.pdf
	Central Intelligence Agency
	Intelligence Report

	...Mao's arrogance has continued to create friction.

	...Mao supremely arrogant, rejected minor CPSU concessions, demanded CPSU self-humiliation.


http://bookfi.net/dl/1026321/4847c5
	On the eve of his departure from Changsha, Mao took a stroll along the Xiang River, and wrote a poem in which he looked to the future:

		Eagles soar up the long vault,
		Fish fly down the shallow riverbed,
		Under a sky of frost, ten thousand creatures vie to impose their will.
		Touched by this vastness,
		I ask the boundless earth:
		who after all will be your master?

	Mao's nose did not fail him. Within two weeks of arriving in Canton, in September 1925, he was given a clutch of key jobs by the Nationalist chief Mao was to be Wang Ching-wei's stand-in, running the Propaganda Department, as well as editor of the Nationalists' new journal, Politics Weekly. And to underline his prominence, he also sat on the five-man committee vetting delegates for the Nationalists' second congress the following January at which he delivered one of the major reports. Wang's role in Mao's rise is something which has been sedulously obscured by Peking, all the more so because Wang became the head of the Japanese puppet government in the 1940s.

	...When he came to the question "How do we change [China]?," Mao laid the utmost emphasis on destruction: "the country must be . . . destroyed and then re-formed." He extended this line not just to China but to the whole world-and even the universe: "This applies to the county, to the nation, and to mankind . . . The destruction of the universe is the same. . . People like me long for its destruction, because when the old universe is destroyed, a new universe will be formed. Isn't that better!"

	...What fascinated Mao was violence that smashed the social order. And it was this propensity that caught Moscow's eye, as it fitted into the Soviet model of a social revolution. Mao was now published for the first time in the Comintern journal

	...Jiangxi men left town and moved across the River Gan to put themselves out of Mao's reach. They sent out a circular with this description of Mao:

		He is extremely devious and sly, selfish, and full of megalomania. To his comrades, he orders them around, frightens them with charges of crimes, and victimises them. He rarely holds discussions about Party matters . . . Whenever he expresses a view, everyone must agree, otherwise he uses the Party organisation to clamp down on you, or invents some trumped-up theories to make life absolutely dreadful for you. . .Mao always uses political accusations to strike at comrades. His customary method regarding cadres is to . . . use them as his personal tools. To sum up . . . not only is he not a revolutionary leader, he is not a . . . Bolshevik. Mao's goal, they said, was to "become Party Emperor."

	...It was through the Yenan Terror that Mao accomplished another most important goal: building up his own personality cult. People who lived through this period all remembered it as a turning point when they "firmly established in our minds that Chairman Mao is our only wise leader." Till then it had been possible to admire Mao while having reservations about him, and to gossip about his marriage to Jiang Qing while still supporting him as the leader. When they were first told to "study" a Mao speech, many had responded with an audible groan: "the same old thing," "can't be bothered to go over it again," "too simplistic." Quite a few had been reluctant to chant "Long live Chairman Mao." One recalled thinking: "This was a slogan for emperors. Why are we doing this? I felt creepy and refused to shout it." This kind of independent talk--and thinking--was killed off by the campaign, and the deification of Mao established. 


http://alphahistory.com/chineserevolution/lin-biao/
	Lin was also an active contributor to the Maoist cult of personality, compiling a collection of writings called Quotations from Chairman Mao Zedong; it became the famous ‘Little Red Book’, one of the enduring icons of communist China. During the Cultural Revolution era Lin commissioned hundreds of propaganda images that glorified Mao, the PLA and the Red Guards.


https://www.marxists.org/reference/archive/mao/works/red-book/quotes.htm
	150 Quotes from Mao Tse Tung

	When we look at a thing, we must examine its essence and treat its appearance merely as an usher at the threshold, and once we cross the threshold, we must grasp the essence of the thing; this is the only reliable and scientific method of analysis. 

	“A Single Spark Can Start a Prairie Fire” (January 5, 1930), Selected Works, Vol. I, p. 119.

	...Marxist philosophy holds that the law of the unity of opposites is the fundamental law of the universe. This law operates universally, whether in the natural world, in human society, or in man's thinking. Between the opposites in a contradiction there is at once unity and struggle, and it is this that impels things to move and change. Contradictions exist everywhere, but they differ in accordance with the different nature of different things. In any given phenomenon or thing, the unity of opposites is conditional, temporary and transitory, and hence relative, whereas the struggle of opposites is absolute.
	
	On the Correct Handling of Contradictions Among the People, (February 27, 1957), 1st pocket ed., p. 18.


https://www.marxists.org/reference/archive/mao/selected-works/volume-9/mswv9_01.htm
	WHERE DO CORRECT IDEAS COME FROM?

	This passage is from the “Draft Decision of the Central Committee of the Chinese Communist Party on Certain Problems in Our Present Rural Work”, which was drawn up under the direction of Comrade Mao Tse-tung. The passage was written by Comrade Mao Tse-tung himself

	...Countless phenomena of the objective external world are reflected in a man’s brain through his five sense organs  —  the organs of sight, hearing, smell, taste and touch. At first, knowledge is perceptual. The leap to conceptual knowledge, i.e., to ideas, occurs when sufficient perceptual knowledge is accumulated. This is one process in cognition. It is the first stage in the whole process of cognition, the stage leading from objective matter to subjective consciousness from existence to ideas. Whether or not one’s consciousness or ideas (including theories, policies, plans or measures) do correctly reflect the laws of the objective external world is not yet proved at this stage


https://www.cia.gov/library/readingroom/docs/DOC_0000283487.pdf
	Central Intelligence Agency
	Intelligence Report
	Lin Piao and the Great Helmsman

	Lin's own definition of his relationship with Mao is so extreme that it has sometimes been regarded as a hoax, a cynical exploitation of the old man's insatiable vanity. For more than 25 years Lin has been upholding Mao's "thought" and urging absolute faith in Mao, and in recent years he has praised Mao--in terms reminiscent of Stalin's sycophants--as always correct, the greatest of all Communists, the supreme genius, the source of all light, the answer to every problem.

	...The new Chinese cadre is made possible by the availability of Mao's thought, embodied in Mao the perfect man, who accepts deification not for himself, but on behalf of his "thought." Mao's "thought," in practice, calls first for unremitting political indoctrination, mainly the instillation of of moral incentives, producing the fanatical revolutionary will which works with all its might and fears "neither hardship nor death."

	...Lin Piao apparently took Mao Tse-tung as his man from the moment of meeting him in 1928. ...Lin is said to have agreed with Mao in those years on the principle of party domination of the military and to have stood with Mao against other elements of the party and military leadership who questioned Mao's policies. Early in the Long March of 1934-35, Lin was among Mao's supporters in the showdown with other party leaders which established Mao as the dominant figure

	...Early in 1960 Lin instructed the PLA to memorize the most important passages in Mao's works, "even though you do not understand them." (Lin was later, during the Cultural Revolution, to issue a similar order with respect to Mao's directives.)

	...Inter alia, Lin endorsed the "paper tiger" concept--that the West would be afraid to use its nuclear weapons and therefore could be aggressively opposed

	...In Janurary 1966 Lin again told the PLA that Mao's works were supreme directives and that "everything he says is the truth." 

	...Lin called for all party cadres to be judged on the criteria of whether they were or not avid students of Mao's thought, devoted to ideological-political work, and militant activists. He said again that there was much in Mao's lofty thought he could not understand, but that he would nevertheless carry out Mao's directives, asking for clarifying "instructions" on everything but recognizing that he would inevitably make "mistakes" for which he must accept the responsibility. This line soon appeared in simplified form as an exhortation to the PLA--to carry out Mao's policies "whether we understand them or not."

	...By mid-September, Lin was telling military audiences that Mao's works should constitute "99 percent" of Communist classics, and that Mao was the world's "supreme genius" and the greatest man known to history.


http://bookfi.net/dl/1026321/4847c5
	...this failure did not mean that Mao left the cities unravaged. His guideline for them was "Production first; Life takes second place." His ideal city was a purely industrial centre. Standing on Tiananmen Gate and looking out over the gorgeous palaces and temples and pagodas which in those days decorated Peking's skyline, he told the mayor: "In the future, I want to look around and see chimneys everywhere!"
	
	Worse, Mao wanted to destroy existing cities on a massive scale and build industrial centres on the ruins. In 1958 the regime did a survey of historic monuments in Peking. It listed 8,000--and decided to keep seventy-eight. Everyone who heard of the scheme, from the mayor down, pleaded against this level of destruction. Eventually, the order was not carried out so drastically--for a while.


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Cultural_Revolution
	Other aspects of the Red Guard onslaught were far more destructive, particularly in the realms of culture and religion. Historical sites in every part of the country were ransacked and destroyed. The damage was particularly pronounced in the capital, Beijing, a city rich in history and full of cultural relics, where thousands of designated sites of historical interest were destroyed. Red Guards also laid siege to the Temple of Confucius in Qufu, Shandong province.

	During these months of iconoclasm, Red Guards from Beijing Normal University desecrated and badly damaged the burial place of Confucius himself and numerous other historically significant tombs and artifacts. The corpse of the 76th-generation Duke Yansheng was removed from its grave and hung naked from a tree in front of the palace during the desecration of the cemetery in the Cultural Revolution.

	Libraries full of historical and foreign texts were destroyed; books were burned. Temples, churches, mosques, monasteries, and cemeteries were closed down and sometimes converted to other uses, looted, and destroyed. Marxist propaganda depicted Buddhism as superstition, and religion was looked upon as a means of hostile foreign infiltration, as well as an instrument of the 'ruling class'. Clergy were arrested and sent to camps; many Tibetan Buddhists were forced to participate in the destruction of their monasteries at gunpoint.


http://bookfi.net/dl/1026321/4847c5
	But at Mao's insistence, the centuries-old city walls and gates were mostly razed to the ground, and the earth used to fill in a beautiful lake in the city: "I am delighted that city walls in Nanjing, Jinan, and so on, are [also] torn down," Mao said. He was fond of mocking cultural figures who shed tears of anguish at such senseless destruction, and intellectuals were deliberately made to work on the wrecking crews. Many of the visible signs of Chinese civilisation disappeared for ever from the face of the earth.

	...Writing to a friend in November 1920, in which he complained about his own conditions as an intellectual, he remarked: "I think labourers in China do not really suffer poor physical conditions. Only scholars suffer."


http://bookfi.net/dl/1026321/4847c5
	Another fiasco that drained the peasants' energy and brought disaster, was an order from Mao that the entire nation had to "make steel." The Superpower Programme needed a lot of steel-and steel was also Mao's yardstick for superpower status. When he boasted to Communist leaders in Moscow in 1957 that China would "overtake Britain in fifteen years" (which he later shortened to three) and when he told the Chinese he was fully confident that China could "overtake America" in ten years, steel output was what he had in mind. Mao set the 1958 target at 10.7 million tons. How this came about illustrates his broad-brush approach to economics. Sitting by his swimming pool in Zhongnanhai on 19 June he said to the metallurgy minister: "Last year, steel output was 5.3 million tons. Can you double it this year?" The yes-man said: "All right." And that was that. Steel mills and related industries like coal mines were ordered to go flat out to speed up production. Rules, and common sense, were cast aside. Equipment was overworked to the point of breakdown, and over 30,000 workers were killed in serious accidents alone within a few months. Experts who tried to talk sense were persecuted. Mao set the tone for discrediting rationality by saying that "bourgeois professors' knowledge should be treated as dogs' fart, worth nothing, deserving only disdain," scorn, contempt. . .


https://books.google.com/books?id=5vgBaLfd9XsC&pg=PA170&lpg=PA170
	Mao's blind faith in the communes was match by his adherence to false science. He gave his imprimatur to the ideas of Trofim Lysenko, a Soviet agronomist and protege of Stalin, who claimed to have discovered ways of developing 'super-crops', which would grow in any soil in any season and provide a yield anything up to sixteen times greater than the harvests produced by traditional methods. Mao accepted all this, declaring 'in company grain grows fast; seeds are happiest when growing together.' He had convinced himself there was such a thing as 'socialist science', which could be used to reshape nature and produce abundance. In his attack attack on the intellectuals during the Hundred Flowers campaign he had demanded the dismissal of those scholars who still clung to the bourgeois notion that scientific research was a matter of objective observation rather than socialist enlightenment. He seemed not to appreciate that this demand contradicted his earlier and oft-repeated admonition that the comrades should 'seek truth from facts'.

	In 1958, Mao gave instructions that Lysenkoism was to be strictly followed in the planning of agriculture. An eight-point programme modelled on Lysenko's theories and covering all aspects of crop production was made mandatory in the countryside.


https://www.britannica.com/biography/Trofim-Lysenko
	Trofim Lysenko, in full Trofim Denisovich Lysenko (born 1898, Karlovka, Ukraine, Russian Empire—died November 20, 1976, Kiev, Ukrainian S.S.R.), Soviet biologist and agronomist, the controversial “dictator” of Communistic biology during Stalin’s regime. He rejected orthodox genetics in favour of “Michurinism” (named for the Russian horticulturist I.V. Michurin), which was begun by an uneducated plant breeder fashioning explanations for his hybrid creations. After Michurin’s death in 1935, Lysenko led the movement and transformed it into an assault on orthodox genetics.

	...Between 1948 and 1953, when he was the total autocrat of Soviet biology, he claimed that wheat plants raised in the appropriate environment produce seeds of rye, which is equivalent to saying that dogs living in the wild give birth to foxes.


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Lysenkoism
	Isaak Izrailevich Prezent, a main Lysenko theorist, presented Lysenko in Soviet mass-media as a genius who had developed a new, revolutionary agricultural technique. In this period, Soviet propaganda often focused on inspirational stories of peasants who, through their own canny ability and intelligence, came up with solutions to practical problems. Lysenko's widespread popularity provided him a platform to denounce theoretical genetics and to promote his own agricultural practices. He was, in turn, supported by the Soviet propaganda machine, which overstated his successes and omitted mention of his failures. This was accompanied by fake experimental data supporting Lysenkoism from scientists seeking favor and the destruction of counter-evidence to Lysenko's theories. Instead of performing controlled experiments, Lysenko claimed that vernalization increased wheat yields by 15%, solely based upon questionnaires taken of farmers.

	...Whenever the Party announced plans to plant a new crop or cultivate a new area, Lysenko had immediate practical suggestions on how to proceed.

	...So quickly did he develop his prescriptions—from the cold treatment of grain, to the plucking of leaves from cotton plants, to the cluster planting of trees, to unusual fertilizer mixes—that academic biologists did not have time to demonstrate that one technique was valueless or harmful before a new one was adopted. The Party-controlled newspapers applauded Lysenko's "practical" efforts and questioned the motives of his critics. Lysenko's "revolution in agriculture" had a powerful propaganda advantage over the academics, who urged the patience and observation required for science.

	...Support from Joseph Stalin gave Lysenko even more momentum and popularity. In 1935, Lysenko compared his opponents in biology to the peasants who still resisted the Soviet government's collectivization strategy, saying that by opposing his theories the traditional geneticists were setting themselves against Marxism. Stalin was in the audience when this speech was made, and he was the first one to stand and applaud, calling out "Bravo, Comrade Lysenko. Bravo." This event emboldened Lysenko and gave him and his ally Prezent free rein to slander the geneticists who still spoke out against him. Many of Lysenkoism's opponents, such as his former mentor Nikolai Ivanovich Vavilov, were imprisoned or even executed because of Lysenko's and Prezent's denunciations.


https://books.google.com/books?id=vTswH3fLLdgC&pg=PA188
	...It also sent abroad representatives of "advanced Soviet science." With the Central Committee's permission, such well-known disciples of Lysenko as Stolotev, Glushchenko, and Nuzhdin propagated Michurinist biology in East Germany, Hungary, Bulgaria, Poland, Czechoslovokia, and Austria during 1949. ...in the course of this action, Glushchenko delivered numerous lectures at agricultural and biological institutions and the Political Academy of the Hungarian Working People's Party in Budapest. He also visited Poland a delivered reports in Warsaw, Krakow, and Wroclaw. Stoletov made a lecture tour through Bulgaria, delivering reports "on the situation in biological science"

	...Soviet authorities also used various international gatherings to propagate Michurinist biology all over the world. At the 1949 World Congress for Peace in New York, a prominent Soviet biologist, Aleksandr Oparin, took the stand to express his Michurinist convictions. In summer 1950 one of the most ardent Lysenkoists, Glushchenko, passionately glorified his master and his ideas at the International Botanical Congress in Stockholm.

	...All possible means of propaganda were deployed in the Michurinist campaign. In December 1948 the Soviet film industry produced a new color film, Michurin. The author of the screenplay and director of the film was one of the country's most famous directors, Aleksandr Dovzhenko, the music was composed by Dimitrii Shostakovich, and the starring role was played by one of the most popular actors of the time, Grigorii Belov. The film had actually been finished before the VASKhNiL meeting and, as a result, did not reflect the ultimate victory of Michurinist biology over the pernicious Mendalism-Morganism. ...As one might expect, this film was shown not only in the Soviet Union but also abroad.

	...The propaganda of Michurinism, then, occupied a considerable place in Soviet activities in the international scene in the late 1940s and early 1950s. Such propaganda was focused on Bulgaria, East Germany, Czechoslovokia, Hungary, Poland, and Romania, but was not limited to the "fraternal" socialist countries. Similar activity was directed at Western countries, including Belgium, Britain, France, and Sweden.


https://www.cia.gov/library/readingroom/docs/CIA-RDP80R01426R010400040001-5.pdf
	The reply of N.S. Khrushchev: "The staff must be looked over. Evidently, people who were selected as editors are against Michurin's science. As long as they remain there nothing will change. They must be replaced, others, real Michurinites, must be appointed. Therein lies the radical solution of the problem." The wrong direction taken by the editorial board of the "Botanical Journal" [Botanicheekii Zhurnal] has been voiced in a number of articles. They do not bear the character of an occasional, isolated incident, but characterize a position that pursued the objective of censuring the fundamental propositions in the works of Academician Lysenko.

	...by now it is obvious to all that Michurin's direction in genetics is not just a local Russian phenomenon in science. At the Congress, several reports were made by scientists from Switzerland, Japan, England and other countries who by virtue of the brilliant examples of their own experiments demonstrated conclusively to what extent their approach to the study of hereditary phenomena had been enriched since they had acquainted themselves with Michirin's works and had begun to use these principles in their own investigation.

	...A tendency to revise a serious of principles of contemporary genetics in the light of Michurin's teaching has been observed in foreign science. The teaching on the independence of heredity from external conditions and the problem of hereditary transmission of acquired characteristics are becoming increasingly subjects of doubt. Thus, the basic principles of Michurin's genetics increasingly attract the attention of and exert their influence upon West-European science.


https://books.google.com/books?id=vTswH3fLLdgC&pg=PA188
	...in late August 1948 the Soviet delegation proposed a resolution condemning formal genetics as an "imperialist" science. Michurinist biology, then, became the embodiment of socialist science, while Weismannism-Mendelism-Morganism epitomized capitalist science. ...as with many other forms of propaganda, the Central Committee used the Michurinist campaign to ideologically consolidate the Eastern bloc in its confrontation with the west.


https://books.google.com/books?id=Ul5THCLL6roC&pg=PA119
	I. I. Prezent ... though he began his career as a partisan of Mendelian and Morganist theories of heredity and speciation, he had reversed that position by the time he established a power base in a variety of academic positions. He aided Lysenko's rise to dominance in Soviet biology and provided him with the trappings of ideological legitimacy--a dialectical materialist and properlry socialist rationale for attacking and rejecting classical genetics. Lysenko took from Prezent the argument that science inevitably has a class nature: If Marxism is correct, then how could science developed within bourgeois-capitalist society be appropriate for a revolutionary socialist one? Science produced by and practiced in a bourgeois-capitalist society could only be idealist, formalistic, metaphysical. Only science that evolved out of a socialist society, like Lysenko's biology, was valid.


https://www.usnews.com/news/national/articles/2009/01/02/new-evidence-of-a-soviet-spy-in-the-us-nuclear-program
	In a new book, two former nuclear weapons scientists make the case that Soviet spies didn't just steal atomic secrets from the Manhattan Project in the 1940s—something historians have known for years—but say a previously unknown spy also helped the Soviets design their first hydrogen bomb. The Soviet Union detonated its first thermonuclear bomb in 1953, only a year after the first American H-bomb was tested, ending the period of nuclear supremacy the U.S. military enjoyed after World War II.

	...There is little doubt, in fact, that the Soviets' first nuclear weapon—a plutonium bomb like the one dropped on Nagasaki, Japan—was the result of espionage. "We know now that their first design was a carbon-copy of the 'Fat-Man,' "

	...Nearly a dozen Soviet spies—including Julius and Ethel Rosenberg and Klaus Fuchs—were executed or imprisoned after World War II for passing atomic secrets to the Soviets, including information about the plutonium bomb and the early work on the hydrogen bomb. Last year, Vladimir Putin, then Russia's president, shocked American historians and government officials alike when he announced that an undetected spy, George Koval, had also penetrated the Manhattan Project.


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Lysenkoism
	...On August 7, 1948, the V.I. Lenin Academy of Agricultural Sciences announced that from that point on Lysenkoism would be taught as "the only correct theory". Soviet scientists were forced to denounce any work that contradicted Lysenko's research. Criticism of Lysenko was denounced as "bourgeois" or "fascist", and analogous "non-bourgeois" theories also flourished in other fields in the Soviet academy at this time. Interestingly, perhaps the only opponents of Lysenkoism during Stalin's lifetime to escape liquidation came from the small community of Soviet nuclear physicists: as Tony Judt has observed, "It is significant that Stalin left his nuclear physicists alone and never presumed to second guess their calculations. Stalin may well have been mad but he was not stupid."


http://inss.ndu.edu/Portals/68/Documents/occasional/cswmd/CSWMD_OccasionalPaper-11.pdf
	The Soviet Biological Weapons Program and Its Legacy in Today's Russia

	Raymond A. Zilinskas

	Their research revealed that the BW program was headed by Ginsburg and initially focused on weaponizing Bacillus anthracis and Clostridium botulinum and developing efficient methods of disinfecting persons and equipment contaminated with pathogens. According to Fishman’s 1928 progress report, Ginsburg’s group attempted to enhance properties of B. anthracis spores, which already in their natural state are well suited for purposes of BW, being both virulent and hardy, but which conceivably could be made even deadlier by using classical microbiology techniques of mutation, selection, and propagation. 

	...Many able microbiologists fell victim to Stalin’s purges in the late 1930s, including Fishman, the founder of the Soviet Union’s BW program. Of more importance to this study, the People’s Commissariat for Internal Affairs (NKVD) arrested many microbiologists to secure expertise that it could exploit at small cost. As has been vividly described by Aleksandr I. Solzhenitsyn, the NKVD often placed imprisoned scientists and engineers in groups called sharaga and allowed them to work much as they did in their “free” days. For example, N.A. Gaysky, a specialist on Francisella tularensis, was ordered to work as a member of a sharaga developing a vaccine against tularemia at the Third Experimental Laboratory of the Red Army.


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Soviet_biological_weapons_program#World_War_II
	Tularemia was allegedly used against German troops in 1942 near Stalingrad. Around 10,000 cases of tularemia had been reported in the Soviet Union between 1941 and 1943. However, the number of cases jumped to more than 100,000 in the year of the Stalingrad outbreak. German Panzer troops fell ill in such significant numbers during the late summer of 1942 that the German military campaign came to a temporary halt. German soldiers became ill with the rare pulmonary form of tularemia, which may indicate the use of an aerosol biological weapon (the ordinary transmission pathway is through ticks and rodents).


http://inss.ndu.edu/Portals/68/Documents/occasional/cswmd/CSWMD_OccasionalPaper-11.pdf
	The Soviet Biological Weapons Program and Its Legacy in Today's Russia

	Raymond A. Zilinskas

	Despite the decimation of Soviet scientists by Stalin, presumably a sufficient number of them survived for the Soviet Union to have maintained an active BW program until World War II and beyond.

	...Second, and perhaps more important, applied microbiology for BW purposes, and likely for civilian purposes as well, was unproductive in the 1960s due to the negative influence of agronomist Trofim Lysenko on the biosciences.


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Soviet_biological_weapons_program#World_War_II
	By 1960, numerous BW research facilities existed throughout the Soviet Union. Although the USSR also signed the 1972 Biological Weapons Convention (BWC), the Soviets subsequently augmented their biowarfare programs. They doubted the United States’ claimed compliance with the BWC, which further motivated their program. The Soviet BW effort became a huge program, comprising various institutions under different ministries along with commercial facilities


http://inss.ndu.edu/Portals/68/Documents/occasional/cswmd/CSWMD_OccasionalPaper-11.pdf
	The Soviet Biological Weapons Program and Its Legacy in Today's Russia

	Raymond A. Zilinskas

	Beginning in the 1930s, by using doctored data, Lysenko convinced Stalin that when an agricultural technique he had developed, termed vermalization, was used on a large scale, it would double or triple the crop yields of Soviet agriculture.


http://www.reuters.com/article/us-syria-crisis-usa-sarin-idUSBRE93N01W20130424
	Analysis: Crossing Obama's "red line" on Syria will require concrete proof

	Raymond Zilinskas, a chemical and biological weapons expert at the Monterey Institute's James Martin Center for Nonproliferation Studies, said photographic evidence cited by the Israeli official - with victims foaming at the mouth - showed symptoms consistent with the use of a nerve agent such as sarin gas.

	But he questioned whether photographic evidence alone could prove chemical weapons use.

	"The difficult part is - what you really need are samples," said Zilinskas.


https://www.washingtonpost.com/world/syrian-activists-accuse-government-of-deadly-chemical-attack-near-damascus/2013/08/21/aea157e6-0a50-11e3-89fe-abb4a5067014_story.html
	Syrian activists accuse government of deadly chemical attack near Damascus

	Some experts questioned the video evidence. “It strikes me as odd that the people who are treating the infected victims are not undressing them,” said Raymond Zilinskas, a biologist and former U.N. weapons inspector in Iraq. “When you’re dealing with a chemical event, there is always a ‘red zone’ and a ‘green zone’ — always,” to protect medical providers.


https://www.forbes.com/sites/kenrapoza/2013/09/12/on-syria-putin-becomes-man-of-reason/#5d7b1c3d726b
	“Boots on the ground will be necessary. The question is: ‘Where will they come from?’” former United Nations weapons inspector Raymond Zilinskas told RIA Novosti yesterday.


http://jordantimes.com/opinion/michael-jansen/sarin-investigations-refutations-and-vested-interests
	Two other analysts tapped were David Kaye, former chief UN inspector for Iraq, who was associated with a think tank funded by the Pentagon, and Raymond Zilinskas who, said Ghoshroy, “once spoke enthusiastically about the evidence presented at the UN Security Council by Gen. Colin Powell about WMD [weapons of mass destruction] in Iraq, which was discredited later as false”.


https://www.forbes.com/sites/peterferrara/2013/04/28/the-disgraceful-episode-of-lysenkoism-brings-us-global-warming-theory/
	The Disgraceful Episode Of Lysenkoism Brings Us Global Warming Theory

	Peter Ferrara 

	Lysenkoism was “politically correct” (a term invented by Lenin) because it was consistent with certain broader Marxist doctrines. Marxists wanted to believe that heredity had a limited role

	...Is not man-caused, catastrophic global warming now the only theory allowed to be taught in schools in the West?

	Those in positions of scientific authority in the West who have collaborated with this new Lysenkoism because they felt they must be politically correct, and/or because of the money, publicity 


https://www.bloomberg.com/news/articles/2005-12-15/op-eds-for-sale
	...isn't the only think-tanker to have received payments from Abramoff for writing articles. Peter Ferrara, a senior policy adviser at the conservative Institute for Policy Innovation, says he, too, took money from Abramoff to write op-ed pieces boosting the lobbyist's clients. "I do that all the time," Ferrara says. "I've done that in the past, and I'll do it in the future."


https://www.forbes.com/sites/peterferrara/2013/05/26/to-the-horror-of-global-warming-alarmists-global-cooling-is-here/
	To The Horror Of Global Warming Alarmists, Global Cooling Is Here

	Peter Ferrara 

	NASA’s climate science has been controlled for years by global warming hysteric James Hansen, who recently announced his retirement.

	But this same concern is increasingly being echoed worldwide. The Voice of Russia reported on April 22, 2013,

		“Global warming which has been the subject of so many discussions in recent years, may give way to global cooling. According to scientists from the Pulkovo Observatory in St.Petersburg, solar activity is waning, so the average yearly temperature will begin to decline...”


https://www.cnas.org/publications/blog/5-questions-with-someone-interesting-charles-emmerson
	5 Questions with Someone Interesting: Charles Emmerson

	...although there are still a number of Russian scientists – including at the Arctic and Antarctic Research Institute in St. Petersburg – who argue that the anthropogenic contribution is generally overstated in the West. 


http://www.elliswashingtonreport.com/2016/06/23/savage-exposes-lysenkoism-and-obamaism/
	Lysenko actually believed genes didn’t exist, a view shared by Stalin.

	~ Michael Savage

	...Likewise Savage writes, “In the Soviet Union under Stalin, people were forbidden to believe that genes exist, just like people in Obama’s America are forbidden to believe that man-made climate change doesn’t exist.” “Marxists have to stamp out the truth or no one would tolerate their rule,” Savage writes. “That’s why Stalin needed a fake scientist to push Lysenkoism in the USSR...”


https://www.infowars.com/michael-savage-old-world-order-wants-perennial-friction-with-russia/
	Michael Savage: Old World Order Wants Perennial Friction With Russia

	“It’s like firemen who start fires to justify their jobs”


http://mobile.wnd.com/2014/03/obamas-ukrainian-pink-line/
	Putin crosses Obama's pink line
	Michael Savage

	Let me make sense of what’s happening in Ukraine for you as that country descends into armed chaos, threatening to oust the legitimately elected Ukrainian President Viktor Yanukovich and place the country in the hands of rebel forces spearheaded by Ukrainian neo-Nazis and Chechen Islamist radicals.

	...The situation in Ukraine has been painted as a conflict between Vladimir Putin’s Russia, the so-called bad guys, and Ukrainian rebels, the so-called good guys who seek to oust Russia from a position of influence in Ukraine


http://www.breitbart.com/radio/2017/04/09/michael-savage-syria-no-win-situation/
	Michael Savage spoke out forcefully against intervention in Syria and aggression towards Russia during both Thursday’s and Friday’s monologue segments of the Michael Savage Show.

	Savage asked Thursday, “who got to you, Mr. President? Who is whispering in your ear and could have made you make this dramatic of a change towards Russia in just three days?” On Friday he condemned the strikes, saying “we just helped ISIS.”

	Although his Thursday remarks were broadcast before the United States attacked a Syrian airbase, Savage warned against military action that would raise tensions with Russia, saying, “Do you want war with Russia, all of you idiots, all of you fools who are pounding the war drums?” Savage compared President Trump to President Woodrow Wilson, noting that Thursday was the 100-year anniversary of Wilson asking for a declaration of war on Germany. According to Savage, “Like Trump, Woodrow Wilson ran on an ‘America first’ platform. He was elected largely because he kept us out of the war in Europe. But someone got to him, too.”


http://www.smithsonianmag.com/science-nature/when-the-soviet-union-chose-the-wrong-side-on-genetics-and-evolution-23179035/
	When the Soviet Union Chose the Wrong Side on Genetics and Evolution
	By Sarah Zielinski

	Whenever I hear that some political figure has attempted to legislate science to suit the convenience of their political beliefs—and this happens fairly frequently, even here in the United States—I think back to biology class and the story of Trofim Lysenko in the early years of the Soviet Union. 

	...Michurinist biology, which later morphed into Lysenkoism, was convenient for a Soviet government trying to engineer the perfect social utopia.


https://www.sciencenewsforstudents.org/article/even-some-olympic-athletes-cheat-drugs
	Even some Olympic athletes cheat with drugs
	By Sarah Zielinski

	Athletes also can get banned for refusing to participate in (or tampering with) efforts to find others who use doping drugs. The Russian scandal involved an elaborate plot to interfere with these tests.

	...“Doping is a constant battle,” she warns, “especially in elite sports.”

	A long history of doping in sports


http://www.smithsonianmag.com/science-nature/us-could-switch-mostly-renewable-energy-no-batteries-needed-180957925/
	By Sarah Zielinski 

	...the United States could reduce carbon emissions by 33 to 78 percent from 1990 levels, depending on the exact cost of renewable energy and natural gas. (The lower the cost of renewable energy and the higher the cost of natural gas, the more carbon savings.) Adding coal into the mix did not make electricity any cheaper, but it did result in a 37 percent increase in carbon emissions.


https://www.aaas.org/news/us-moves-toward-becoming-natural-gas-exporter-experts-consider-implications
	Sarah Zielinski

	...Natural gas can help decrease greenhouse gas emissions in regions that are now reliant on coal

	...The move to natural gas can be seen as an intermediate step on the path from coal


https://www.infowars.com/study-selling-us-natural-gas-abroad-could-create-136000-jobs/
	Study: Selling US Natural Gas Abroad Could Create 136,000 Jobs


http://www.zerohedge.com/news/2016-05-05/natural-gas-sexy-once-again-macro-fundamentals-standpoint-video
	Natural Gas is Sexy Once Again from a Macro Fundamentals Standpoint (Video) 


https://www.google.com/search?q=site:zerohedge.com+natural+gas


http://www.smithsonianmag.com/science-nature/emissions-of-methane-a-potent-greenhouse-gas-may-be-underestimated-180947838/


http://www.smithsonianmag.com/science-nature/natural-gas-really-better-coal-180949739/
	Natural Gas Really Is Better Than Coal
	By Sarah Zielinski

	A report published today in Science, however, concludes that the United States’ leaky natural gas production system currently isn’t leaking enough methane to make it worse fuel for the climate than coal.


http://www.economist.com/news/business/21702493-natural-gass-reputation-cleaner-fuel-coal-and-oil-risks-being-sullied-methane
	EDF has found that a disproportionate amount of fugitive emissions from the oil and gas infrastructure comes from a few “super-emitting” sites. In rare cases, like Aliso Canyon, they can take months to plug. More often the culprits may be well-side storage tanks with faulty valves, which may be fixable just with a wrench, but while left unattended billow methane into the air.


https://www.nytimes.com/2016/07/12/business/energy-environment/future-of-natural-gas-hinges-on-stanching-methane-leaks.html
	That runaway gas also creates about the same short-term climate impact as 240 coal-fired power plants, according to the Environmental Defense Fund.


http://pubs.acs.org/doi/abs/10.1021/acs.est.6b04303?journalCode=esthag
	Future energy systems may rely on natural gas as a low-cost fuel to support variable renewable power. However, leaking natural gas causes climate damage because methane (CH4) has a high global warming potential.

	...A unifying result is that the largest 5% of leaks typically contribute over 50% of the total leakage volume.

	...Our results suggest that published uncertainty ranges of CH4 emissions are too narrow, and that larger sample sizes are required in future studies


http://www.smithsonianmag.com/science-nature/size-california-methane-leak-isnt-scariest-part-story-180958234/
	The Size of the California Methane Leak Isn’t the Scariest Part of the Story
	By Sarah Zielinski
	February 26, 2016

	“On the scale of the control efforts that have been put in place to minimize greenhouse gas emissions, it rolls that back years,” says study co-author Thomas Ryerson, a research chemist at the National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration.

	Though methane is a powerful greenhouse gas and the Aliso Canyon event was a “monster” emitter, the event highlights an even bigger problem, Conley says. There are hundreds of natural gas storage facilities like this one around the country, and there’s nothing in place to monitor these facilities for leaks or respond to them quickly.


https://www.infowars.com/pseudoscience-in-the-witness-box-the-fbi-faked-an-entire-field-of-forensic-science/
	Pseudoscience in the Witness Box: The FBI faked an entire field of forensic science


https://www.newscientist.com/blogs/shortsharpscience/2009/12/since-over-1000-confidential-e.html
	The Russian secret service has been accused of masterminding the theft of the confidential data from one of the world's leading centres of climate change research. The charge comes as news emerges that hacked climate scientists have received death threats.

	Since over 1000 emails were hacked from a server at the University of East Anglia's Climate Research Unit, it's been hard not to play climate change Cluedo: who committed the crime?


http://www.smithsonianmag.com/science-nature/five-frightening-observations-latest-international-report-climate-change-180950330/
	Adaptation cannot save us from all the negative impacts of pumping greenhouse gases into the atmosphere
	By Sarah Zielinski 

	The low-lying zone of the world’s coasts takes up just two percent of land but it’s home to 10 percent of the world’s population, some 600 million people. That includes 13 percent of the urban population.

	As sea level rise creeps up on these regions and inundates them—particularly during storms—land will become unusable and people will have to move. This is especially a worry for low-lying islands and areas of south, southeast and east Asia, such as Bangladesh.


http://www.zerohedge.com/news/2017-03-20/visualizing-worlds-extreme-population-density
	Bangladesh and three provinces in India, which are highlighted in red, take up just 160,000 sq. mi (415,000 sq. km) – that’s smaller than California. Together they hold more population than all of the blue territories on the map.


http://wildthings.sarahzielinski.com/blog/the-iberian-lynx-is-doomed-maybe/
	Sarah Zielinski 

	...a new study from Nature Climate Change predicts that the lynx could be extinct by 2060, driven off the planet by anthropogenic climate change.


http://nerdragenews.com/kauais-native-forest-birds-are-headed-toward-extinction/
	Kauai’s native forest birds are headed toward extinction

	by Sarah Zielinski

	...A 2014 study found that disease prevalence in birds had more than doubled there between 1994-1997 and 2007-2013. Climate change had warmed the plateau enough that disease-laden mosquitoes could spread.


http://www.smithsonianmag.com/science-nature/climate-change-will-accelerate-earths-sixth-mass-extinction-180955138/
	Climate Change Will Accelerate Earth’s Sixth Mass Extinction
	By Sarah Zielinski

	...Some people have called the phenomenon the sixth mass extinction, on par with the catastrophic demise of the large dinosaurs 65 million years ago. To try and combat the declines, scientists have been racing to make predictions about which species are most likely to go extinct, along with when and where it will happen


http://www.smithsonianmag.com/science-nature/and-the-next-species-predicted-to-be-lost-to-climate-change-is-2395688/
	And the Next Species Predicted to Be Lost to Climate Change is…
	By Sarah Zielinski 


http://www.smithsonianmag.com/science-nature/does-climate-change-cause-war-66970734/
	Does Climate Change Cause War?
	By Sarah Zielinski 

	We can also see from these studies that there are no easy answers in this arena. Any conflict—even one as simple as an argument with a neighbor that ends in a fistfight—has a complex set of factors that work together to foster the violence. The assassination of Archduke Ferdinand may have started World War I, but it didn’t cause it. And countries aren’t going to go to war with each other because their local climate has slowly changed over decades. But those changes could contribute to other internal and international strife and have consequences we cannot foresee. As one intelligence source told Wired in 2008, “Climate change is a threat multiplier in the world’s most unstable regions….It’s like a match to the tinder.”


http://www.smithsonianmag.com/science-nature/eight-ways-climate-change-hurts-humans-180950475/


http://www.smithsonianmag.com/science-nature/changing-climate-may-have-led-to-angkors-downfall-26114884/


http://www.smithsonianmag.com/science-nature/accepting-the-idea-of-extinction-26184285/


http://www.smithsonianmag.com/science-nature/death-from-the-skies-16038946/


http://www.smithsonianmag.com/science-nature/the-end-of-the-world-as-we-know-it-16213692/


http://www.smithsonianmag.com/science-nature/titanic-vs-lusitania-who-survived-and-why-24622866/
	Titanic vs. Lusitania: Who Survived and Why?
	By Sarah Zielinski 

	The composition of the survivors was very different, though. On the Titanic, women aged 16 to 35 (child-bearing age) were more likely to survive than other age groups, as were children and people with children. On the Lusitania, both women and men aged 16 to 35 were the most likely to have lived through the incident. There were class differences, too. First-class passengers fared the best on the Titanic but the worst—even worse than third-class passengers—on the Lusitania.

	What happened? The researchers say it all comes down to time.

	The passengers of the Lusitania had less than 20 minutes before their ship sank, and in such a life-and-death situation, social scientists say, "self-interested reactions predominate." It didn't matter what the captain ordered. The ship was going down and people reacted selfishly, and in such a situation, it would be expected that people in their prime (16 to 35) would be the most likely to win a seat on a lifeboat.


http://wildthings.sarahzielinski.com/blog/wild-things-has-moved-to-science-news/
	Sarah Zielinski

	I am pleased to announce that this blog has moved to Science News magazine’s brand new website, which just launched today (it’s still trickling through the internet, so don’t be surprised if you see a security notification or get another little hiccup). I’ll still be writing about all the weird and wonderful stuff I come across, just in a different place. Come check out Wild Things and the site’s other blogs — including Gory Details by Erika Engelhaupt and Growth Curve by Laura Sanders


https://www.sciencenews.org/author/laura-sanders
	Laura Sanders is a freelance science writer based in Corvallis, Oregon, who blogs about the science of raising kids. 


https://www.infowars.com/airplane-contrails-may-be-creating-accidental-geoengineering/
	Airplane Contrails May Be Creating Accidental Geoengineering
	Sarah Zielinski


https://www.google.com/search?q=site%3Ainfowars.com+chemtrails


http://www.wnd.com/2016/04/sky-criminals/
	Chemtrailing is the “public’s term for the classified [covert] and ongoing artificial modification of Earth’s climate systems using reflective nano-materials (aerosols) to reflect sunlight. The aerosols are dispersed via jet aircraft trails that expand into reflective artificial clouds.”

	Sarah Zielinski, an award-winning science writer and editor, wrote a piece in December 2015 for the Smithsonian, titled, “Airplane Contrails May Be Creating Accidental Geoengineering.”

	...It’s time again to wake up, America.


http://www.smithsonianmag.com/science-nature/gender-bias-hurricanes-female-names-deadly-180951622A/
	Our Gender Biases May Be Making Hurricanes With Female Names More Deadly
	By Sarah Zielinski 


http://www.smithsonianmag.com/science-nature/dieting-may-cause-the-brain-to-eat-itself-40389413/
	Dieting May Cause The Brain to Eat Itself
	By Sarah Zielinski 


http://www.smithsonianmag.com/science-nature/tornadoes-are-now-ganging-united-states-climate-change-180953069/
	Tornadoes Are Now Ganging Up in the United States
	By Sarah Zielinski 


http://www.smithsonianmag.com/author/sarah-zielinski/


https://www.sciencenews.org/author/sarah-zielinski


http://www.smithsonianmag.com/science-nature/the-overwhelming-data-we-refuse-to-believe-115866232/
	The Overwhelming Data We Refuse To Believe
	By Sarah Zielinski 

	Polls say that Americans trust scientists more than, say, politicians, but that trust is on the decline. If we’re losing faith in science, we’ve gone down the wrong path. Science is no more than a process (as recent contributors to our “Why I Like Science” series have noted), and skepticism can be a good thing. But for many people that skepticism has grown to the point that they can no longer accept good evidence when they get it, with the result that “we’re now in an epidemic of fear like one I’ve never seen and hope never to see again,” says Michael Specter, author of Denialism, in his TEDTalk below.

	...This path has the potential to lead to some pretty dark times, as Specter says:

		When you start down the road where belief and magic replace evidence and science, you end up in a place you don’t want to be. You end up in Thabo Mbeki South Africa. He killed 400,000 of his people by insisting that beetroot garlic and lemon oil were much more effective than the antiretroviral drugs we know can slow the course of AIDS. Hundreds of thousands of needless deaths in a country that has been plagued worse than any other by this disease.


http://www.smithsonianmag.com/science-nature/playing-pandemic-the-board-game-11073768/
	Playing Pandemic, the Board Game

	Sunday afternoon, some friends and I sat down to play Pandemic, the board game. It seemed appropriate, since we had just been discussing the swine flu outbreak. Pandemic is a cooperative board game in which 2 to 4 people work together to cure four diseases before it’s too late. There is no winner—either you all win or you all lose (i.e., everyone dies).

	...Some of the dissatisfaction may derive from the cooperative nature of the game. Perhaps it would have been more challenging if one player had been selected to work against the others. Or there could have been more roadblocks, such as uncooperative governments, rapidly mutating viruses or treatments/vaccines that lost efficacy.


https://www.aaas.org/news/ebola-highlights-problems-global-health-security
	Ebola Highlights Problems With Global Health Security
	Sarah Zielinski


http://www.smithsonianmag.com/science-nature/swine-flu-worst-case-scenario-16152039/
	Swine Flu: Worst Case Scenario
	By Sarah Zielinski 


http://www.slate.com/articles/health_and_science/medical_examiner/2015/11/antibiotic_resistant_superbug_bacteria_are_everywhere.html
	Superbugs Are Everywhere
	How to stop deadly antibiotic-resistant bacteria.
	By Sarah Zielinski

	Experts have warned that we may be headed for a “post-antibiotic era” in which the drugs no longer work. The drugs have been a literal lifesaver for millions of people, contributing to a dramatic increase in lifespan in the past century. A future without them is absolutely terrifying. A bout of strep throat, an ear infection, or even a cut on your finger could be deadly. Medical treatments that now save people—from chemotherapy to transplants to surgery to dialysis—would bring such a risk of infection that it might be too dangerous to perform them.


http://www.smithsonianmag.com/science-nature/wanted-chief-scientific-advisor-for-mi5-10693789/
	Wanted: Chief Scientific Advisor for MI5

	Reading further, though, they’re not really looking for a Q (I hope they already have one). Instead,they want someone who can provide advice on real-world issues where science and security meet, such as chemical or biological weapons. (I’m still wondering why they don’t have someone doing that already.)


http://www.smithsonianmag.com/science-nature/vaccine-week-a-history-of-vaccine-backlash-18947333/
	Vaccine Week: A History of Vaccine Backlash
	By Sarah Zielinski

	It’s kind of startling that the idea of vaccines ever caught on. There is an amazing amount of trust needed: A person—often a complete stranger—is injecting you with a foreign substance. You have to trust that the substance is really what you’ve been told it is, that it has been sufficiently tested and is safe, and that it will work as advertised and not hurt you.

	...Efforts to eradicate polio—a disease now confined to just a few countries—came off track in Nigeria due to a 2004 rumor that the vaccine “contained birth control drugs as part of a secret western plot to reduce population growth in the Muslim world.” Polio is on the rise again in Nigeria, and more than 100 children have been left paralyzed by the disease this year. 


https://www.infowars.com/vaccinate-the-world-gates-rockefeller-seek-global-population-reduction/
	The global elite has launched a world-wide operation against an unaware population to reduce and control fertility. Vaccines and even staple food crops have been modified to achieve these goals.


https://www.infowars.com/kenyan-doctors-find-anti-fertility-agent-in-un-tetanus-vaccine/
	Kenyan Doctors Find Anti-Fertility Agent In UN Tetanus Vaccine


https://www.infowars.com/msnbc-in-cover-up-of-manifestly-provable-population-control-plan/
	MSNBC In Cover-Up Of Manifestly Provable Population Control Plan

	In the following video clips, women of the Akha tribe who live predominately in Thailand, describe how they miscarried shortly after taking vaccines when they were eight months pregnant.


https://www.infowars.com/bill-gates-continues-gods-work-third-world-vaccine-workers-shot-dead/
	It appears that although Gates wants to carry on with what he calls ‘God’s work,’ people living in the third world are beginning to make their feelings abundantly clear. It appears that they don’t want his vaccines or his charity, as more shootings were reported in Nigeria.

	...They are right to be suspicious because it would not be the first time that vaccines were given with the intention of sterilizing women in the third world.


http://www.smithsonianmag.com/science-nature/vaccine-week-a-history-of-vaccine-backlash-18947333/
	Vaccine Week: A History of Vaccine Backlash
	By Sarah Zielinski

	...The anti-vaccination movement ebbs and flows over time, with fear of disease fighting mistrust of doctors, science and government. Which will win? If history is any guide: neither. 


https://twitter.com/SarahZielinski/status/851451780084924416
	Apparently the Trump administration isn't prepared for a global pandemic. I am so not surprised. Still sad, though.


http://www.smithsonianmag.com/science-nature/slow-monsoon-seasons-led-to-end-of-chinese-dynasties-1-180948022/
	Slow Monsoon Seasons Led to End of Chinese Dynasties
	By Sarah Zielinski 

	When the scientists matched up that record with Chinese history, they found some interesting correlations: the Chinese kingdom was strong during periods when the monsoon seasons were wet, and three dynasties (Tang, Yuan and Ming) ended during dry eras. The scientists write: "Whereas other factors would certainly have affected these chapters of Chinese cultural history, our correlations suggest that climate played a key role."

	The idea that when food is plentiful people are happy, prosperous and content with their government but less so when food is scarce is not new (Jared Diamond’s Collapse has several good examples). However, it is interesting to see how this played into some of China’s more momentous bits of history.


https://books.google.com/books?id=eswo_SMNwzAC&pg=PA49
	Lysenko legitimized and enhanced the appeal of his transformist programs by coopting the nativist and populist aura that surrounded the peasant horticulturalst I. V. Michurin (1855-1935). Lysenkoism's success in China depended on the Michurin imagery: the earth, grizzled farmer who's personal involvement with production is the source of endless creative innovation. Lysenko followed Michurin's trial-and-error technique, eschewing experimental controls, pure lines, and statistical evaluation of results.


http://www.encyclopedia.com/people/science-and-technology/botany-biographies/ivan-vladimirovich-michurin
	Michurin died in 1935, when Lysenko was beginning his campaign against genetics. Very quickly Michurin was transformed into the patron saint of that campaign, and “Michurinism” became the official name of Lysenko’s doctrine.

	...Michurin’s genuine contributions to horticulture are difficult to determine

	...Michurin was separated from modern biological science not only by his confessed ignorance of it but also by his objections. He was convinced, for example, that heredity “does not yield and in essence cannot conform to any patterns worked out by theoretical science and determined in advance.” In plant breeding, he declared, “Not only is it impossible to apply any calculation in accordance with Mendl’s law, but it is quite impossible to do any strictly precise work in accordance with a plan worked out in advance”: practical intuition must be the principal guide of the breeder, according to Michurin.


https://www.cia.gov/library/readingroom/docs/CIA-RDP80R01426R010400040001-5.pdf
	The estimate of losses that individual Michurinite scientists and, in particular, Academican T.D. Lysenko had, allegedly, caused the State are completely inaccurate and unrealistic, which has been justly described in the editorial in the newspaper "Pravda".


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Ivan_Vladimirovich_Michurin
	On September 11, 1922, Mikhail Kalinin visited Michurin at Lenin's personal request. 


http://www.nytimes.com/movie/review?res=9B0DE3DC103CE23BBC4153DFB3668382659EDE
	But the highlights of Michurin's career, as we know them here, are admiringly caught by writer-producer Dovzenko, who, following the party line, stresses his subject's common man qualities, his "discovery" by Lenin and the accolades accorded him by Stalin and Kalinin.


https://books.google.com/books?id=m4kJDgAAQBAJ&pg=PA147
	There were also, inevitably, images such as Michurin and Kalinin, 1949 (Fig 6). Mikhail Kalinin, nominal Soviet head of state 1919-1946 and the only "old Bolshevik" no to be "purged" by Stalin


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Prague_Conference
	...Kalinin was suspected of being an Okhrana agent so was not a full member


https://books.google.com/books?id=PY2RAgAAQBAJ&pg=PA168
	Stalin, for instance, kept in his archive a document exposing Kalinin, the figurehead 'President of the USSR', as an Okhrana collaborator.


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Olga_Lepeshinskaya_%28biologist%29
	Olga Borisovna Lepeshinskaya born as Protopopova (August 18, 1871 – October 2, 1963), was a Soviet biologist, a personal protegée of Vladimir Lenin, later Joseph Stalin, Trofim Lysenko and Alexander Oparin. She rejected genetics and was an advocate of spontaneous generation of life from inanimate matter.

	...Lepeshinskaya was a participant in the October Revolution. 


https://books.google.com/books?id=vTswH3fLLdgC&pg=PA188
	There are some indications that, as in the Soviet Union, the leadership of local scientific communities in Eastern Europe was deeply involved in spreading the Michurinist campaign and in the import of Michurinist biology.


https://books.google.com/books?id=9Lq2DAAAQBAJ&pg=PT46
	The Canadian wheat pool", Williams writes, "sent on of its most promising officials, Andrew Cairns, on a serious of trips through European and other areas of Russian, in 1930 and 1932. His brief mission was to examine the state of the Russian wheat crop, which he was able to do with an expert eye. The results of these visits give a fascinating insight into the disastrous polices, not only of collectivization, with its liquidation of the 'Kulaks', but also of the effects of Soviet agronomist Lysenko's crackpot agricultural techniques. The second visit, during May 1932, organized under the auspices of the British embassy in Moscow, produced three reports of quite unprecedented detail on the decline of Russian agriculture, and especially on the massive destruction of cereal crops in Ukraine."


https://www.britannica.com/place/Ukraine/The-famine-of-1932-33#ref404577
	The result of Stalin’s policies was the Great Famine (Holodomor) of 1932–33—a man-made demographic catastrophe unprecedented in peacetime. Of the estimated six to eight million people who died in the Soviet Union, about four to five million were Ukrainians. The famine was a direct assault on the Ukrainian peasantry, which had stubbornly continued to resist collectivization; indirectly, it was an attack on the Ukrainian village, which traditionally had been a key element of Ukrainian national culture. Its deliberate nature is underscored by the fact that no physical basis for famine existed in Ukraine. The Ukrainian grain harvest of 1932 had resulted in below-average yields (in part because of the chaos wreaked by the collectivization campaign), but it was more than sufficient to sustain the population. Nevertheless, Soviet authorities set requisition quotas for Ukraine at an impossibly high level. Brigades of special agents were dispatched to Ukraine to assist in procurement, and homes were routinely searched and foodstuffs confiscated.


http://ludus-vitalis.org/ojs/index.php/ludus/article/viewFile/4/4
	Paradoxically, only five years earlier, Prezent and Lysenko had actively supported the very concepts of genetics against which they later battled so vigorously, asserting the affinities between Marxism and Morganism (Medvedev, 1969). 


https://www.britannica.com/biography/Zhores-Aleksandrovich-Medvedev#ref275700
	In the 1960s Medvedev wrote a history of Soviet science with the aim of discrediting the doctrines of T.D. Lysenko, the charlatan who dominated Soviet biology during the reign of Joseph Stalin ...The Soviet authorities refused to publish Medvedev’s book ...The Soviet government denied Medvedev opportunities to attend scientific conferences abroad despite his growing reputation as a scientist, and he underwent constant harassment from the KGB from the mid-1960s on.


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Neo-Stalinism
	In June 2007, Russian President Vladimir Putin organized a conference for history teachers to promote a high-school teachers manual called A Modern History of Russia: 1945-2006: A Manual for History Teachers, which according to Irina Flige, office director of human rights organization Memorial, portrays Stalin as a cruel but successful leader who "acted rationally".


https://books.google.com/books?id=vTswH3fLLdgC&pg=PA188
	In late 1948 and early 1949 the Michurinist campaign quickly spread not only over Europe but also, to some extent, the Middle East, Eastern and Southern Asia, and South America. The results of the campaign in East European countries most resembled those in the Soviet Union: Lysenko's doctrine replaced formal genetics in curricula of agricultural schools and universities, existing genetics laboratories were closed or reorganized, and textbooks on Michurinist biology were published.


https://books.google.com/books?id=ne31X9gDmIYC&pg=PA331
	In 1949, few Chinese biologists were familiar with Lysenko's work before it was incorporated into a full-blown ideology. Thus, the Chinese science community in general was quite unprepared to deal with the militant promotion of Michurin biology by Chinese and then Russian Lysenkoites within months of the CCP's formal accession to power on October 1, 1949.


https://books.google.com/books?id=eswo_SMNwzAC&pg=PA49
	Even though the CCP did not issue any policy statement on Lysenkoism until 1952, Lysenkoism's quest for monopoly and the status of orthodoxy had already been achieved, de facto, with the license and encouragement afford by the CCP's comprehensive pro-Soviet policy of "learning from the advanced experience of the Soviet Union." 


https://en.wikiquote.org/wiki/Mao_Zedong#Quotes
	Stalin is our greatest father and teacher. In the name of Chinese people and Chinese Communist Party, we celebrate comrade Stalin's seventy birthday. May he be in the best health and live a long life! Leader of both the world's working class and Communist Internationale — Ten thousand years of life to Stalin!
	--Speech on the seventieth birthday of Stalin (21 December 1949)


https://books.google.com/books?id=y3PGCgAAQBAJ&pg=PT110
	...so strong was the influence of the USSR in the early years of the PRC that Chinese agricultural researchers were taught that Lysenko was infallible. A Beijing doctor recorded: "We were told that the Soviets had discovered and invented everything; we had to change textbooks and rename things in Lysenko's honour.'


https://books.google.com/books?id=eswo_SMNwzAC&pg=PA49
	As early as October 1949, Lysenko's representatives were in China, helping Luo Tianyu's campaign. First came V.N Stoletov, Minister of Higher Education and Chair of the Department of Genetics at Moscow University. He lectured at Luo's University, and was soon followed by other Lysenkoist luminaries, such as N. I. Nuzhdin and A. P. Ivanov. These visiting experts traveled extensively throughout China, giving introductory lectures which were rapidly transformed into college textbooks in the Chinese language. The Russians also preached to key scientists about Lysenkoism's scientific validity and effectiveness.


https://books.google.com/books?id=Ul5THCLL6roC&pg=PA127
	Zhu Xi became perhaps the earliest example of a Chinese biologist directly criticized by a Soviet Lysenkoite. In response to his recently published article on variation in the evolutionary process, Zhu was paid a visit by I.E. Glushchenko, who was lecturing and consulting in China. Glushchenko, the director of the Soviet Academy of Sciences Institute of Genetics, took offense at the "Morganist" implications in this piece ...Glushchenko faulted Zhu for failing to express an awareness of Michurin fundamentals, and warned him that no matter how good Chinese experimental technique might be, conclusions would continue to be lacking unless Chinese studied the dialectical materialism of Engels, Stalin, and Chairman Mao (especially Mao's essay "On Contradiction")

	...Zhu Xi's piece is among the earliest examples of...lightly veiled criticism of Soviet arrogance and the CCP's "learn from the Soviets" policy.

	...Tan Jiazhen reports that when Nuzhdin's tour took him south, he visited Zhejiang University, specifically to convince Tan of the merits of Michurin biology and to ask Tan to convert. At this time, Lou Tianyu's campaign was largely confined to the northeast and to agricultural science institutions. ...He was therefore quite comfortable telling Nuzhidin politely to go peddle his papers elsewhere. When Tan moved to his new position at Shanghai's Fudan University, in 1952, Lysenkoism had moved into the south and was there to greet him with a vengeance.


https://books.google.com/books?id=ne31X9gDmIYC&pg=PA331
	...a national campaign to make Lysnkoism immediately the exclusive orthodox of agricultural biology, and eventually all biological science. To implement this ambitious plan, the Party appointed Luo Tianyu (1900-1986), a Party veteran who spent the war years in Yan'an as a science educator. In the early 1940s, he sponsored education reforms that conscientiously embodied Mao's populist Rectification (zheng feng) campaign. For this, he was rewarded with the chairmanship of Yan'an universities' Department of Agriculture.


https://books.google.com/books?id=LY4YDQAAQBAJ&pg=PT257
	In the charged atmosphere of cheng-feng, the study of theory and the quest for basic knowledge were held up for ridicule, while those who pursued such objects were scorned. ...by June Mao's supporters were in fully cry, and the unfortunate targets of their anger sought shelter.

	...the first attack came from within, in an article in the July 23 issue of Liberation Daily by the chairman of the biology department, Lo T'ien-yu. Lo charged that his comrades at the NSI had failed to place practical application ahead of abstract theory. They had clung to a "dogmatic" reliance on foreign textbooks, rather than going "up the mountain to collect specimens or into the factory to do work." From these books students learned meaningless abstractions like the "size of the universe," "four or five dimensional space," and the "electron" and "atomic" theories, none of which served any useful purpose. "In some courses," Lo charged, students "simply recite the Classics"


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Chinese_mathematics
	In the third century Liu Hui wrote his commentary on the Nine Chapters and also wrote Haidao Suanjing which dealt with using Pythagorean theorem (already known by the 9 chapters), and triple, quadruple triangulation for surveying; his accomplishment in the mathematical surveying exceeded those accomplished in the west by a millennium. He was the first Chinese mathematician to calculate π=3.1416 with his π algorithm. He discovered the usage of Cavalieri's principle to find an accurate formula for the volume of a cylinder, and also developed elements of the integral and the differential calculus during the 3rd century CE.


https://books.google.com/books?id=eswo_SMNwzAC&pg=PA53
	...the Soviet pattern planned S&T research in coordination with production goals. This contributed to a Chinese preoccupation with immediate and demonstrable production applications to justify research. Often, basic research was denigrated.


https://books.google.com/books?id=eswo_SMNwzAC&pg=PA49
	He had written that "the fields are a laboratory; nature is a classroom." Moreover, he set mass science above that of the intellectuals, saying that the People are genuine materialists, who grasp the answers to things directly, because, if they do not understand and live by the laws of nature, they die. Since scholars do not operate this way, they are idealists.


https://books.google.com/books?id=ne31X9gDmIYC&pg=PA331
	...Luo added mandatory study of Michurin biology. Furthermore, he required that all faculty formally renounce classical genetics and embrace Michurinism. The university's three distinguished program heads, however, refused to follow this requirement ...Not only did they challenge Luo's authority, they also denied him distinguished converts who could serve as models for the rest of the faculty and the forthcoming national pro-Soviet campaign to "learn from the advanced experience of the Soviet Union." The fate of these three is instructive.

	...Li became so intimidated by Luo that he and his family soon fled China

	...Wu Zhongxian...protected himself by not expressing his dissent publicly and by shifting his teaching and research out of genetics	

	...After Luo removed him from his co-directorship, he subjected Tang to a humiliating public "thought remolding" session before the entire school ...Tang was then ostracized from the school for criticizing and resisting the Party's policy of learning from the Soviets.


http://www.massline.org/SingleSpark/Stalin/StalinMaoEval.htm
	Mao’s Evaluations of Stalin

	“Stalin is the true friend of the Chinese nation and of the cause of the liberation of the Chinese people. The Chinese people’s love and respect for Stalin, and our friendship for the Soviet Union, are wholly sincere. Any attempt, from whatever quarter, to sow dissension by rumor-mongering and slander will be of no avail in the end.”
      —“Stalin Is the Friend of the Chinese People” (Dec. 20, 1939), MRP7, pp. 307-308


https://books.google.com/books?id=eswo_SMNwzAC&pg=PA49
	Luo's campaign continued for almost two more years, during which his heavy-handed treatment of scientists exacerbated tensions between Party and non-Party intellectuals at a time when the CCP was strenuously recruiting intellectuals, especially scientists, into the Party.

	The Lysenkoist campaign was almost impossible to assail from any solid institutional base. There were not yet any centralized science-planning agencies nor any science plan to which anti-Lysenkoists could appeal. Leaders of the Ministry of Agriculture, while not necessarily themselves Lysenkoists, nevertheless were strongly attracted to the doctrine because of their empirical and pragmatic bias. ...The leadership of the CAS was sufficiently subservient to the CCP to accept the Lysenkoist juggernaut as one more element of the pro-Soviet policy.


https://books.google.com/books?id=Ul5THCLL6roC&pg=PA127
	Meanwhile, Nuzhdin's lectures were translated into Chinese, anthologized, and distributed widely, making it one of the earliest textbooks in Michurin biology. Many more Lysenkoite visitors would follow him, and many more such textbooks would be published.


https://books.google.com/books?id=eswo_SMNwzAC&pg=PA49&lpg=PA49
	...on the eve of Russia's massive assistance with China's 1st Five-year Plan, the putative success of Soviet science, including Lysenkoism, seemed to be the surest guide.

	...By the mid-1950's, thousands of advanced Chinese students were studying in a variety of disciplines in various Soviet universities. Hundreds of Soviet scientists came to Chinese universities to offer introductory courses in their specialties and to give state-of-the-art colloquia to research in the institutes.

	Throughout the 1st Five-Year-Plan period, as Soviet-inspired S&T reforms were being implemented, the "Michurin line" flourished. A constant stream of Soviet experts shaped the biology curricula of colleges and universities. In cytlology, the crackpot work of Olga Lepeshenskaya was used to support Lysenko's transformist beliefs by supposedly showing that living cells could be created out of non-living organic material. A. V. Dubrovina lectured to huge audiences on Lysenko's version of Darwin, and introduced that there was neither rivalry nor "mutual aid" among organisms within a specious. I. E. Glushchenko, leader of Lysenko's international program, and other agricultural experts gave extensive lectures explaining the relationship between Lysenko's "New Darwinism" and plant cultivation programs.

	Except as the target of nasty epithets, classical genetics disappeared from podium and print.


https://books.google.com/books?id=3VeLKJyRzuQC&pg=PA68	
	Mao became greatly taken with the theories of Williams, Lysenko, and Michurin. He read Williams' book on soil while still in Yanan and later frequently quoted both him and Lysenko. Mao, too, wanted the Chinese to plant seeds close together because, as he told colleagues, 'with company they grow easily, when they grow together they will be comfortable'. Lysenko's theories meshed perfectly with Mao's obsession with class struggle. He readily believed that plants from the same 'class' would never compete against each other for light or food.


http://alphahistory.com/chineserevolution/trofim-lysenko/
	Mao’s ‘Eight Point Charter of Agriculture’ (1958) was strongly influenced by the theories of Lysenko. Chinese peasant farmers were ordered to embrace ‘Lysenkoism’ and to abandon techniques they had used for centuries. Farmers were ordered to ‘close plant’ seeds and seedlings, being assured by government officials that plants of the same species would not compete for water or nutrients. Lysenkoist theory claimed that deep ploughing the soil would encourage faster, deeper root growth.


https://books.google.com/books?id=9pPxwn6EvR4C&pg=PA142
	...at the first day of the Beidaihe Conference, Mao particularly emphasized deep ploughing, which, he said, was the principal direction for agriculture, as without it large quantities of fertilizer could not be added. ...After three year's hard work, Mao maintained, two thirds of all farmland could be sufficient to support the population, and one-third could be used for afforestation.


https://books.google.com/books?id=14A1qPQOgQMC&pg=PA133
	Pushing villagers to work around the clock, the party leaders organized Da Fo's school-age children to march and demonstrate in the streets, shouting slogans: "We will work during the day, we will work during the night; we will work all day and all night!" By late 1959 many villagers barely had the energy to walk or hold their heads up, and yet in the months to follow they were ordered to dig half mu of and in the day and half mu at night, as part of the deep plowing campaign, which was undertaken in the mistaken belief that the deeper the farmers plowed, the larger the root systems of their crops would be. The result was predictable: only those who cheated survived. Pang Renjing was not one of them. Zheng Jintian recounts the story:

		Pang Renjing died during the Great Leap Forward. He died of exhaustion, not starvation. He was sixteen years old at the time. The Liangmen People's Commune leaders selected young and capable people to do the deep digging of the soil. Everybody tried to cheat. Instead of deep digging, most villagers would simply dig up part of the soil and then cover up the rest with dirt to make it look like they had done the deep digging. Pang Renjing was not smart enough to do that. He was honest, and he dug earnestly. As a result, he fell behind others. He worked harder and harder. In the end, he suffered from overexhaustion and an intestinal disorder. People tried to send him to Dongle County hospital, but he died on the way there.

	...According to Mike Davis, physicians have observed the "destruction of the lining membrane of the lower bowel" as a classic sign of starvation-related deaths. 


https://books.google.com/books?id=9pPxwn6EvR4C&pg=PA142
	Mao's idea was that ALL farmland should be deep ploughed once within two to three years, and then the cycle would be repeated again. ...This directive, apart from the decision to double steel output in 1958 and to form communes, was perhaps the most influential, and it was to quickly set in motion a massive campaign involving hundreds of millions of people in the winter/spring of 1958/9.


https://www.marxists.org/subject/china/peking-review/1959/PR1959-01.pdf
	Peking Review
	January 6, 1959

	Temporary shortages of some non-staple foods is a problem now claiming considerable attention. The shortages have arisen notwithstanding a 49 percent increase in live pigs and the doubling of aquatic products. A recent Renmin Ribao editorial (December 28, 1958) gave the following analysis: On the supply side, considerable manpower has been concentrated in recent months on steel production, the harvesting of the tremendous crops, deep ploughing the land and extending irrigation works. This has had some effect on the production of raw materials for some non-staple foods.

	...With the establishment of community dining-rooms in the people's communes, the peasants are eating more and better food than ever before. As a result, demand is running ahead of supply.


https://books.google.com/books?id=sR6BAAAAQBAJ&pg=PT160
	Some rural cadres, in their determination to achieve total compliance with directives from Beijing, even required peasants to plough under crops that had already been planted in the traditional fashion, in order to plant again using the methods of deep ploughing and close planting. These crops, planted too late in the season, did not have time to mature before the following winter arrived.


https://books.google.com/books?id=9pPxwn6EvR4C&pg=PA142
	By winter 1958, some mess halls in the communes had run out of food, leading to outward migration oedema, and abnormal deaths. Peasants were fleeing, begging, and battling for food. By early 1958, spring famine had already occurred

	...Mao thought that the food shortage problem was restricted to only a few provinces, and transfers from the centre or from other provinces would take care of the problem.

	...At the initial stage of communization in early September, Tan Zhenlin reassured Mao with a rosy report that claimed that communes had been formed rapidly and smoothly, and that only in a minority of places had the peasants resorted to slaughtering and selling of livestock, felling trees, and grain concealment.


https://www.marxists.org/subject/china/peking-review/1959/PR1959-01.pdf
	Peking Review
	January 6, 1959

	Liu Shao-chi, greeting the conference on behalf of the Central Committee of the Chinese Communist Party, gave the meaning of last year's victory. "In agriculture," he said, "we have found the way to develop production at high speed, begun to to change its backward condition and doubled the output of grain, cotton and some other crops. It must be considered a great achievement that the annual output of grain reached about 1,200 jin per capita in a country as big and populous as ours."


https://books.google.com/books?id=NrOKDQAAQBAJ&pg=PA490
	They were urged to eat their fill as China would soon by overflowing with food. Minister of Agriculture Tan Zhenlin asked, 'After all, what does Communism mean? ...First, taking good food and not merely eating one's fill. At each meal one enjoys a meat diet, eating chicken, pork, fish, eggs.'


https://books.google.com/books?id=9pPxwn6EvR4C&pg=PA142
	However, an anonymous letter dated 5 September reached Mao in early October informing him that food shortages at several xiang in Anhui had killed over 500 people, and that many had become ill. The food shortages were attributed to natural calamities, false-reporting, and administrative commands which forced the conversion of dry land into rice paddies. 


https://books.google.com/books?id=5NsMWCHDStQC&pg=PA63
	But deliveries of grain to the state had to be made according to yields that local cadres had officially declared. ...Punitive extractions based on entirely fictitious figures could only create fear and anger in the villages. The stage was set for a war on the people in which requisitions would plunge the country into the worst famine recorded in human history. Tan Zhenlin was blunt, addressing some of the leaders of South China in October 1958: ‘You need to fight against the peasants . . . There is something ideologically wrong with you if you are afraid of coercion.’


https://books.google.com/books?id=9pPxwn6EvR4C&pg=PA142
	At about the same time (10-29 September), Deng Xioping, Li Fuchun, and other top leaders inspected the Northeastern provinces (Lianing, Jilin, and Heilongjiang) which were said to be lagging behind ...According to Deng's diagnosis, these provinces had fallen behind because their leaders had not implemented Mao's 'eight-point charter'; instead they were said to have followed the 'same old stuff' of 'wide spacing and shallow ploughing' ...Deng urged that a 'revolutionary campaign' be launched in agriculture.

	At the Happiness and Rising Sun communes, Deng went a step further and instructed that they should experiment with high yields, and reduce the present cultivated areas so that all efforts could be concentrated on close planting and raising the output/mu. This, he maintained, would increase grain production


https://books.google.com/books?id=sR6BAAAAQBAJ&pg=PT160
	Thee actual result of deep ploughing was often to bury the topsoil and bring to the surface worthless clay and sand. The Party also ordered that seeds were to planted more closely ...The result almost always was that the growing plants died or were stunted due to overcrowding.


https://www.marxists.org/subject/china/peking-review/1959/PR1959-01.pdf
	Peking Review
	January 6, 1959

	How They Did It

	The reasons for the record crops in 1958, Liao Lu-yen, Minister of Agriculture, told the conference, may be summed up in three points.

	First, putting politics in command. This, in essence, means strengthening leadership by the Communist Party. Only with politics in command, can the general line for building socialism be correctly carried out and the communist spirit of bold thinking, speech and action be developed.

	Secondly, the mass line. ...the participation of functionaries in manual work...

	...Thirdly, the "Eight-Point Charter of Agriculture"

	...Speakers at the conference told how, by following these principles, a number of provinces doubled or even trebled their grain output last year and achieved similar increases with other crops.


https://books.google.com/books?id=5NsMWCHDStQC&pg=PA310
	Baozi, a commune of 15,000 people known as ‘Fuling’s grain storage’, produced such abundant harvests that it usually sent half of its produce as tribute to the state. Along the main road up to 400 people could be found on any one day, busy bringing grain, vegetables and pigs to market. But by 1961 grain output had plummeted by some 87 per cent. The fields were overgrown with weeds, and half of the population had vanished.


https://books.google.com/books?id=7kgIN9KJwSwC&pg=PA291
	In 1954, the Chinese commissioned a major effort to devise a plan for the comprehensive utilization of the Yangtze. This produced an intensive project to survey the Yangtze that commenced during November 1955. At this time and indeed throughout the 1950's Soviet experts were intimately involved with China's dam planning. ...Overall, this Sino-Soviet survey team sought to develop a master plan (guihua) for the siting of potential dams throughout the Yangtze and its tributaries to control and develop the entire basin. 


http://probeinternational.org/library/wp-content/uploads/2011/04/Chapter-3.pdf
	Vice Premier Tan Zhenlin announced a policy of "giving primacy to water accumulation for for irrigation, construction of small-scale reservoirs, and economic self-reliance of the agricultural brigades." Since the problems of dam and reservoir construction in the mountains "had basically been solved," he proclaimed that "dam building should be extended to the plans."

	In response to the vice premier's plans, a hydrologist named Chen Xing pointed out that building reservoirs in the plains and the policy of giving "primacy to accumulation and irrigation" would cause serious environmental damage. He argued that the accumulation of vast quantities of water in reservoirs throughout Henan Province would raise the water table beyond safe levels, cause severe waterlogging of agricultural land, and increase the salinity and alkalinization of the soil. In short, he warned that dam construction on the plans would have disastrous consequences.

	Unfortunately, these warnings were ignored. ...in Anhui Province a whole slew of small-scale reservoirs soon sprang up in hilly areas. And the Huai River Valley was dammed to the point where the river's natural flow was essentially destroyed.

	...He also challenged the idea that the "Sputnik model" of the People's Commune (with its extravagant claims of vast increase in agricultural production) should be emulated by an equally extravagant policy of building more and bigger dams. For this he was labeled a "right-wing opportunist," and purged.


https://books.google.com/books?id=1fSy7tFlTycC&pg=PT169
	When an investigation team revisited Tongzhou the following summer, they found extreme destitution, as the state had all but abandoned the villagers, who barely survived without adequate food, clothing or shelter. ...the flooding had a far more profound and prolonged effect as a result of collectivisation. But none of this explained why Tongzhou had been hit so badly. Did it rain more over that part of the region? The answer came a year later, after Liu Shaoqi pointed out the marginal role played by catastrophes in a speech attended by thousands of top cadres. In the more open political climate of 1962, the Water Conservancy Bureau started taking stock of how the Great Leap Forward had affected the irrigation system. It singled out Tongzhou for special attention. The conclusion was unambiguous: poorly conceived irrigation projects, hastily implemented during the water-conservancy movement of 1957–8, had disturbed a carefully balanced natural water system. Combined with a huge extension of agriculture, more water than ever before was forced to go underground. When the clouds burst over Tongzhou in 1959 the water had nowhere to go, inundating fields and villages.

	...In some of the most devastated counties such as Fengyang ‘the rainfall was basically normal’. Further enquiries revealed that the main reason these regions were devastated by inundations of no more than 700 millimetres was the extraordinary extent of water-conservancy projects carried out since the autumn of 1957. These vast irrigation networks trapped the water, then silted up and became ‘an evil dragon turning the land into a sea’. So bad was the situation that any rainfall exceeding 300 millimetres could cause devastation. 


https://www.marxists.org/subject/china/peking-review/1959/PR1959-01.pdf
	Peking Review
	January 6, 1959

	...At the end of all this, when the harvest was in sight, a big storm with 30 centimeters of rainfall flooded an area with 300,000 people.

	Assailed by these calamities, some thought that all their hard work was for nothing and the production plans in farming were at best paper things. But the country Communist Party committee gave an active lead; it organized a big debate among the people on how to deal with the situation. On the basis of this full discussion, it put forward the slogan, "Create a 'miracle' by reaching the goal despite the flood."


https://books.google.com/books?id=g47FBAAAQBAJ&pg=PA32
	Experts from the Soviet Union were invited to help design the dam. ...Huang argued that building a dam at Sanmexia would block the sand from moving down-stream and cause serious flood in the upstream plain area. Unfortunately, it was difficult to oppose experts from the Soviet Union at that time

	...Sanmenxia Dam was completed in 1960. Unfortunately, only 1-year later Huang's predication became true when 1.5 billion tons of sand blocked the Yellow River, lifting the riverbed of the Wei River, the Yellow River's largest tributary, by 40 m. A large area of highly productive farmland on the Wei River plain was inundated, and almost half a million local people were forced to move to Gansu Province hundreds of kilometers away.


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Banqiao_Dam
	Construction of the Banqiao dam began in April 1951 on the Ru River with the help of Soviet consultants as part of a project to control flooding


http://www.sjsu.edu/faculty/watkins/aug1975.htm
	There were some flaws in the design and construction of Banqiao Dam, including cracks in the dam and sluice gates. With advice provided by Soviet engineers the Banqiao Dam and the Shimantan Dam were reinforced and expanded. The Soviet design was called an iron dam, a dam that could not be broken. 


http://probeinternational.org/library/wp-content/uploads/2011/04/Chapter-3.pdf
	The water at the dam reached 112.9 meters, more than two meters above its designed safe capacity. The third and final downpour began at 4:00 P.M on August 7 and lasted for thirteen hours. That evening at 7:00, the Zhumaidan Municipal Revolutionary Committee convened to assess the dangers posed by flooding to the dams at Suya Lake, Songjiachang, Boshan, and elsewhere. The potential danger to the Banqiao dam, however, was never mentioned: it was thought to be an "iron dam," one that could never collapse. By 9-00 PM, seven smaller dams at Queshan, Miyang, and elsewhere in the area had collapsed, followed an hour later by the medium-sized Zhuguo dam. Before the sun rose the next morning, 62 dams had collapsed in Henan.

	Around the same time, a thin line of people stood strung out across the top of the Banquiao dam, toiling waist-deep in water trying to repair the rapidly disintegrating embankment. ...the dam gave way, and 600 million cubic meters of water erupted

	...Over the next five hours, a gigantic wall of water travelling nearly fifty kilometers per hour cascaded downward over the surrounding valleys and plains obliterating everything in its path. Shortly afterward, the Shimantan dam also collapsed, to largely similar effect. Entire villages and small towns disappeared in an instant. ...Shahedian Town saw 827 of its 6,000 residents perish. Wencheng commune, east of Shahe County, lost half of its 36,000 residents, while 1,000 of the 1,700 residents of the commune's Weiwan Brigade were killed. Wei Shixing, a peasant who lost two family members in the storm, recalled, "I was looking for rope to help get my parents on the roof of our house. But as soon as my father tied the rope to the roof, the flood waters rushed into our house and snapped the thick rope like a thread. The last thing I saw was my parents being carried away by the water."

	...In November 1975, Madame Qian Zhengying of the Ministry of Water Resources and Electric Power delivered the keynote speech on dam and reservoir safety that convened in the city of Zhengzhou, Henan.

		"Responsibility for the collapse of the Banqiao and Shimantan dams lies with the Ministry of Water Resources and Electric Power, and I personally must shoulder the principal responsibility for what has happened. We did not do a good job: First and foremost, we have never experienced such large-scale floods or such a catastrophic series of dam collapses. We took for granted that the large dams were safe without researching the issue. We primarily followed Soviet safety specifications and although we made some design changes, we didn't make fundamental improvements and we didn't draw from the experiences of other countries or from our own experiences."

	...Qian Zhengying's speech left a deep impression: Dam collapses such as the Bianqiao and Shimantan disasters must never recur.


http://probeinternational.org/library/wp-content/uploads/2011/04/Chapter-3.pdf
	By Yi Si

	...What she failed to say, however, was that [as Chen Xing had pointed out twenty years earlier], the dominant policy of "primacy to accumulation and irrigation" was bound to result in the kinds of disaster that had occurred. She also failed to explain why Chen's ideas were rejected at the time and why he later became the victim of a political purge, only to be brought back after the disasters had struck. On all this, as on the decision-making systems that caused the disasters, she remained silent.

	...trying to repair the rapidly disintegrating embankment. Suddenly there was a flash of lightning followed by deafening thunder. Silence followed, and, for a brief instant, the skies cleared and the stars appeared again overhead. Someone shouted, "The water level is going down! The Flood is retreating!" But just a few seconds later, the dam game way, and 600 million cubic meters of water erupted with a demonic and terrifying force. Somewhere, a hoarse old voice cried out, "The river dragon has come!"

	...A government order issued the previous day to evacuate local residents had applied only to populations living in the immediate vicinity of the Banqiao dam

	...The massive Suya Lake Reservoir, whose emergency sluice gates had been more than halved in number by ardent Maoist officials many years earlier successfully withstood the typhoon, but thanks only to remedial construction work that had been completed a mere eight days earlier.

	...Forty thousand people have been rescued: 200,000 are sick with diarrhea and other related illnesses. There's no medicine.

	..."At the most urgent moment after the collapse of the two dams, there was a blackout that caused tremendous chaos."

	..."Electrical power and communication were both cut off during the flood and as a result residents could not be evacuated in time and adequate warnings could not be communicated to residents in the lower reaches."

	...This is similar to the situation in 1972 when the completion date of the Gezhouba dam was advanced in order to celebrate the birthday of Chinese Communist Party Chairman Mao Zedong. Such are the effects of personal boasting and bombast.

	...Tan Zhenlin announced a policy of "giving primacy to water accumulation"


https://books.google.com/books?id=OoSLBQAAQBAJ&pg=PA157
	A Great trial in Chinese history: the trial of the Lin Biao and Jiang Qing counter-revolutionary cliques
	By Yong Zhou

	Its members allegedly included Liu Bocheng, Xu Xianqian, Tan Zhenlin, Yu Qiuli, Wang Zhen and Liao Chengzhi, who were falsely accused of having "illicit relations with foreign countries," "making preparations for an armed insurrection" and attempting to "stage a coup."


http://probeinternational.org/library/wp-content/uploads/2011/04/Chapter-3.pdf
	By Yi Si

	In ancient times, the harnessing of water by the ancient sage Yu followed natural laws and respected humankind's desire to survive, raise harvests, and live a good life. He also had great respect for the inherent nature of water. Water and land coexisted peacefully.

	The year after the disaster, in early summer 1976, the fertile land where the 850,000 victims were buried produced a bumper crop. Surveying the land carefully, one could see crops everywhere, but what made people's hearts quiver were the small areas where the crops were especially rich and dense.

	Looking at the silvery wheat waving in the breeze, one survivor commented: "The wheat is really growing!"


https://books.google.com/books?id=1fSy7tFlTycC&pg=PT169
	By 1980 some 2,976 dams had collapsed in Henan. As the chief of the provincial Bureau for Water Resources later put it, referring to the Great Leap Forward, ‘the crap from that era has not yet been cleared up’.

	Interference with nature increased the alkalisation – also known as salinisation or sodification – of farmlands, although this was a phenomenon more commonly associated with the semi-arid plains of the north. Alkalisation is often seen as a drawback of irrigation in dry regions where a lack of rainfall allows the soluble salts contained in water to accumulate in the soil, severely reducing its fertility. New irrigation schemes had a disastrous effect on the alkalisation of the North China Plain. In Henan, some two-thirds of a million hectares of soil turned into alkaline land.

	...on average salinisation was above 20 per cent by 1962, having doubled since the Great Leap Forward. In Huimin county it was close to half of all cultivated land. There was little doubt about the reasons for this: ‘Over the last couple of years the development of irrigation schemes has disturbed the natural drainage system.’ How many millions of hectares were lost to salt during the great famine is not clear, but it is likely to have reached 10 to 15 per cent of all irrigated cropland.
 
	No nationwide or even provincial figures exist, but qualitative evidence suggests that air and water pollution also contributed to an environmental crisis of considerable proportions.

	...one case study illustrates the impact of the Great Leap Forward. The leather, knitting, paper and chemical factories in Lanzhou, the industrial centre of the north-west, generated some 1,680 tonnes of waste water a day in 1957. This had rocketed up to 12,750 tonnes a day by 1959. Lanzhou is the first large city along the Yellow River, which contained eight times more pollutants than was allowed by the Ministry of Hygiene. The river slowly wound its way through the deserts and grasslands of Inner Mongolia before entering the North China Plain, where the water was diverted for irrigation through endless conduits and culverts, the pollutants becoming embedded deep in the cultivated soil.

	People too were poisoned, as rivers were often the only source of drinking water. Workers living near steel plants in the north suffered from chronic poisoning. In Zibo, Shandong, a hundred farmers became ill after drinking water polluted with contaminants from a pharmaceutical factory upstream.


https://books.google.com/books?id=9pPxwn6EvR4C&pg=PA142
	Meanwhile, another disastrous decision--the 'three-three' system--illustrates the impulsive and haphazard manner by which a general idea and a long-term aspiration of Mao's could be snowballed into a major national policy. Many zealots, in particular Mao's lieutenant, Tan, vied eagerly in giving it substance. There was little planning or consideration of alternatives, fervour and intuition alone guiding all the decisions. In October and early November, a series of regional conferences were convened to discuss the plans for 1959 agricultural production, leading to a far-reaching decision to reduce the cultivated acreage for 1959 summer crops, which contributed greatly to the serious food shortages and famine in 1959.

	...Mao had single-handedly imposed the communes by following his instincts. ...As previously mentioned, only by October/November did Mao begin to realize the full effects of the 'communist winds' and the universal concealment of grain and slaughter of livestock among the peasants. Coercive grass-roots cadres who exaggerated reports of yields had led to high procurement, which in turn deprived the peasants of grain, leading to deaths. Mao's confidence began to be shaken, but he still cherished the utopian ideal.

	...According to reports by certain central ministries, as early as April 1959, 25 million people in fifteen provinces did not have enough to eat.


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Great_Chinese_Famine
	Yang Jisheng would summarize the effect of the focus on production targets in 2008:

    		In Xinyang, people starved at the doors of the grain warehouses. As they died, they shouted, "Communist Party, Chairman Mao, save us". If the granaries of Henan and Hebei had been opened, no one need have died. As people were dying in large numbers around them, officials did not think to save them. Their only concern was how to fulfill the delivery of grain.

	...In July 1959, the Yellow River flooded in East China. According to the Disaster Center, the flood directly killed, either through starvation from crop failure or drowning, an estimated 2 million people, while other areas were affected in other ways as well.


https://books.google.com/books?id=5vgBaLfd9XsC&pg=PA170
	Lysenkoism did not multiply China's harvests, it destroyed them. At the very time when a bewildered peasantry were struggling to come to terms with the disruption of collectivisation, they were made victims of an imposed pseudo-science that caused their crops to wither in the field.


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Great_Chinese_Famine
	As a result of these factors, year over year grain production dropped in China. The harvest was down by 15% in 1959. By 1960, it was at 70% of its 1958 level. There was no recovery until 1962, after the Great Leap Forward ended.

	...Yu Dehong, the secretary of a party official in Xinyang in 1959 and 1960, stated,

    		I went to one village and saw 100 corpses, then another village and another 100 corpses. No one paid attention to them. People said that dogs were eating the bodies. Not true, I said. The dogs had long ago been eaten by the people.

	It is widely believed that the government seriously under-reported death tolls: Lu Baoguo, a Xinhua reporter in Xinyang, told Yang Jisheng of why he never reported on his experience:

    		In the second half of 1959, I took a long-distance bus from Xinyang to Luoshan and Gushi. Out of the window, I saw one corpse after another in the ditches. On the bus, no one dared to mention the dead. In one county, Guangshan, one-third of the people had died. Although there were dead people everywhere, the local leaders enjoyed good meals and fine liquor. ... I had seen people who had told the truth being destroyed. Did I dare to write it?

	...Unofficial estimates vary, but scholars have estimated the number of famine victims to be between 20 and 43 million. Historian Frank Dikötter, having been granted special access to Chinese archival materials, estimates that there were at least 45 million premature deaths from 1958 to 1962


https://www.marxists.org/subject/china/peking-review/1959/PR1959-01.pdf
	Peking Review
	January 6, 1959

	A magnificent task and a bright perspective await the Chinese people. Our ranks are united. We have the leadership of the Central Committee of the Chinese Communist Party headed by Comrade Mao Tse-tung. We have the assistance of the socialist camp headed by the great Soviet Union


https://books.google.com/books?id=5NsMWCHDStQC&pg=PA336
	Lin Biao, the general who had rallied to the defence of the Chairman at the Lushan plenum in 1959, again lauded the Great Leap Forward, hailed as an unprecedented accomplishment when compared to any other period of the country’s history. He rhapsodised: ‘The thoughts of Chairman Mao are always correct . . . Chairman Mao’s superiority has many aspects, not just one, and I know from experience that Chairman Mao’s most outstanding quality is realism. What he says is much more realistic than what others say. He is always pretty close to the mark. He is never out of touch with reality . . . I feel very deeply that when in the past our work was done well, it was precisely when we thoroughly implemented and did not interfere with Chairman Mao’s thought. Every time Chairman Mao’s ideas were not sufficiently respected or suffered interference, there have been problems. That is essentially what the history of our party over the last few decades shows.’


https://books.google.com/books?id=1fSy7tFlTycC
	The horror of mass destruction was first encountered by the party leadership in Xinyang: it reduced Li Xiannian, a tough veteran of the Red Army, to tears.

	...There are, indeed, vast numbers of villages where death claimed more than 30 per cent of the population in a single year – in some cases entire hamlets were wiped out. But counties are much larger political entities, their populations typically ranging from 120,000 to 350,000. A death rate of 10 per cent in one year across an entire county, composed of many hundreds of villages


https://www.theguardian.com/world/2013/jan/01/china-great-famine-book-tombstone
	...the greatest manmade disaster in history stalks an already impoverished land. In an unremarkable city in central Henan province, more than a million people – one in eight – are wiped out by starvation and brutality over three short years. In one area, officials commandeer more grain than the farmers have actually grown. In barely nine months, more than 12,000 people – a third of the inhabitants – die in a single commune; a tenth of its households are wiped out. Thirteen children beg officials for food and are dragged deep into the mountains, where they die from exposure and starvation. A teenage orphan kills and eats her four-year-old brother. Forty-four of a village's 45 inhabitants die; the last remaining resident, a woman in her 60s, goes insane. Others are tortured, beaten or buried alive for declaring realistic harvests, refusing to hand over what little food they have, stealing scraps or simply angering officials.

	...Page after page – even in the drastically edited English translation, there are 500 of them – his book, Tombstone, piles improbability upon terrible improbability. But Yang did not imagine these scenes. Perhaps no one could. Instead, he devoted 15 years to painstakingly documenting the catastrophe that claimed at least 36 million lives across the country, including that of his father.

	...He had little idea of what he would find when he started work: "I didn't think it would be so serious and so brutal and so bloody. I didn't know that there were thousands of cases of cannibalism. I didn't know about farmers who were beaten to death.

	"People died in the family and they didn't bury the person because they could still collect their food rations; they kept the bodies in bed and covered them up and the corpses were eaten by mice. People ate corpses and fought for the bodies. In Gansu they killed outsiders; people told me strangers passed through and they killed and ate them. And they ate their own children. Terrible. Too terrible."

	For a moment he stops speaking.

	"To start with, I felt terribly depressed when I was reading these documents," he adds. "But after a while I became numbed – because otherwise I couldn't carry on."


https://books.google.com/books?id=1fSy7tFlTycC
	...in several counties in the Jining region the trees had been stripped bare, children were abandoned and farmers died along the roadside, their faces sallow from hunger. In Juye people ate the straw from their pillows; thousands died of hunger.

	...When nothing else was left, people turned to a soft mud called Guanyin soil – named after the Goddess of Mercy. A work team sent by Li Jingquan was taken aback by what they saw in Liangxian county, Sichuan. It was a vision of hell, as serried ranks of ghostly villagers queued up in front of deep pits, their shrivelled bodies pouring with sweat under the glare of the sun, waiting for their turn to scramble down the hole and carve out a few handfuls of the porcelain-white mud. Children, their ribs starting through the skin, fainted from exhaustion, their grimy bodies looking like mud sculptures shadowing the earth. Old women in ragged clothes burned paper charms and bowed, hands folded, mumbling strange incantations. A quarter of a million tonnes were dug out by more than 10,000 people. In one village alone 214 families out of a total of 262 had eaten mud, several kilos per person. Some of the villagers filled their mouths with mud as they were digging in the pit. But most of them added water and kneaded the soil after mixing it with chaff, flowers and weeds, baking mud cakes that were filling, even if they provided little sustenance. Once eaten the soil acted like cement, drying out the stomach and absorbing all the moisture inside the intestinal tract. Defecation became impossible. In every village several people died a painful death, their colons blocked up with soil.


https://books.google.com/books?id=HopCAAAAYAAJ&pg=PA185
	By Sir Edmund Backhouse

	...the Chinese in particular, can claim superiority in this, that in remaining near to nature, he has escaped the shameful hypocrisies and conventional falsehoods, which play so large a part in the social systems of the Western World. 

	...The history of China, ancient and modern, is a serious of paroxysms; its keynote is bloodshed and famine, periods of peace and prosperity purchased by the slaughter of countless innocents. Its splendid civilization, based on an unassailable moral philosophy and the canons of the Sages has ever proved powerless against the inexorable laws of nature, against the pitiless cruelty of the struggle for life


https://rendezvous.blogs.nytimes.com/2012/09/05/the-enduring-legacy-of-chinas-great-famine/
	“Society became terribly violent during the famine,” during which as many as 45 million people may have died, Ms. Zhou said in an interview.

	“If you look at what is going on today, in a way I think there’s a lot we can see in what happened then in what happens now,” she said.

	Today, “family members don’t have to take food out of another person’s mouth,” but disputes over property “tear families apart,” she said. “It’s very common.”

	“I do believe it created a kind of long-lasting impact in the sense that, O.K., human beings are selfish, you can say that in general. But the use of violence, it really reached its height during the famine period and I believe that was the background behind the Cultural Revolution” that began just four years later, in 1966, killing many more.

	Hopelessness and selfishness inform Chinese society to this day, she said.

	“I very much feel that coming from this, what people have in China is a sense of hopelessness,” she said. “That to survive, the only way is to do it yourself.”

	Unable to look to the state to provide a safe environment, “you take things for yourself. It’s the only possible means to survive,” she said.

	“In fact I speak to officials and that’s what they say,” said Ms. Zhou. “You never really know what’s going to happen tomorrow, somebody will get you.”

	That leads to a mentality where abuse of power is viewed as perhaps unfortunate, but almost morally acceptable, because power protects.

	“If you are powerful, then the damage is even bigger and greater,” Ms. Zhou said.


https://books.google.com/books?id=Kc4iBQAAQBAJ
	By Charles Emmerson

	When 2,000 years of Chinese empire ended it was with a bang – and with a whimper.



...



https://rendezvous.blogs.nytimes.com/2012/09/05/the-enduring-legacy-of-chinas-great-famine/
	‘‘When I was doing research I realized how taboo this subject still is,” she said. “It was so difficult to access materials. I didn’t want to give up. I wanted to find out what really happened.”

	Importantly, for all the horror she discovered in her trek through dozens of archives, many very hard to get into, she also found something else: extraordinary courage among ordinary Chinese.


https://www.theguardian.com/world/2013/jan/01/china-great-famine-book-tombstone
	He is, she points out, part of a generation of quietly committed scholars. Despite its apparently quaint title, Annals of the Yellow Emperor is a bold liberal journal that has repeatedly tackled sensitive issues. But writing Tombstone was also a personal mission. Yang was determined to "erect a tombstone for my father", the other victims and the system that killed them.

	...It was, he says, a gradual awakening. He continued to work for Xinhua, a task made easier by the country's reform and opening process and his own evolution; by the third decade of his career, he says, "I had my independent thinking and was telling the truth." That was when his work on Tombstone began: "I just had a very strong desire to find out the facts. I was cheated and I don't want to be cheated again."

	..."The textbooks don't mention this part of history at all," says Yang. "At every festival they have propaganda about the party's achievements and glory and greatness and correctness. People's ideology has been formed over many years. So right now it's very necessary to write this book; otherwise nobody has this history."

	...Some hope that the new generation of leaders taking power may be willing to revisit the country's history and acknowledge the mistakes that have been made. Others think it will be easy for them to continue smoothing over the past. "Because the party has been improving and society has improved and everything is better, it's hard for people to believe the brutality of that time," Yang notes.

	...He is, says Lusby, a true patriot; his diligent and risky work is not just for his father and himself, but for his country: "The Chinese people were cheated. They need real history."
